
President Donald Trump stayed on script for more than a week as he crisscrossed through Asia — and then Russian President Vladimir Putin showed up.
After chatting with Putin on the sidelines of the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation summit here, Trump abandoned the diplomatic tone the White House had carefully scripted for his five-country tour, once again contradicting the overwhelming consensus among current and former U.S. officials that the Russian leader manipulated the 2016 election.
In a 26-minute question-and-answer session with reporters aboard Air Force One, the president managed to dismiss probes into whether his campaign colluded with Russia as an “artificial Democratic hit job,” said he believed Putin's insistence that Russia did not attempt to meddle in the 2016 electon, and warned that the continued focus on Russian election meddling risks lives.

GOP Senate candidate Roy Moore spoke defiantly Saturday morning at a political gathering in Alabama that allegations against him amounted to “fake news” perpetrated by The Washington Post and political opponents engaged “in a desperate attempt to stop my campaign.”
The Post reported earlier this week that four women said Moore had pursued sexual or romantic relations with them when they were teenagers and he was in his 30s.
“These campaign attacks are false and completely untrue,” Moore told an audience of more than a hundred supporters, who gave Moore several standing ovations during his speech at the Veterans Day breakfast.

An ex-wife of Devin Kelley, who authorities have identified as the gunman responsible for the mass shooting at a church in Sutherland Springs, Texas, earlier this month, described his alleged abuse in a television interview.
“He just had a lot of demons or hatred inside of him,” Tessa Brennaman, 25, said on CBS’ Inside Edition.
Kelley had a history of domestic violence; TIME reported earlier this week that, in 2012, Tessa Kelley accused him of beating and choking her, breaking her infant son’s skull and threatening her with a gun. A military court charged Kelley with domestic violence and sent him to a mental hospital in New Mexico, but he briefly escaped. Later that year he pleaded guilty to domestic violence charges, and a year after that was discharged for bad conduct after spending a year in military prison, according to CBS News.

Mitch McConnell, the Senate majority leader, acknowledged on Friday that the Republican tax plan might result in a tax hike for some working Americans, saying he “misspoke” days earlier when he said that “nobody in the middle class is going to get a tax increase” under the Senate bill.
“I misspoke on that,” Mr. McConnell, a Kentucky Republican, said in an interview on Friday with The New York Times. “You can’t guarantee that absolutely no one sees a tax increase, but what we are doing is targeting levels of income and looking at the average in those levels and the average will be tax relief for the average taxpayer in each of those segments.”
The Senate bill unveiled on Thursday would raise taxes on millions of middle-class families, according to a preliminary New York Times analysis. The plan would also disproportionately benefit high earners and corporations. Still, middle-class earners would fare better under the Senate proposal than its counterpart in the House, the analysis found.

Lebanon’s president called on Saudi Arabia on Saturday to clarify why Lebanese Prime Minister Saad al-Hariri could not return home, a week after he stunned his country by resigning while in the kingdom.
A senior Lebanese official said President Michel Aoun had told foreign ambassadors Hariri had been “kidnapped” and should have immunity.
Hariri’s shock resignation has thrust Lebanon back into the frontline of a power struggle between Sunni Saudi Arabia and Shi‘ite Iran - a rivalry that has wrought upheaval in Syria, Iraq, Yemen, and Bahrain.
“Lebanon does not accept its prime minister being in a situation at odds with international treaties,” Aoun said in a statement. He said any comment or move by Hariri “does not reflect reality” due to the questions over his status following his resignation in a broadcast from Saudi Arabia.

Authorities say an air traffic controller at a North Carolina airport has been arrested on charges of possessing a weapon of mass destruction.
Local media outlets report that the FBI says 30-year-old Paul George Dandan was arrested Friday in Charlotte. The FBI is assisting Charlotte-Mecklenberg Police with the investigation but said federal charges aren’t expected against Dandan at this point.
Details weren’t available about the type of weapon or where it was found. U.S. law defines WMDs as ranging from explosive devices to biological weapons.
The Federal Aviation Administration told WCNC-TV that Dandan was fired from his job at Charlotte Douglas International Airport after his arrest.

North Korea lashed out at US President Donald Trump again Saturday, describing him as a "destroyer" who "begged for nuclear war" during his tour of Asia.
"His current trip to our surrounding region is a warmonger's visit for confrontation to rid the DPRK (Democratic People's Republic of Korea) of its self-defensive nuclear deterrence," North Korea's Foreign Ministry said in a statement published on state media, Korean Central News Agency.
Trump is in Vietnam as part of a nearly two-week tour of Asia, and North Korea's nuclear weapons program has been a major talking point with his Japanese, South Korean and Chinese counterparts.
"The weapons you are acquiring are not making you safer, they are putting your regime in grave danger," Trump said about North Korea during an address at South Korea's National Assembly in Seoul. "Every step you take down this dark path increases the peril you face."

Two villagers who said they were among the first to find the body of Sgt. La David Johnson in Niger last month recalled discovering the body with a gaping head wound and the soldier's hands tied, a report said Friday.
The Washington Post reported that the villagers' accounts raise the possibility that Johnson was first captured in the Oct. 4 ambush before being killed.
“His two arms were tied behind his back,” Adamou Boubacar, 23, a farmer, told the paper in a phone interview. Another witness told the paper separately that the back of Johnson's head “was a mess, as if they had hit him with something hard, like a hammer. They took his shoes. He was wearing only socks.”
Johnson, 25, was one of the four U.S. Special Forces – or Green Berets – killed in an ambush believed to have been orchestrated by militants linked to the Islamic State group in Niger. The attack took place outside a remote village called Tongo Tongo.

A group of U.S. states, cities, businesses and universities said Saturday they are still committed to curbing global warming even as U.S. President Donald Trump’s administration is walking away from the Paris climate accord.
But the alliance, which has an economy larger than Japan and Germany combined, says it won’t be able to achieve the necessary cut in greenhouse gas emissions without some efforts at the federal level.
“It is important for the world to know, the American government may have pulled out of the Paris agreement, but the American people are committed to its goals, and there is nothing Washington can do to stop us,” former New York City mayor Michael Bloomberg said at a global climate meeting in Bonn, Germany.

Tens of thousands of nationalists marched in a demonstration organized by far-right groups in Warsaw Saturday, as Poles celebrated their country's Independence Day.
The far-right march was one of many events marking Poland's rebirth as a nation in 1918 after being wiped off the map for 123 years. Earlier in the day, President Andrzej Duda presided over state ceremonies also attended by European Union president Donald Tusk, a former Polish prime minister.
But the march has become the largest Independence Day event in recent years, overshadowing official state observances and other patriotic events. Some participants expressed sympathy for xenophobic or white supremacist ideas, with one banner reading, "White Europe of brotherly nations."
Participants marched under the slogan "We Want God," words from an old Polish religious song that President Donald Trump quoted from during a visit to Warsaw earlier this year. Speakers spoke of standing against liberals and defending Christian values.

Special counsel Robert Mueller's team has questioned Sam Clovis, co-chairman of President Donald Trump's election campaign, to determine if Trump or top aides knew of the extent of the campaign team's contacts with Russia, two sources familiar with the investigation said on Friday.
The focus of the questions put to Clovis by Mueller's team has not been previously reported.
"The ultimate question Mueller is after is whether candidate Trump and then President-elect Trump knew of the discussions going on with Russia, and who approved or even directed them," said one source. "That is still just a question."
Clovis testified in late October before the grand jury in Mueller's investigation into Russian interference in the 2016 presidential election. He is also cooperating with the Senate Intelligence Committee, which is investigating the same issues.

Special Counsel Robert Mueller’s sprawling investigation has spawned a new guessing game in Washington centered on retired Lt. Gen. Michael Flynn, President Trump's former national security adviser.
Despite what some experts say is almost-indisputable evidence of wrongdoing — and reports that Mueller has gathered enough evidence to indict — no charges have been filed against the onetime intelligence officer.
The question for many is whether — or when — Flynn will be indicted by Mueller. Others speculate that he might already be cooperating with the special counsel’s investigation.
Flynn, who stepped down after a mere 24 days in the White House, is seen as vulnerable for a number of reasons.
Outspoken Virginia Republican Corey Stewart this weekend defended Alabama Senate candidate Roy Moore, who has been accused of initiating sexual contact with a teenage girl. Meanwhile, Rep. Andy Harris (R-Md.) said if the allegations are true, Moore should drop out of the race.
Stewart, chairman of the Prince William Board of County Supervisors and a candidate for the GOP nomination to challenge Sen. Tim Kaine (D-Va.), defended Moore on Friday in a Facebook Live event.
“These allegations are 40 years old. Forty years old, and they’re unsubstantiated,” Stewart said in response to a question from Ian Sams, Kaine’s campaign spokesman. “There’s no way to prove it. They didn’t prove it, but you’re presumed guilty? That’s not right.”

Uber and Softbank are reportedly close to striking a deal in which the Japanese conglomerate will buy a multibillion-dollar stake in the ride-hailing giant.
The deal could be worth as much as $10 billion, and key players are expected to sign it Sunday, according to Bloomberg, which said the terms include corporate governance reforms. News of the deal comes after Uber’s board, with an eye toward getting funding from SoftBank, voted to overhaul its corporate governance and create incentives for the company to have an initial public offering in 2019.
SoftBank plans to buy some newly issued shares as well as make a tender offer for existing shares, the New York Times reported. The bulk of the purchase, it said, would be through the tender offer.

At least 61 people in Iran were killed by Sunday's 7.3 magnitude earthquake that struck the Iraqi city of Halabja, close to the Iraq-Iran border, according to Iran's semi-official news agency Fars News. Citing the head of Iran's Emergency Services, Fars News says at least 300 people are injured in Iran following the quake.
At least six people were dead Sunday after a 7.3 earthquake struck the Iraqi city of Halabja, close to the Iraq-Iran border.
Four people died in eastern Iraq and dozens were wounded in the town of Darbandikhan, Omar Ahmad, the governor of Sulaimaniya, told CNN. Two people have died in the city of Qasr-e Shirin, Iranian TV reported, citing the country's emergency services.
The temblor, centered about 350 kilometers (217 miles) north of Baghdad, was felt throughout Iraq, according the US Geological Survey.

President Donald Trump tore up his diplomatic script this weekend in favor of an angrier, more familiar role after his conversations with Russian President Vladimir Putin at an economic summit were limited to hallway conversations lasting little more than five minutes.
The combative commander in chief re-emerged Saturday and Sunday irked that his promised thaw with Russia has been slowed by parallel investigations into Moscow's 2016 election meddling. Yet his continued vacillations on whether Russia interfered in last year's election have only clouded the matter further, thwarting the type of substantive cooperation he's seeking.
Traveling through Asia this week, Trump's top aides insisted the meddling must be addressed if the two leaders met. Secretary of State Rex Tillerson told reporters in Beijing that the long list of topics up for discussion with Putin included the cyber-intrusion.

The powerful Republican leader of the House tax-writing committee said he won’t accept the Senate’s plan to fully eliminate the state and local tax deduction that’s vital to states like New York and New Jersey.
Rep. Kevin Brady (R-Texas), chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, said he believes the final tax bill will include his compromise to keep some property tax deductions.
“I’m convinced that this is where we’re going to end up,” Brady told “Fox News Sunday.”
State and local tax deductions (SALT) have been a sticking point on tax reform legislation that President Trump wants signed into law this year.
The House is expected to vote on its plan this week that would eliminate the deductibility of all state income and sales taxes, but preserve property tax deductibility capped at $10,000.

Lebanon’s prime minister, Saad Hariri, whose mysterious sojourn in Saudi Arabia has shaken the Middle East, said in a television interview on Sunday night that he was able to move freely, that he had left Lebanon in order to protect himself and that he would return home “within days.”
But the remarks — his first in public since he unexpectedly flew to Saudi Arabia on Nov. 3 and announced his resignation from there a day later — seemed unlikely to clear up the confusion and tension over whether he had acted freely, whether he was in effect a hostage of the Saudis, and whether they had pressured him to resign as part of a broader strategy to increase pressure on their regional rival, Iran.
Those who have questions about his situation were unlikely to be persuaded by the interview carried on the channel of Mr. Hariri’s pro-Saudi political party by Paula Yacoubian, a talk-show host who generally hews to the Saudi line.

U.S. President Donald Trump offered to help resolve territorial disputes in the South China Sea as he entered the final leg of his 11-day swing through Asia.
Trump is scheduled to meet Philippine President Rodrigo Duterte on Monday as he attends two days of meetings on regional security affairs hosted by the Association of Southeast Asian Nations before heading home. A key discussion point will be how to lower tensions in the South China Sea, a major global shipping lane that contains oil and gas reserves.
“I am a very good mediator and a very good arbitrator,” Trump said Sunday in Hanoi ahead of a meeting with Vietnamese President Tran Dai Quang. “If I can be of help in any way, let me know.”

First Donald Trump insulted North Korea's Kim Jong-un, then, hours later, said he hoped the two could be friends in the future.
It is exactly the kind of contradiction that has typified his five-nation tour of Asia and left many observers scratching their heads. But what can we decipher about the US president's approach?
Donald Trump is likely to return home and say he has had a great trip to Asia.
There are some in the region who may agree that it has been of massive benefit, but not necessarily to America.
The US president has certainly been treated like a king everywhere he has gone, and it is obvious that he loves being feted and flattered - perhaps especially now, given all the criticism back home.
In a foreign land, it is clear that if you treat him like royalty, he will behave like a polite guest. He has steered clear of nasty, uncomfortable things like human rights and democracy.

Prince Charles led the annual ceremony to honor Britain's war dead on Sunday, laying a wreath on behalf of 91-year-old Queen Elizabeth to mark Remembrance Sunday as she watched the service from a balcony.
Breaking with her usual custom of placing the wreath at the Cenotaph on Whitehall in central London, the queen asked her eldest son to take on the role, in part because of the demands of the ceremony for someone in their 90s.
A two-minute silence was held at 1100 GMT (6.00 a.m. ET) and wreaths were laid at the foot of Britain's main war memorial by senior royals and political leaders including Prime Minister Theresa May and the leader of the main opposition Labour Party, Jeremy Corbyn.
The queen and her 96-year-old husband, Prince Philip, watched from the balcony of the nearby Foreign Office.
Royal historian Hugo Vickers said the queen had slightly stumbled during last year's service.

The official celebration of Poland’s 99th independence day proceeded innocuously, with ceremonies in the capital. There was even a visit from the European Council’s internationalist president, who insisted to Politico that Saturday’s festivities would proceed “with a smile on our face and with joy in our hearts.”
But for blocks and blocks and blocks beyond the central towers of Warsaw, a much larger crowd swelled beneath a cloud of red smoke. The tens of thousands of people came from across Poland and beyond, and reporters documented their signs:
“Clean Blood,” as seen by Politico.
“Pray for an Islamic Holocaust,” per CNN.
“White Europe” streaked across another banner, the Associated Press reported — as about 60,000 people chanted and marched through Warsaw in an annual gathering of Europe’s far-right movements, which have by now grown to dwarf the official version of Poland's independence day.

President Trump and his advisers have begun developing their own concrete blueprint to end the decades-old conflict between Israel and the Palestinians, a plan intended to go beyond previous frameworks offered by the American government in pursuit of what the president calls “the ultimate deal.”
After 10 months of educating themselves on the complexities of the world’s most intractable dispute, White House officials said, Mr. Trump’s team of relative newcomers to Middle East peacemaking has moved into a new phase of its venture in hopes of transforming what it has learned into tangible steps to end a stalemate that has frustrated even presidents with more experience in the region.
The prospects for peace are caught up in a web of other issues consuming the region, as demonstrated in recent days by Saudi Arabia’s growing confrontation with Iranian-backed Hezbollah in Lebanon. Israel is likewise worried about Hezbollah as well as efforts by Iran to establish a land corridor across southern Syria. If a war with Hezbollah broke out, it could scuttle any initiative with the Palestinians.

A country long divided by sectarian conflicts, Lebanon has found a rare point of unity since Saad al-Hariri’s shock resignation as prime minister: Lebanese of all stripes want him to come back from Saudi Arabia and to continue his work as premier.
Hariri left Beirut for Riyadh on Nov. 3 and resigned the following day in a speech that caught even his closest aides off guard. He cited fear of assassination and blamed Iran and its Lebanese ally Hezbollah for sowing strife in the Arab world.
The Lebanese authorities believe Saudi Arabia forced Hariri to resign and is holding him against his will, say top Lebanese state officials and politicians close to Hariri.
While some in Lebanon believe Hariri’s decision was his own and blame Iran and Hezbollah for the crisis, many others, including some of his longtime supporters, think he was forced to quit.
Billboards and posters demanding his return have gone up across Beirut. “We want our PM back,” declared a huge billboard near the Beirut waterfront.
Runners in the annual Beirut marathon on Sunday echoed the demand. Some wore T-shirts printed with Hariri’s face and the message: “We’re all waiting for you.”

Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell (R-Ky.) said Monday that Republican nominee Roy Moore should end his Senate campaign in Alabama, following allegations that he initiated a sexual encounter with a 14-year-old girl when he was 32.
“I think he should step aside,” McConnell said. His comments marked the most definitive position he has taken on Moore’s candidacy since The Washington Post reported the allegations on Thursday.
Asked by a reporter whether he believed the allegations, McConnell responded: “I believe the women, yes.”
Moore quickly fired back, showing no signs that he was preparing to bow out. He wrote on social media that McConnell is the one “who should step aside” and that he has “failed conservatives.”
Although it is too late to remove Moore’s name from the ballot before the Dec. 12 special election, McConnell said he is exploring the option of a write-in campaign by Sen. Luther Strange, whom Moore defeated in the primary, or another Republican.

General Electric, the nation’s largest industrial company, cut its dividend on Monday, only the second time it has done so since the Great Depression.
The company announced before the start of stock trading that it would reduce its quarterly payout by half, to 12 cents a share from 24 cents a share.
The dividend cut is the most emphatic move that John Flannery, G. E.’s new chief executive, has made since he took over in August. It is part of his broader plan to streamline the company by cutting costs and focusing on fewer businesses.
Last month, when G. E. reported disappointing financial results, Mr. Flannery said that the company would sharpen its focus on fewer industrial businesses and shed at least $20 billion in assets over the next two years.

A huge rescue effort is under way after a powerful earthquake struck Iran's mountainous border with Iraq, killing more than 400 people and injuring more than 7,000.
Teams are looking for survivors trapped in the rubble of collapsed buildings.
The quake is the deadliest in the world this year.
Most people who died were in western Iran - in Sarpol-e-Zahab, a town 15km (10 miles) from the border, and other parts of Kermanshah province.
The town's main hospital was severely damaged, leaving it struggling to treat hundreds of wounded, state TV reported.
A woman and her baby were pulled alive from rubble in the town, Iranian media said.
Amateur video posted to Twitter by a radio station appeared to show that many buildings in the town had collapsed.
Running water and electricity cut out in some cities, and after buildings collapsed people were forced to spend hours outdoors in parks or streets in cold weather.
Many homes in the predominantly Kurdish mountainous area are made of mud bricks and are vulnerable in quakes as large as Sunday's.

President Trump has selected Alex Azar, a former pharmaceutical executive and a top health official during the George W. Bush administration, to lead the Health and Human Services Department.
The decision to enlist the 50-year-old Azar — who served as president of Lilly USA, the biggest affiliate of Eli Lilly and Co., before stepping down in January to work as a health-care consultant — represents a pragmatic pick. An establishment figure with a reputation as a conservative thinker and methodical lawyer, Azar would be expected to use his experience as HHS general counsel and deputy secretary to pursue Trump’s goals through executive action.
In announcing the nomination Monday morning, Trump tweeted that Azar “will be a star for better healthcare and lower drug prices!” He has a close rapport with the department’s top political appointees as well as Vice President Pence.

A woman has said she was 16 when former US President George HW Bush groped her buttocks as she took a photo with him and her mother.
Rosyln Corrigan is the sixth woman to accuse Mr Bush of inappropriately touching her in similar circumstances.
She told Time Magazine she met Mr Bush at a 2003 meeting of CIA officers in Texas, where her father worked.
"My initial reaction was absolute horror," she said about the incident. "I was really, really confused."
"I was a child," Ms Corrigan added.
A Bush spokesman has previously acknowledged he has touched several women on the rear.
On Monday, Jim McGrath, a spokesman for Mr Bush, told the BBC the 41st president, who once directed the CIA, "simply does not have it in his heart to knowingly cause anyone harm or distress, and he again apologises to anyone he may have offended during a photo op".
Ms Corrigan said the incident occurred as Mr Bush was posing for a photo with her and her mother at the CIA office in The Woodlands, Texas, in November 2003.

An elite North Korean soldier stationed at the heavily guarded Demilitarized Zone made a bold bolt for freedom Monday, defecting to South Korea despite getting shot twice, the South’s military said.
North Korean soldiers shot at the unidentified North Korean soldier when he ran from the guard post at the northern side of the village, South Korea’s Joint Chiefs of Staff said in a statement.
He suffered gunshot wounds to his elbow and shoulder and was taken to the hospital when South Korean soldiers found him about 25 minutes later on the southern side of the Joint Security Area, a strip of land where North and South Korean forces stand face-to-face, the military said, according to the South’s Yonhap News Agency.
A South Korean army soldier, second from left, is seen as medical members treat an unidentified injured person, believed to be a North Korean soldier, at a hospital in Suwon, South Korea, Monday, Nov. 13, 2017. North Korean soldiers shot at and wounded a fellow soldier who was crossing a jointly controlled area at the heavily guarded border to defect to South Korea on Monday, the South's military said.
"He crossed from a North Korea post towards our [South Korean] Freedom House,” the South said in a statement.
It’s unclear what the soldier’s conditions are or why he decided to defect to the South. The South Korean military said he was unarmed and was wearing a combat uniform for a law ranking soldier. 

Before their bilateral meeting in Manila on Monday, President Donald Trump and Philippine President Rodrigo Duterte posed for pictures. Reporters were late for what is known as the "pool spray" because, according to the pool report of the meeting, they were held up by security.
When they finally got into the room, reporters asked questions of the two leaders regarding Duterte's controversial human rights record and whether Trump would raise it with him. Here's what happened next:
Duterte: "We will be discussing matters that are of interest to both the Philippines and ... with you around, guys, you are the spies."
"Hah, hah, hah," Trump said laughing.
"You are," Duterte repeated.

Parliament is to be given a take-it-or-leave-it vote on the final Brexit deal before the UK leaves the EU.
Brexit Secretary David Davis said the terms of the UK's exit, such as money, citizen rights and any transition must become law via a new Act of Parliament.
While any deal would "only hold" if MPs approved it, he said it would not alter the fact the UK was leaving the EU.
Labour welcomed a "climbdown" but some MPs warned of a "sham" if ministers could not be asked to renegotiate.
The BBC's political editor Laura Kuenssberg said the announcement was significant because it represented a big concession to potential Tory rebels and Labour MPs at a highly important moment in the Brexit process.
It comes as MPs prepare to debate key Brexit legislation later this week with the government facing possible defeat on aspects of the EU Withdrawal Bill, which will convert EU law into UK law.
The UK is due to leave the EU in March 2019, irrespective of whether MPs back or reject the terms of the deal negotiated by Theresa May's government.

Two Navy SEALs being investigated over the death of an Army Green Beret in Mali in June are accused of killing him after he discovered they had been stealing, according to a report in the Daily Beast.
CNN has not independently verified the information in Saturday's article, which the Daily Beast attributes to "five members of the special-operations community who were not cleared to speak publicly."
Naval Criminal Investigative Service spokesman Ed Buice confirmed to CNN last month that the NCIS was investigating whether two members of the Navy's elite SEAL Team Six killed Army Staff Sgt. Logan J. Melgar.
The New York Times was the first to report that the SEALs were under investigation for Melgar's death at a US government compound near the American embassy in Bamako, the capital.

The lord mayor of Dublin has criticised Bob Geldof over his decision to return his Freedom of the City award in protest against it also being conferred on Myanmar leader Aung San Suu Kyi.
Councillor Micheal Mac Donncha said it was "ironic" that Geldof was keeping his honorary knighthood despite the UK's "shameful record" of imperialism.
Ms Suu Kyi has been accused of ignoring the persecution of Rohingya Muslims.
More than half a million have fled to Bangladesh following recent violence.
"Bob Geldof is entitled to return his award if he wishes to do so," the lord mayor was quoted as saying by BreakingNews.ie.
"It should be pointed out that as ardmhéara [lord mayor] I have condemned the persecution of the Rohingya people and their expulsion from their homes by the military in Myanmar and the failure of Aung San Suu Kyi to even acknowledge, let alone condemn, what the UN has described as ethnic cleansing."
Mr Mac Donncha is a member of Sinn Fein, a republican party that wants Britain to relinquish control of Northern Ireland.

Fifteen months ago, a group called the Shadow Brokers began to taunt the National Security Agency with proof of an extraordinary breach: By unknown means, operatives had infiltrated its operations and stolen its most potent cyber weapons. Developed by the U.S. government to penetrate or attack adversaries, those weapons were then used to attack millions of innocents worldwide.
Future attacks are “all but certain,” The New York Times reported while revisiting the matter over the weekend, yet the NSA still doesn’t know exactly what was taken, or whether its defenses were breached by an outside hacker or an insider.
Some fear a mole remains inside the intelligence agency even today.
“The leaks have renewed a debate over whether the NSA should be permitted to stockpile vulnerabilities it discovers in commercial software to use for spying rather than immediately alert software makers so the holes can be plugged,” the Times wrote. “The agency claims it has shared with the industry more than 90 [percent] of flaws it has found, reserving only the most valuable for its own hackers. But if it can’t keep those from leaking, as the last year has demonstrated, the damage to businesses and ordinary computer users can be colossal.”

Madrid believes Russian-based groups used online social media to heavily promote Catalonia’s independence referendum last month in an attempt to destabilize Spain, Spanish ministers said on Monday.
Protesters hold the lights of their mobile phones during a demonstration called by pro-independence associations asking for the release of jailed Catalan activists and leaders, in Barcelona, Spain, November 11, 2017. REUTERS/Albert Gea
Spain’s defense and foreign ministers said they had evidence that state and private-sector Russian groups, as well as groups in Venezuela, used Twitter, Facebook and other Internet sites to massively publicize the separatist cause and swing public opinion behind it in the run-up to the Oct. 1 referendum.
Catalonia’s separatist leaders have denied that Russian interference helped them in the vote.
“What we know today is that much of this came from Russian territory,” Spanish Defence Minister Maria Dolores de Cospedal said of Russian-based internet support.
“These are groups that, public and private, are trying to influence the situation and create instability in Europe,” she told reporters at a meeting of EU foreign and defense ministers in Brussels.

Attorney General Jeff Sessions, testifying before the House Judiciary Committee, showed selective recall on the Trump campaign’s Russia contacts.
Mr. Sessions said he had “no reason to doubt these women” who have accused the man who wants his old Senate seat, Roy S. Moore, of seeking sexual or romantic favors from them as teenagers.
 Mr. Sessions was asked about his direction that the department consider a special counsel to investigate Mr. Trump’s political opponents, including Hillary Clinton.
Mr. Sessions denied that he lied in October when he testified that he knew of nobody in the Trump campaign who had contacts with Russians during the presidential campaign. “And I don’t believe it happened,” he said.
Court records later revealed that Mr. Sessions led a March 2016 meeting in which George Papadopoulos, a campaign aide, discussed his Russian ties and suggested setting up a meeting between Mr. Trump. and Vladimir V. Putin, the Russian president.

Attorney General Jeff Sessions said Tuesday that he had “no reason to doubt” the women who have made sexual misconduct allegations against Alabama Republican Senate nominee Roy Moore, joining a wave of high-profile Republicans who have expressed confidence in his accusers.
But Sessions did not say whether Moore should be seated if he wins a Dec. 12 special election. Ethics personnel at the Justice Department have advised him not to involve himself in the campaign, Sessions said.
Asked whether the Justice Department would investigate the allegations against Moore, Sessions said the agency would evaluate any allegations that they were presented with according to normal procedure, though he added, “This kind of case would normally be a state case.”
Sessions made his comments during testimony before the House Judiciary Committee Tuesday morning. Moore is running for the seat Sessions vacated this year to join the Trump administration. Some Republicans are hoping Sessions will leave his post to run as a write-in candidate against Moore.

At least five people are dead following a shooting at an elementary school in Northern California on Tuesday morning, according to authorities.
Among the dead are the gunman, who was killed by police, authorities said.
“At this point, the suspected shooter is deceased by law enforcement bullets,” Tehama County Assistant Sheriff Phil Johnston told reporters.
Authorities said the shooting occurred around 8 a.m. in Rancho Tehama, near Red Bluff, about 120 miles northwest of Sacramento.
Johnston did not have a total number of victims, but said that “a number” of students had been medically evacuated from the scene.
“We have about 100 law enforcement personnel in Rancho Tehama right now with multiple, multiple scenes,” Johnston said.
“I know that we have [airlifted] a number of students,” he told reporters. “I know that we have children that were attending school in a safe location at this time.”
Officials said the Rancho Tehama area remains on lockdown.

Roy Moore, the Republican nominee for U.S. Senate in Alabama, swears he’s innocent. “The people of Alabama know me. They know my character. They know what I have stood for in the political world for over 40 years,” Moore declared Monday night, after a fifth woman came forward to accuse him of sexually targeting her while she was a teenager (saying Moore assaulted her when she was 16). “I can tell you without hesitation this is absolutely false.”
To many of Moore’s supporters, this is a powerful message. They believe that if you have the right principles, all other truth follows. Without God, there can be no morality. With God, and with a good man like Moore, there can be no error. This mentality, known in Christian scholarship as “presuppositionalism,” sustains evangelical support for President Trump, according to Molly Worthen, a professor at the University of North Carolina, who explained the phenomenon at last week’s Faith Angle Forum in Miami Beach. People who think this way dismiss inconvenient facts. When the Washington Post goes after Moore, and when Senate leaders tell him to drop out, Moore’s believers rally around him.

Congressional lawmakers raised concerns about President Donald Trump's ability to use nuclear weapons during a hearing Capitol Hill Tuesday amid bipartisan anxiety over launch process procedures and indications that the administration has considered the option of a first strike on North Korea.
Members of the Senate foreign affairs committee called into question a decades-old presidential authority to deploy nuclear weapons in what was the first congressional hearing on nuclear authorization in decades.
"We are concerned that the President of the United States is so unstable, is so volatile, has a decision-making process that is so quixotic that he might order a nuclear weapons strike that is wildly out of step with US national security interests," said Sen. Chris Murphy, D-Connecticut.
Sen. Ed Markey, a Democrat from Massachusetts, echoed those concerns: "Many Americans fear that the President's words could turn into nuclear reality."
Republican members of the committee were less blunt in their criticism of Trump's judgment but did seek assurance that there are legal and strategic oversight measures in place to prevent the rash use of nuclear weapons.

First came the flood of social-media posts from former and current congressional employees who were sexually harassed on the job. Then came more than 1,500 names of former congressional staffers urging Congress to fix the problem.
Now, members of Congress are acknowledging they have colleagues who have engaged in lewd behavior, publicly coming to terms with sexual harassment as a pervasive problem on Capitol Hill. At a Tuesday hearing, lawmakers aired tantalizing details, albeit without naming names, of unwanted sexual comments and advances taking place in their midst.
“This is about a member, who is here now. I don’t know who it is, but somebody who I trust told me this situation,” Rep. Barbara Comstock (R-Va.) said at the hearing on sexual harassment.
The male member tricked a young female staffer into meeting him at his residence, Comstock said. When the staffer arrived, he greeted her in a towel, then exposed himself, she said. The staffer left the house and subsequently quit her Hill job, she said.

A 60-year-old man was shot and killed Tuesday morning in Tampa's Seminole Heights area, the fourth such death in what police say is a string of unsolved killings in that neighborhood within the past month.
"It is all in the probably 10-block, 15-block area," Tampa Mayor Bob Buckhorn told CNN sister network HLN on Tuesday. "And so we're just going to do our good police work and hopefully get a break."
Ronald Felton was shot in the back while crossing the street just before 5 a.m. Tuesday, police said. He became the fourth victim in a string of killings that has vexed investigators who remain desperate for clues.
A witness to the shooting provided a description of the suspect, Tampa police chief Brian Dugan said. "When I spoke to her, she said if our officer had been five seconds earlier, he would have been able to stop it," he said.

David Davis is on a determined mission to show global bankers some love, promising he’ll work to protect the City of London from any trouble caused by Brexit.
The minister for exiting the European Union has made two speeches in the space of a week setting out his plan to ensure the U.K. capital keeps its status as a world-leading financial center. It’s a far cry from the prime minister’s attack last year on the international elites as the “citizens of nowhere” who had driven disillusioned voters to pull Britain out of the EU.
In his latest comments, at a UBS conference in London on Tuesday, Davis said he wanted bankers to retain their ability to transfer between offices in the U.K. and the EU after Britain leaves the bloc in 2019. And he predicted he’d win agreement on a transition period “very early next year.”
UBS Group AG is among the companies that have recently set out their plans to move London-based workers to other European cities after Brexit.
U.K. Prime Minister Theresa May has proposed a two-year transition phase intended to keep businesses from triggering their contingency plans while Brexit talks continue, but the EU is reluctant to agree to the idea until Britain has signed up to the terms of the divorce.

Three UCLA basketball players accused of shoplifting in China last week were flying back to Los Angeles on Tuesday, the commissioner of the Pacific-12 athletic conference said, hours after US President Donald Trump said he asked his Chinese counterpart to help in the case.
The three freshmen -- LiAngelo Ball, Cody Riley and Jalen Hill -- were allowed to leave China on the US-bound flight after the situation was "resolved to the satisfaction of the Chinese authorities," said Larry Scott, commissioner of the Pac-12 Conference, of which UCLA is a member.
"We are all very pleased that these young men have been allowed to return home to their families and university," Scott said in a news release.
The three were arrested last week while their team was in the Chinese city of Hangzhou ahead of the squad's season opener in Shanghai. They were questioned on suspicion of stealing sunglasses from a Louis Vuitton store near their hotel.
The trio stayed at the hotel, reportedly awaiting next steps in their case, while their teammates went to Shanghai, where UCLA defeated Georgia Tech 63-60 on Saturday. The three also remained in China as their team returned to the United States over the weekend.

A North Korean soldier was shot at least five times as his comrades unleashed dozens of rounds at him during the man's desperate dash to defect at the Demilitarized Zone on Monday, the new details painting the escape as a more harrowing effort than what was initially reported.
The unidentified North Korean soldier-turned-defector remained at Ajou University Medical Center near Seoul on Tuesday, recovering from gunshot wounds that left him in “very dangerous” condition, said Lee Guk-jong, a doctor leading the medical team for the soldier. South Korea’s military said he suffered injuries to his internal organs but wasn’t in a life-threatening condition -- however, the medical center said the soldier was relying on a breathing machine after his surgery.
"[We] will have to ride out the crucial moments [in his recovery] over the next 10 days," the doctor said, according to South Korea’s Yonhap News Agency. He added the soldier’s survival would be determined in the coming days.

Zimbabwe’s ruling party said on Tuesday it would never give in to military pressure and accused the head of the armed forces of treasonable conduct after armored vehicles were seen heading towards the capital Harare.
The city was calm but the country has been on edge since Monday when Constantino Chiwenga, Commander of Zimbabwe Defence Forces, said he was prepared to “step in” to end a purge of supporters of a sacked vice president.
That unprecedented statement represented a sharp escalation of a rumbling political struggle over who will succeed President Robert Mugabe, 93, who has been in power since the country gained independence from Britain in 1980.
Mugabe chaired a weekly cabinet meeting in the capital on Tuesday. Afterwards, the ruling party, ZANU-PF, said it stood by the “primacy of politics over the gun” and accused Chiwenga of trying to disturb the country’s peace and stability.

The Syrian Foreign Ministry issued a firm warning to the U.S. and other foreign forces in Syria Tuesday without the approval of President Bashar al-Assad, telling them their presence was a violation of international law and accusing them of making matters worse for the war-torn country that days ago declared victory against the Islamic State militant group (ISIS).
The ministry issued the statement in direct response to remarks by Defense Secretary James Mattis, who suggested a day earlier that U.S. forces would not be leaving anytime soon. Unlike allies Russia and Iran, which intervened against Syrian insurgents and jihadis at the request of Assad, the U.S. entered the conflict without the Syrian leader's permission and has called for his removal. With ISIS effectively defeated, the ministry urged Washington and its allies to exit immediately.
"The presence of U.S. forces or any foreign military presence in Syria without the consent of the Syrian government constitutes an act of aggression and an attack on the sovereignty of the Syrian Arab Republic as well as a gross violation of the charter and principles of the United Nations," the ministry quoted an official source as saying.

Kevin Neal's deadly shooting rampage in Northern California may have been prompted by the fatal shooting of his wife, authorities said Wednesday.
Neal, identified as the gunman who killed four people in a string of shootings Tuesday, shot and killed his wife the previous night and concealed her body under a floor in his home, Tehama County Assistant Sheriff Phil Johnston said.
The discovery of the spouse's body brought the death toll to six, including the gunman.
"We believe that's probably what started this whole event," Johnston said of the wife's shooting.
Neal had been out of bail on an assault with a deadly weapon charge from January, officials said. Neal, 44, "was not law enforcement friendly" and authorities a number of times had come to his house after complaints that shots were fired from the property, Johnston said.

Republican and Democratic senators clashed on Wednesday over changes the Republicans made to their sweeping tax legislation late Tuesday night, as the momentum behind the tax overhaul showed no signs of slowing with votes expected in both chambers of Congress later this week.
Democrats attacked Republicans for inserting a repeal of the Affordable Care Act’s requirement that most people have health insurance into the tax bill and for imposing a 2025 expiration date for individual tax cuts, while making the corporate tax cuts permanent.
“This bill seems to get worse by the hour,” said Senator Ron Wyden of Oregon, the ranking Democrat on the Senate Finance Committee. “This is not just another garden variety attack on the Affordable Care Act, this is a repeal of that law.”
Repealing the health law’s so-called individual mandate allows Republicans to save more than $300 billion over 10 years. According to the Congressional Budget Office, 13 million fewer people would be insured after a decade without the mandate and health insurance premiums would rise by about 10 percent.

Robert Mugabe, the only head of state that Zimbabwe has ever known in its 37-year existence, is this morning under house arrest. Although the military insists that this is not a coup, it has all the hallmarks of one: The army controls the television station and the airport, and has confined the president and his family to their mansion. Unconfirmed reports suggest that leaders of one faction of the ZANU-PF, the ruling party, are being rounded up and arrested. However the next few hours and days pan out, it seems clear that the days of Robert Mugabe ruling Zimbabwe are at an end.
The immediate events that precipitated the military intervention all revolve around the question of who will follow the 93-year old Mugabe. For several years, two camps have jostled over the right to succeed him, one led by his wife Grace and the other by Vice President Emmerson Mnangagwa. Then, a week ago, the scales appeared to tip toward the first lady when the vice president was fired and publicly castigated for showing “traits of disloyalty.” Humiliated and fearing for his life, he fled the country.

Richard Cordray, the embattled director of the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, will resign his post at the end of the month, giving President Donald Trump the chance to reshape an agency that has drawn relentless attacks from businesses over its aggressive enforcement.
Cordray made the long-expected announcement in an email to bureau staff on Wednesday.
"It has been a joy of my life to have the opportunity to serve our country as the first director of the Consumer Bureau by working alongside all of you here," he wrote. "Together we have made a real and lasting difference that has improved people's lives."
Cordray has been rumored to be considering a run for governor of Ohio, but gave no indication Wednesday of his plans.
The White House will name an acting director to the post "at the appropriate time," deputy press secretary Raj Shah said.

UCLA freshmen LiAngelo Ball, Cody Riley and Jalen Hill have been suspended from the basketball team indefinitely after returning from a trip to China, where they were held for shoplifting.
"They will have to earn their way back," UCLA coach Steve Alford said during a news conference Wednesday.
Alford said the players will not travel, suit up for road games or take part in practice while the school performs a review of the situation.
The players were questioned last week about allegedly stealing sunglasses from a Louis Vuitton store next to the team's hotel in Hangzhou, where the Bruins had been staying before leaving for Shanghai to face Georgia Tech on Friday. They were released on bail early Wednesday morning and had been staying at a lakeside hotel in Hangzhou since then.
President Trump, who was already on an Asia trip, spoke to President Xi Jinping of China about the incident, and the players were allowed to return to the United States on Tuesday.
"These are good young men who have exercised an inexcusable lapse of judgment, and now they have to live with that," Alford said.

Sources close to Breitbart News chairman Stephen Bannon insist he is sticking by embattled Alabama Senate candidate Roy Moore (R) even as high-profile conservatives cut ties with the candidate less than a month before election day.
People who have spoken with Bannon and others who are familiar with his thinking say reports that he is having second thoughts about his support for Moore are overcooked.
The Daily Beast reported Tuesday that Bannon is privately discussing whether the allegations of sexual misconduct about Moore have become too serious to overcome. Bannon could be looking to save his political capital for the scores of primary challenges he’s planning for Republican senators up for reelection in 2018, the report says.
But sources tell The Hill that Bannon is still slated to rally support for Moore at a campaign stop in early December and said other events could be in the works.

A solid majority of Australians voted in favor of same-sex marriage in a historic survey that, while not binding, paves the way for Parliament to legally recognize the unions of gay and lesbian couples.
Of 12.7 million Australians who took part in the government survey, 61.6 percent voted yes and 38.4 percent voted no, officials announced on Wednesday morning. Participation was high, with 79.5 percent of voting-age Australians sending back their postal ballots.
“The Australian people have spoken, and they have voted overwhelmingly ‘yes’ for marriage equality,” said Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull, who called the survey in a move described by advocates as a delay tactic devised to appease his party’s far-right faction. “They voted ‘yes’ for fairness, they voted ‘yes’ for commitment, they voted ‘yes’ for love.”
The high turnout and unequivocal result amounted to a rebuke for Australia’s most conservative politicians, many of whom saw a majority of their constituents vote to support same-sex marriage despite their arguments against it.

The lawyer for Roy Moore brought up an MSNBC anchor’s “background” when defending the embattled GOP Alabama Senate candidate over allegations he sexually harassed and pursued romantic and sexual relationships with underage girls.
Lawyer Trenton Garmon was discussing the claims against Moore on MSNBC's "Live with Velshi & Ruhle" on Wednesday when he brought up anchor Ali Velshi’s background while defending his client.
Anchor Stephanie Ruhle asked Garmon, “Why would he need permission from any of these girl’s mothers if they aren't underage?"
“Sure, that’s a good question. Culturally speaking, and obviously there is differences, I looked up Ali’s background there and wow that is awesome that you have got such a diverse background,” Garmon replied. “And it is really cool to read through that.”
“What does Ali’s background have to do with dating a 14-year-old?” Ruhle asked.
Garmon began to reply that he was not finished with the context of his remark, when Ruhle interjected, “Please answer: What does Ali Velshi’s background have to do with dating children, 14 year old girls?”

The U.S. and its allies in Asia shouldn’t assume China will fully cooperate with the campaign to curtail North Korea’s nuclear arms program, a top priority of President Donald Trump, according to the annual report of a bipartisan congressional panel.
Despite concerns over North Korea’s advancing nuclear and missile programs, China remains the country’s largest trading partner and differs with the U.S. over the best way to handle Kim Jong Un’s reclusive regime, the U.S.-China Economic and Security Review Commission said in the report published Wednesday.
“The United States and the international community should keep their expectations low,” according to the report, “given China’s lackluster record of previous sanctions enforcement and continued sanctions violations by Chinese companies exporting dual-use items to North Korea.”
China faces a dilemma enforcing sanctions “in wanting to see some reform in the North Korean economy and not wanting to see a collapse,” panel commissioner Larry Wortzel told reporters before the report’s release. “We think their cooperation and exercise of sanctions will be fairly limited” by “what they see as their own national interest.”

It was a late February afternoon, when millions of Americans' phones and laptops started buzzing with breaking news from the White House.
"Gen Flynn was fired amid the scrutiny..."
"The White House national security adviser fired..."
President Trump had asked National Security Adviser Michael Flynn to leave the White House, said the reports. Flynn had misled Vice-President Pence about his contacts with then-Russian ambassador Sergey Kislyak.
It was the first resignation in the new presidential administration. But one media outlet, RT, reported it differently: "General Flynn retires as National Security Adviser"
Misleading headlines are only one part of RT's approach to news, which makes the American government and analysts believe it is just an arm of the Kremlin.
RT, originally Rossiya Segodnya (Russia Today), began broadcasting internationally in 2005 in English, Arabic and Spanish as a subsidiary of RIA Novosti, one of three Russian state-owned news broadcasters.

In the Middle East, your enemy's enemy is your friend.
For Israel, Saudi Arabia's growing willingness to confront Iranian influence in the Middle East presents an opening for an awkward alliance. As the kingdom's dynamic new crown prince, Mohammed bin Salman, tries to rally an anti-Iran coalition, Israel — with the blessing of the Trump administration — is presenting itself as a willing and able partner.
The appetite for cooperation between two of America's closest allies in the Middle East has grown in recent years as their security interests have dovetailed. Both Israel and Saudi Arabia view Iran's growing influence in the region as an existential threat and want to squash militant Islamist groups like ISIS and Iran's main proxy, Hezbollah.
A U.S. official who witnessed a Saudi and Israeli official hold a closed-door meeting together recently said such informal meetings have been taking place for "at least five years."

If world leaders are angry at the United States for rejecting the Paris climate change agreement, few at United Nations climate talks here are openly showing it.
Delegates from the largest industrial countries to the smallest island states are tiptoeing around the single largest topic of discussion here — the American retreat from leadership on climate change and the Trump administration’s moves to undermine domestic global warming policy and international climate diplomacy.
President Emmanuel Macron of France on Wednesday challenged Europe to “replace America” in financing the United Nations climate change science body, though he did not directly criticize President Trump’s decision to eliminate American contributions to it. The German chancellor, Angela Merkel, praised a coalition of American governors and mayors who, in contrast to the White House stance, are still working to reduce their greenhouse gas emissions.
Leaders of other nations, from the island of Nauru to landlocked Niger, barely alluded in public remarks to the new posture of the United States, historically the world’s largest emitter of planet-warming gases and now the only country to reject a global solution to climate change.
A woman accused Minnesota Democratic Sen. Al Franken on Thursday of groping her and kissing her without her consent in 2006 while she was on a USO Tour overseas.
Leeann Tweeden is now a morning news anchor on TalkRadio 790 KABC in Los Angeles and posted her story in a lengthy post on the station's website.
The alleged incidents happened before Franken was elected to the Senate in 2008 and was seated in 2009 following a recount.
Tweeden described the harassment as being part of a script for a USO skit where Franken wrote where he's supposed to kiss her. She writes that Franken repeatedly insisted they rehearse the kissing scene despite her protests. When she relented, Franken, "put his hand on the back of my head, mashed his lips against mine and aggressively stuck his tongue in my mouth."
"Senator Franken, you wrote the script," Tweeden wrote. "But there's nothing funny about sexual assault."

House Republicans are hoping to pass a massive package of corporate and individual tax cuts, holding a final vote on their highly-anticipated tax overhaul plan Thursday afternoon.
The bill would slash the corporate tax rate, cut taxes for individuals and reduce the number of tax brackets.
The president, looking for a major legislative win for the Trump White House, has been urging Republicans to pass tax legislation for months. He is visiting Capitol Hill on Thursday morning in a final lobbying push to House Republicans.
Mr. Trump tweeted in advance of Thursday's vote, saying "tax cuts are getting close!" and blamed Democrats for fighting "massive tax cuts for the middle class and business" citing "obstruction and delay."
Republicans will need 218 votes to pass the bill, and there are 240 GOP lawmakers and 194 Democrats in the House. With the expectation that no Democrats will support this bill, Republicans can afford to lose the support of 22 members.
Thursday's vote is expected to take place around 1:30 p.m. ET. The Senate will also have to vote on its version, and then the two bills, if they both pass, would be reconciled in conference.

Walmart delivered another blockbuster quarter fueled by strong online sales growth and an uptick in its food business. The Arkansas-based company said e-commerce sales surged 50 percent in the fiscal third quarter, while same-store sales were up 2.7 percent.
The world's largest retailer has been pursuing a digitally focused growth strategy for the last
year, which includes an aggressive push into online grocery and increased capital spending on digital supply chain capabilities and in-store technology.
Walmart chief executive Doug McMillon noted that a series of strategic initiatives paid off last quarter, including expanded online grocery pickup, and the launch of mobile express returns. McMillon also highlighted the company's use of aisle-roaming robots to improve out-of-stock issues and price discrepancies in its stores.
McMillon said Walmart's food business posted its strongest performance in quarterly comp sales in almost six years.

The day after returning from his overseas trip, President Trump fired off tweets criticizing CNN and the New York Times, jabbing Democrats for not supporting the GOP’s tax plan and wondering if three UCLA basketball players would thank him for freeing them from jail in China. But he never once discussed the scandal involving Alabama Republican Senate nominee Roy Moore, who now faces a total of nine women alleging inappropriate behavior by him.
After delivering remarks about his trip to Asia, Trump declined to answer reporters’ shouted questions about Moore. “Should Roy Moore resign, Mr. President?” He gave no answer.
While in Asia, Press Secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders issued the official White House response on Moore. “Like most Americans the president believes we cannot allow a mere allegation, in this case one from many years ago, to destroy a person’s life," she told reporters last week aboard Air Force One. "However, the president also believes that if these allegations are true, Judge Moore will do the right thing and step aside."

The US Fish and Wildlife service will remove the ban against importing trophies from elephants killed in Zimbabwe and Zambia back to the US. 
The Obama Administration put the ban in place in 2014 after elephant numbers dropped. 
Hunting advocacy groups cheered the move, while animal rights activists decried it. 
The Trump Administration will remove protections against importing trophies from elephants hunted legally in Zimbabwe into the US, in a reversal of Obama-era policy. 
That means that US hunters will be able to bring the ivory of elephants they have killed back into the US, potentially disrupting the movement to end the global ivory trade. The move also applies to elephants shot and killed in Zambia.
While hunting elephants is legal in a number of African countries — under a strict permitting system where hunters pay high fees for the privilege — the Obama Administration put restrictions on the import of trophies in place in 2014 after the number of elephants dropped. 
African elephants are listed as threatened under the Endangered Species Act, according to the US Fish and Wildlife Service. Under the Act, hunting trophies, like elephant tusks, can only be imported if the federal government finds that killing them will aid the long-term survival of the species. 

Zimbabwe's embattled President Robert Mugabe has been shown in talks with the commander of the country's defense forces, a day after the military seized control of the capital.
Photographs published by the pro-Mugabe Herald newspaper are the first images seen of the veteran leader since he was placed under house arrest Wednesday morning and the military staged an apparent coup. The Herald's editor, Caesar Zvayi, also tweeted the images.
Among the group of people in the photos is a priest, reported earlier to be brokering the talks for a transitional government, and two South African envoys.
Mugabe appears calm in the photos as he talks with army leader Commander General Constantino Chiwenga. The commander warned the President on Monday that the military could intervene after Mugabe dismissed Vice President Emmerson Mnangagwa, triggering the political tumult.

The Old Vic theater here said 20 people have come forward with allegations of inappropriate behavior by the actor Kevin Spacey before and during his time as the theater’s artistic director.
Following accusations of sexual misconduct against the actor, the theater opened an investigation into Mr. Spacey’s 11-year tenure, from 2004 to 2015, and released the conclusions in a report on Thursday. The theater apologized to those affected for “not creating an environment or culture where people felt able to speak freely.”
The report said that only one of the 20 complaints was raised at the time. The theater said that despite processes being in place for reporting such issues, people did not feel able to raise concerns.
The report said of Mr. Spacey: “The investigation found that his stardom and status at the Old Vic may have prevented people, and in particular junior staff or young actors, from feeling that they could speak up or raise a hand for help.”
After the actor Anthony Rapp accused Mr. Spacey of sexual misconduct 31 years ago, when Mr. Rapp was 14, more men came forward with similar allegations. Some of the allegations center on Mr. Spacey’s time at the Old Vic theater, which has been accused of turning a blind eye to them.

Political infighting among Iran’s ruling elite has moved on to a new battleground - the relief effort after an earthquake that killed at least 530 people and injured thousands.
Iran's Supreme Leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei meets with Iranian President Hassan Rouhani and other officials following an earthquake that hit Kermansheh province, in Tehran, Iran November 15, 2017. Hardline media are accusing the government of pragmatist President Hassan Rouhani of reacting too slowly to last weekend’s quake, while highlighting aid work by the Revolutionary Guards - a rival power center.
While the government said enough help had been sent to the thousands of people left homeless by the devastation, media affiliated to Rouhani’s hardline rivals painted a different picture with reports from villages where survivors complained about a lack of shelter from the bitter cold.
Rouhani allies say this reflects a long-running struggle between the president and those who oppose his drive to boost the economy by improving relations with the outside world, notably through sealing a nuclear deal with world powers.

Puerto Rican economists are predicting a bleak future for the storm-ravaged island.
At a panel discussion in San Juan convened Thursday by the territory’s federal oversight board, economist Jose Villamil said the population could decline to less than 3 million by 2026, a drop of more than 400,000 from the most recent count. Another, Juan Lara, said the economy could contract by as much as 15 percent in the fiscal year that ends in June, depending on how long it takes to restore power throughout the island. A third said a conservative estimate of the storm damage is $115 billion -- a sum equal to more than a year’s economic output.
"The board, Congress and local government authorities need to address a more realistic estimate of damages," said economist Heidie Calero, the president of a local consulting firm, who presented the damage number. "Business as usual will not, I repeat will not, come back quickly."
The projections underscore the long and difficult recovery faced by Puerto Rico, whose government was already bankrupt from years of borrowing to stay afloat as the economy and population shrank. One oversight board member said her sense of optimism was rattled by a presenter who said it can take a decade or more for economies to recover from a major typhoon or hurricane.

The clock is beginning to tick faster and louder.
With the recent indictments of Paul Manafort, Rick Gates and George Papadopoulos by special counsel Robert Mueller, it is clear that the Russia investigation’s regular season is over and the playoffs have begun. Judging by the President’s response to this first set of indictments – screaming and yelling at television screens – it is safe to say our President now realizes his bloodhound adversary is smart, clever and relentless.
Anyone paying attention to the ongoing Trump/Russia story knows that the question has never been whether or not Trump colluded with the Russians. It has always been, how can we prove it? To think that it is anything else is to not understand Trump at all. He is constitutionally incapable of not colluding with anybody when it benefits him. The probability that he would take the high road and steer clear when offered an opportunity to conspire with the Russians to defeat Hillary Clinton, is the same as expecting a UFO to land on the roof of the Planetarium.
Keep in mind that Trump never did want nor did he ever expect to win. Hence, being sloppy was not a concern. Unfortunately for Trump he won, and now the trail of breadcrumbs he left in the election’s wake are being meticulously followed. As the evidence mounts, the edges of terror have begun to creep into Trump’s consciousness. The following scenario comes to mind when imagining how this will play out.

Emerson Electric Co. Chief Executive Officer David Farr made a third proposal to buy Rockwell Automation Inc., sweetening the deal by 4.7 percent as he seeks to cobble together a one-stop shop for industrial automation. 
The cash-and-stock offer of $225 a share values Rockwell Automation at about $29 billion. That represents a 30 percent premium to the 90-day volume-weighted average share price as of Oct. 30, Emerson said in a statement Thursday. Rockwell shareholders would own 22 percent of the combined companies.
Emerson is seeking to bolster its offerings by adding the leading supplier of software and controls for assembly-line operations. The would-be acquirer mostly serves the process side of the business, providing software and equipment for products made by combining ingredients, such as chemicals, oil refining, pharmaceuticals and beverages.
“The industrial logic for this combination is clear,” Farr said in a letter to Rockwell Automation CEO Blake Moret. “By leveraging the key technology platforms that are the strengths of Emerson and Rockwell, we can create an industry leader with unmatched capabilities that integrates all aspects of the automation system for a global customer base.”

Tesla plans to reveal an electric commercial truck on Thursday night, which CEO Elon Musk said will "blow your mind out of your skull and into an alternate dimension."
That dimension would best be one where electric trucks can compete with diesel, say a number of analysts.
The three main boxes the truck will have to check are range, payload, and price, said Seaport Global analyst Kevin Sterling. How the Tesla semi compares with diesel on each of these metrics won't be known at least until Tesla unveils its truck at 11 p.m. Eastern Time.
But other electric trucks and buses brought to market so far tend to have lower range and higher prices, Stifel analyst Michael Baudendistel told CNBC in an interview. The demand for electric trucks among long haul carriers just isn't there, he said.
"It is hard to make a business case for electric trucks," Baudendistel said.

A workhorse truck and a new super car are in the works for Tesla, after founder and CEO Elon Musk introduced his company's latest effort to widen the U.S. market for electric vehicles Thursday night. Musk called the Roadster "the fastest production car ever made, period."
Musk unveiled the Roadster toward the end of an event that was supposed to be all about Tesla's new Semi trucks. Taking a page from Apple and other tech companies in using showmanship to wow crowds, Musk surprised the crowd by announcing there was one more thing to add — and the new car rolled out of the truck's trailer.
After touting the utility and efficiency of what he called a game-changing truck, Musk welcomed the Roadster to cheers from those attending the event at the Hawthorne Municipal Airport near Los Angeles.
Both vehicles are fast: The Roadster can take itself from zero to 60 mph in 1.9 seconds, and the Semi can perform the same feat in 5 seconds (unburdened by a trailer), Tesla says.

While President Donald Trump was overseas, he urged on congressional Republicans who were forging ahead with their tax plans. 
"I am proud of the Republican House and Senate for working so hard on cutting taxes and reform," Trump tweeted Nov. 13. "We’re getting close! Now, how about ending the unfair and highly unpopular Individual Mandate in Obamacare and reducing taxes even further? Cut top rate to 35 percent with all of the rest going to middle income cuts?"
From Trump's tweet to the Senate Republicans' ears, apparently.  Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell, R-Ky., emerged from a closed-door Republican caucus meeting Nov. 14 saying, "We’re optimistic that inserting the individual mandate repeal would be helpful." The Congressional Budget Office estimated that repeal would reduce deficits by more than $300 billion over 10 years, although about 13 million fewer people would not have health insurance.
The health care law’s requirement that most people have coverage has long stuck in Trump’s throat.

THERE WAS A PAUSE. It was Aug. 9, inside Roger Goodell's sixth-floor office at the NFL's Park Avenue headquarters in New York City -- down the hall, past the executives' offices and his assistant's desk, and through a large, thick wooden door that is both imposing and usually left open to serve as a welcome. Goodell huddled over a speakerphone with general counsel Jeff Pash. On the other end was Jerry Jones. Adhering to the protocol of giving owners a 48-hour heads-up before a major disciplinary issue involving their team is announced, Goodell and Pash informed Jones that after a 13-month domestic violence inquiry, the Dallas Cowboys' star running back, Ezekiel Elliott, would face punishment -- a six-game suspension.
The line went quiet. Seconds passed. Goodell's decision was an unconscionable violation of trust, Jones later told associates, because he believed that the commissioner had assured him this past spring that there would be no suspension. Jones saw in Elliott a genuine opportunity, a player so good that he had made Jones believe that this year he just might win a Super Bowl for the first time since 1996. His anger was palpable. Finally, according to sources with direct knowledge of the call, Jones broke the silence. He aimed his words not only at Goodell's decision but also at his role as judge, jury and executioner in the case.
"I'm gonna come after you with everything I have," Jones said. Then he mentioned Deflategate. "If you think Bob Kraft came after you hard, Bob Kraft is a p---y compared to what I'm going to do."

Senator Kirsten Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, who holds Hillary Clinton’s former seat, said on Thursday that Bill Clinton should have resigned the presidency after his inappropriate relationship with an intern came to light nearly 20 years ago.
Asked directly if she believed Mr. Clinton should have stepped down at the time, Ms. Gillibrand took a long pause and said, “Yes, I think that is the appropriate response.”
But she also appeared to signal that what is currently considered a fireable offense may have been more often overlooked during the Clinton era.
“Things have changed today, and I think under those circumstances there should be a very different reaction,” Ms. Gillibrand said. “And I think in light of this conversation, we should have a very different conversation about President Trump, and a very different conversation about allegations against him.”

In December of 2006, I embarked on my ninth USO Tour to entertain our troops, my eighth to the Middle East since the 9/11 attacks. My father served in Vietnam and my then-boyfriend (and now husband, Chris) is a pilot in the Air Force, so bringing a ‘little piece of home’ to servicemembers stationed far away from their families was both my passion and my privilege.
Also on the trip were country music artists Darryl Worley, Mark Wills, Keni Thomas, and some cheerleaders from the Dallas Cowboys. The headliner was comedian and now-senator, Al Franken.
Franken had written some skits for the show and brought props and costumes to go along with them. Like many USO shows before and since, the skits were full of sexual innuendo geared toward a young, male audience.
As a TV host and sports broadcaster, as well as a model familiar to the audience from the covers of FHM, Maxim and Playboy, I was only expecting to emcee and introduce the acts, but Franken said he had written a part for me that he thought would be funny, and I agreed to play along.

Dozens of neighbors rushed to the scene of a massive fire that injured at least 20 people at a Pennsylvania senior living community late, wrapping elderly people in blankets and transporting them to ambulances.
Larry Kingsland, 62, said Friday he and scores of people who live around the Barclay Friends Senior Living Community ferried elderly residents to medics as firefighters rescued them from the blaze.
"Everyone saw how devastating the fire was and we all had the same reaction: that people needed help," he said of the late Thursday inferno in West Chester, about 35 miles (56 kilometers) west of Philadelphia. "The whole neighborhood was helping."
Firefighters were still dousing smoldering hot spots on what remains of the building late morning Friday. The fire was declared under control just before 1:30 a.m. An investigation into what caused the blaze is underway, a town fire chief said.
The fire quickly spread to multiple buildings, engulfing sections within minutes; flames could be seen shooting from the roofs and windows of the structures.
Many of the residents were pushed in wheelchairs or rolled on beds to safety, said Dina Ciccarone, another neighbor who helped move people away from the fire and into safety. In some cases, she said, people used blankets as makeshift gurneys to assist in the rescue effort.

For seven years, Angela Merkel has topped Forbes magazine's list of the most powerful women in the world. In the wake of populism's rise in European and U.S. politics, she's seen by many as a vital pillar of Western values and multilateralism.
But the 63-year-old chancellor of Germany could soon lose her job if she fails to form a new government.
That prospect is growing, even as the four political parties she needs for a governing coalition agreed early Friday to try one last time to overcome their seemingly insurmountable differences in the coming days.
"I think it's 'Jamaica' or it's over," warned commentator Nico Fried of the daily Sueddeutsche Zeitung, referring to the nickname Germans have given the would-be coalition, whose parties' black, yellow and green colors match those of the Caribbean nation's flag. "This could be the end of Angela Merkel."
Among the key sticking points is how Germany plans to mitigate climate change, like whether to cut back on coal use, which accounts for 40 percent of German electrical power. Or whether to allow certain categories of refugees who've been granted asylum in Germany to send for their relatives, which officials estimate would amount to 150,000 to 180,000 people. Proponents say refugees can't integrate into German society if they are forced to leave their families behind, while opponents argue Germany is already overwhelmed by asylum seekers.

A North Korean soldier who was shot while fleeing across the border has an extremely high level of parasites in his intestines, his doctors say.
The defector crossed the demilitarised zone on Monday, but was shot several times by North Korean border guards.
Doctors say the patient is stable - but "an enormous number" of worms in his body are contaminating his wounds and making his situation worse.
His condition is thought to give a rare insight into life in North Korea.
"I've never seen anything like this in my 20 years as a physician," South Korean doctor Lee Cook-jong told journalists, explaining that the longest worm removed from the patient's intestines was 27cm (11in) long.
What does it tell us about N Korea's standards of health?
"North Korea is a very poor country and like any other poor country it has serious health problems," Prof Andrei Lankov of Kookmin University in Seoul told the BBC.
"North Korea does not have the resources to have a modern medical system," he says. "Its doctors are relatively poorly trained and have to work with primitive equipment."

A visit by Zimbabwean army commander Constantino Chiwenga to China would not normally be seen as unusual, given Beijing's status as Zimbabwe's largest foreign investor and longtime ally.
But days after Chiwenga returned from a recent trip to meet senior Chinese military leaders, Harare was plunged into political chaos as the Zimbabwean military -- led by Chiwenga -- seized control and placed President Robert Mugabe under house arrest.
In that context, Chiwenga's visit to China has come under scrutiny, with speculation that had sought Beijing's tacit approval for a possible move against Mugabe.
China's involvement in Zimbabwe stretches back to the 1970s, when Beijing covertly supplied ammunition and financing to Mugabe's guerrilla forces during the country's war of independence. In the intervening years, China has continued to provide financial and political support to the African nation, investing extensively across a range of sectors and helping to develop key infrastructure projects.
"Since Mugabe took power he has been consistently supported by the Chinese government. China has become the second largest trading partner with Zimbabwe and has invested very largely in the country," said Wang Xinsong, associate professor at Beijing Normal University School of Social Development and Public Policy. China would be very reluctant to see Zimbabwe fall into a period of social instability and political turmoil, he added.

Raqqa, the de facto capital of the Islamic State, is taken and in ruins.
U.S. troops and civilian aid workers are in the Syrian city, helping local officials restore basic services such as food, water and electricity.
But the recapture of ISIS-held territory in Iraq and Syria is only a partial win for U.S. policy. After seven years of civil war, the regime of Syrian President Bashar Assad remains in power. The other U.S. objectives — the end of Assad, a new Syrian constitution and democratic elections — remain unfulfilled.
Despite the defeat of ISIS, Defense Secretary James Mattis told reporters this week that U.S. forces will remain in Syria.
The intention, he said, is to prevent the appearance of "ISIS 2.0."
There are hundreds of U.S. troops in Syria. Pentagon officials say the U.S. is on solid legal ground to be there because the U.N. Security Council endorsed the anti-ISIS mission. But Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov says the U.S. presence is "illegitimate."

The Naval Air Station Whidbey Island in Washington admitted one of its aircraft was involved in drawing lewd images in the sky Thursday.
Residents of Okanogan County, Wash., sent photos of the obscene skywritings to KREM. The photos resembled a phallic symbol.
One woman told KREM that she was “upset” and was unsure how to describe the drawings to her young children.
Officials from the Naval Air Station Whidbey Island told KREM in a statement that the drawings were “absolutely unacceptable.”
"The Navy holds its aircrew to the highest standards and we find this absolutely unacceptable, of zero training value and we are holding the crew accountable,” Navy officials told KREM.
The Federal Aviation Administration told KREM that the graphic drawings did not pose a safety risk and there was nothing it “could do about it.”

A married teacher in Oklahoma was arrested Wednesday and accused of having a sexual relationship with an underage student, KWTV reported.
Hunter Day, 22, who teaches science at Yukon High School, was arrested by the Canadian County Sheriff’s Department on complaints of second-degree rape, facilitating sexual contact with a minor and possession of child pornography, KWTV reported. She is reportedly married to the school’s football coach.
The sheriff’s office said the investigation began when they were reportedly contacted by the boy’s parents. The boy’s cell phone allegedly contained explicit text messages and nude photographs, the sheriff’s office told KWTV. Authorities did not reveal the age of the boy, except to note that he was underage.
“This is a classic case of a serious breach of public trust. School teachers are entrusted to protect and educate our children, not to engage in an unlawful sexual relationship with them,” Canadian County Sheriff Chris West said.
Investigators said Day and the boy had arranged a meeting on the day of the arrest, KWTV reported. When deputies arrived at the home, they sent Day a text message from the boy’s phone, saying, “I’m here.” Day allegedly responded, “The doors [sic] unlocked as usual.”

Rev. Jamie Johnson resigned Thursday as the head of faith-based and neighborhood partnerships at the Department of Homeland Security after a CNN KFile report revealed inflammatory past comments he made about the black community and Islam.
In past radio appearances, Johnson had said the black community was responsible for turning major US cities into "slums" and argued that Islam's only contribution to society was "oil and dead bodies."
DHS Press secretary Tyler Houlton confirmed the resignation, which was first reported by The Hill, to CNN in a statement.
"Acting Secretary Duke has accepted Rev. Jamie Johnson's resignation as Director of the Center for Faith-Based & Neighborhood Partnerships at DHS. His comments made prior to joining the Department of Homeland Security clearly do not reflect the values of DHS and the administration. The Department thanks him for his recent work assisting disaster victims and the interfaith community," Houlton said.
Prior to his resignation, Johnson apologized for his comments, telling CNN earlier Thursday: "I regret the manner in which those thoughts were expressed in the past, but can say unequivocally that they do not represent my views personally or professionally."

Malcolm Young, guitarist and co-founder of AC/DC, died Saturday at the age of 64. Young had been suffering with dementia for the past three years, an illness that forced his retirement from the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame-inducted band he founded with his brother Angus Young in 1973.
"Today it is with deep heartfelt sadness that AC/DC has to announce the passing of Malcolm Young," AC/DC wrote in a statement.
"Malcolm, along with Angus, was the founder and creator of AC/DC. With enormous dedication and commitment he was the driving force behind the band. As a guitarist, songwriter and visionary he was a perfectionist and a unique man. He always stuck to his guns and did and said exactly what he wanted. He took great pride in all that he endeavored. His loyalty to the fans was unsurpassed."
Angus Young added, "As his brother it is hard to express in words what he has meant to me during my life, the bond we had was unique and very special. He leaves behind an enormous legacy that will live on forever. Malcolm, job well done."
The Young brothers lost their older brother George Young, the Easybeats guitarist and AC/DC's longtime producer, in October at the age of 70.
In an additional statement from Malcolm Young's family, the band said that Malcolm Young died peacefully Saturday with his family by his side.

Tens of thousands of Zimbabweans gathered in the capital on Saturday, hooting, whistling and hugging soldiers as they called for President Robert Mugabe to give up power, days after a military takeover placed him under house arrest.
In scenes perhaps unthinkable only months ago, people marched side by side with members of the military — who rode armed tanks — and the protesters hailed the Army as setting them free from Mr. Mugabe’s 37-year autocratic rule.
“Mugabe must go, and his goons must leave. We have been victimized by Mugabe for too long,” said Nigel Mukwena, a 24-year-old student of political science at the University of Zimbabwe.
Others took selfies of the military at the rally, which converged on Zimbabwe Grounds, known as the site of addresses by Mr. Mugabe and other icons of the nation’s liberation. The scenes, and the celebratory air, were a seminal shift for the country’s 93-year-old leader — Africa’s oldest.
Brezhnev Malaba, assistant editor of The Zimbabwe Independent newspaper, tweeted in the early hours of the march: “There are decades in which nothing happens; and then, suddenly, there are days in which whole decades happen. Zimbabwe is at that moment. Astonishing scenes here in Harare.”

Tensions over class warfare and whether GOP tax plans help the rich over the middle class and poor are building in Congress as Republicans march forward with their legislation.
Democrats have been forcefully and repeatedly arguing that the GOP wants to cut taxes for wealthy individuals and corporations at the expense of everyone else. Republicans, annoyed with the attacks, have pushed back, saying their focus is on the middle class.
The issue came to a head late Thursday with an eruption from Senate Finance Committee Chairman Orrin Hatch (R-Utah) toward the end of a grueling four-day markup of the chamber’s bill.
The 83-year-old chairman blew up after Sen. Sherrod Brown (D-Ohio) argued that the bill is geared toward the rich.
“I come from the poor people, and I’ve been here working my whole stinking career for people who don’t have a chance,” said Hatch, who was first elected to the Senate in 1976 and is battling rumors that this will be his final term. “And I really resent anybody saying that I’m just doing this for the rich. Give me a break.”
“I think you guys overplay that all the time and it gets old, and frankly you ought to quit it,” he said in a moment that quickly went viral.

An Argentine navy submarine with 44 crew members has been missing for three days after the navy lost contact with it off the country's Atlantic coast, the military service says.
The ARA San Juan submarine was last spotted Wednesday in the San Jorge Gulf, a few hundred kilometers off the coast of southern Argentina's Patagonia region, the navy said.
Crews are searching for the vessel by air and sea, navy spokesman Enrique Balbi told reporters Friday.
The submarine had been traveling from a base in far southern Argentina's Tierra del Fuego archipelago to its home base in Mar del Plata, a city hundreds of miles to the northeast. The sub's last known location in the San Jorge Gulf is nearly midway between the bases.
The vessel had been due to arrive at its destination Sunday.
Officials hope the crew would bring the sub to the surface, if possible, Balbi said.
"The submarine knows that if it does not have communication with land for this long, it has to surface," Balbi said.

Look! Up in the sky!
It’s a bird.
It’s a plane.
No, it’s a phallic skydrawing, and a military aircraft is the culprit.
Okanogan residents told The Spokesman-Review that they saw the male genitalia deliberately being drawn in the skies above their town by a jet around noon Thursday.
Images of the drawing were quickly posted to social media, residents said, and sent around town through text message.
The Naval Air Station in Whidbey Island has claimed responsibility for the drawing, calling it “unacceptable” and “of zero training value.”
The base’s public affairs office on Friday referred questions to the Navy’s Pacific Fleet headquarters in San Diego, where Lt. Cmdr. Leslie Hubbell said the crew involved in the sky-drawing would be held accountable.
Hubbell said an investigation has been launched, although it’s not clear who in the chain of command will make the final decision on disciplinary action. She declined to speculate on whether the crew members involved could be discharged.
Hubbell said the aircraft involved was an EA-18G Growler from the VAQ-130 Electronic Attack Squadron based at Whidbey Island, on a “routine training” flight. The highly maneuverable plane is a cousin of the F/A-18 Super Hornet, outiftted with radar and communication jamming equipment.

The director of Puerto Rico's power company resigned on Friday amid ongoing blackouts and scrutiny of a contract awarded to a small Montana-based company to help rebuild the electric grid destroyed by Hurricane Maria.
Puerto Rico's Electric Power Authority said Ricardo Ramos presented his letter of resignation to the company's board effective immediately. Ramos said in a brief video posted on Twitter Friday evening that it was a very personal decision and that it had nothing to do with any issues covered by the media.
"The focus has to remain on restoring the electrical system," he said as he thanked his power company crews and those that had arrived from New York and Florida.
Gov. Ricardo Rossello briefly told reporters that Ramos is a professional who worked hard to bring power back to Puerto Rico, but that "there were a series of distractions, and a decision was taken to go in another direction."
Try NEW PAM Spray Pump the next time you want your omelet to come out perfectly. With 1 gram of fat and 10 calories per serving it helps you avoid all those extra calories from cooking with too much butter and oil. Plus, it has the superior non-stick you love.
"That resignation was taken ... in the best interest of the people of Puerto Rico," he said.
Hours after the resignation, Rossello recommended that the board appoint Justo Gonzalez, the company's power generation director, as interim director.

A North Korean soldier’s bold attempt to defect by crossing the heavily guarded border with South Korea galvanized attention this week.
But perhaps more surprising was the disclosure by surgeons struggling to save his life of what they found while repairing his intestinal wounds: dozens of parasitic worms, some as long as 11 inches.
“In my 20 years as a surgeon, I have only seen something like this in a medical textbook,” said Dr. Lee Cook-jong, a lead surgeon.
The discovery opened a window on the dire conditions in North Korea, including poor hygiene and nutrition. The news shocked many people in prosperous South Korea.
Surgeons raced to save the North Korean soldier, whose name and rank have not been released, who sustained serious bullet wounds racing across the border while his own troops fired on him.
“We have found dozens of fully grown parasitic worms in his damaged intestines,’’ said Dr. Lee Cook-jong, a lead surgeon. “It was a serious parasitic infection.”
During a news briefing this week, Dr. Lee showed photographs of worms as long as 10 or 11 inches.

In a surprising reversal, President Donald Trump announced on Friday night that he would halt plans to allow elephant trophies from two African nations to be imported to the U.S, pending a review.
"Put big game trophy decision on hold until such time as I review all conservation facts. Under study for years. Will update soon with Secretary Zinke. Thank you!" Trump tweeted.
In a statement later on Friday night, Interior Secretary Ryan Zinke said he spoke with Trump and they decided "that conservation & healthy herds are critical."
"As a result, in a manner compliant with all applicable laws, rules and regulations, the issuing of permits is being put on hold as the decision is being removed," Zinke's statement continued.

Lebanon’s absent prime minister arrived in France on Saturday morning after two weeks in Saudi Arabia, a mysterious stay that touched off intense speculation that he was being held against his will.
The prime minister, Saad Hariri, who has not publicly explained the nature of his stay in Saudi Arabia, met with the French president, Emmanuel Macron, for lunch at the Élysée Palace and confirmed that he would travel to Beirut later in the week.
The meeting with Mr. Macron came hours after a phone call between Mr. Macon and the Lebanese president, Michel Aoun, the French president’s office said. Officials said that Mr. Aoun had thanked Mr. Macron for “France’s actions in favor of Lebanon” and confirmed that Mr. Hariri would be in Beirut for Lebanon’s Independence Day holiday, which is Wednesday.
Mr. Hariri later said in short statements to the news media that he would announce his position on the crisis in his country after holding talks with Mr. Aoun, according to Reuters. He thanked France for the “positive political role” it was playing in the Middle East.
“With regard to the political situation in Lebanon, I will go to Beirut in the coming days, I will participate in the independence celebrations, and it is there that I will make known my position on these subjects after meeting President Aoun,” Mr. Hariri was quoted as saying.

Do you remember coming home from school to tell your mother or father another kid had been nasty to you in the playground? And all you wanted was to be his friend?
Then spare a thought for Donald Trump, who was going through the same troubles with a moody young pal from North Korea as his tour of Asia came to an end last weekend.
“Why would Kim Jong-un insult me by calling me ‘old’, when I would NEVER call him ‘short and fat?’” Trump asked his mommy – I mean, his 42.9 million Twitter followers. “Oh well,” he added poignantly, “I try so hard to be his friend – and maybe someday that will happen!”
Analysis Tracking Trump: mood swings in Asia and election struggles at home
The US president’s comments wavered from aggressive to conciliatory as he visited South Korea, Japan and China – and finally made a stop in Vietnam
Poor Donald. Maybe get some sleep. This has been a long trip and you’ve had to deal with some difficult geopolitical issues. Things never seem quite as bad in the morning. I’m sure Kim just wants to be your friend, too. He has a funny way of showing it, that’s all.

A manhunt was underway in western Pennsylvania early Saturday for a suspect in the fatal shooting of a rookie police officer Friday night in a town outside Pittsburgh.
The suspect is considered armed and dangerous, authorities said.
Officer Brian Shaw had been with the New Kensington, Pa., police department for less than a year, police Chief Jim Klein said at a news conference, the Pittsburgh Post-Gazette reported.
"I'm asking anybody with any information, as minute as they think it might be, please, please give us a call. We need to find the person who did this," Klein said, Pittsburgh's WTAE-TV reported.
Meanwhile, authorities located a brown, older model Jeep Grand Cherokee that had been sought in connection with the slaying, police said.
Residents of the neighborhood where the shooting took place said they’d experienced some recent trouble in the community, with one resident telling the Post-Gazette about a methamphetamine lab bust that occurred last week just down the block.
Gileyla Jones, 17, told the Post-Gazette she “knew something bad must have happened” when multiple police cars sped past her on her way home.

A senior Russian official who claimed to be acting at the behest of President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia tried in May 2016 to arrange a meeting between Mr. Putin and Donald J. Trump, according to several people familiar with the matter.
The news of this reached the Trump campaign in a very circuitous way. An advocate for Christian causes emailed campaign aides saying that Alexander Torshin, the deputy governor of the Russian central bank who has been linked both to Russia’s security services and organized crime, had proposed a meeting between Mr. Putin and Mr. Trump. The subject line of the email, turned over to Senate investigators, read, “Russian backdoor overture and dinner invite,” according to one person who has seen the message.
The proposal made its way to the senior levels of the Trump campaign before Jared Kushner, the president’s son-in-law and a top campaign aide, sent a message to top campaign officials rejecting it, according to two people who have seen Mr. Kushner’s message.
Though the meeting never happened, Mr. Torshin’s request is the latest example of how the Russian government intensified its effort to contact and influence the Trump campaign last year as Mr. Trump was closing in on the Republican presidential nomination. It came just weeks after a self-described intermediary for the Russian government told a Trump campaign aide, George Papadopoulos, that the Russians had “dirt” on Mr. Trump’s rival, Hillary Clinton, in the form of “thousands of emails.”
Soon after Mr. Torshin’s outreach fizzled, Donald Trump Jr., the president’s eldest son, arranged a meeting at Trump Tower after being told that a Russian lawyer with ties to the Kremlin would bring damaging information about Mrs. Clinton to the meeting.

President Robert Mugabe’s own party voted to oust him as its leader on Sunday, a day after thousands of Zimbabweans took to the streets to celebrate his stunning fall from power after a military takeover.
The governing ZANU-PF party, which held emergency talks at its headquarters in the capital, Harare, to consider the fate of the president who had ruled for 37 years, appointed the previously fired vice president, Emmerson Mnangagwa, as Mr. Mugabe’s successor.
Under the Constitution, Mr. Mugabe remains president, even if in name only. But if he does not resign by noon Monday, the committee members decided, he would face impeachment by Parliament.
Cheers and dancing broke out in the building after the vote, according to video shared on social media.
Before the committee’s decision, Chris Mutsvangwa, a war veteran who has led the campaign to oust Mr. Mugabe, said as he went into the meeting, “We are going all the way,” according to Reuters.
He said that Mr. Mugabe should just resign and leave the country: “He’s trying to bargain for a dignified exit but he should just smell the coffee.”

It's hard to overstate how thoroughly the U.S. military has prepared for doomsday — the day America gets into a nuclear shooting war.
No detail seems to have been overlooked. There's even a designated "safe escape" door at the nuclear-warfighting headquarters near Omaha, Nebraska, through which the four-star commander would rush to a getaway plane moments before the first bomb hit.
Procedures are in place for ensuring U.S. nuclear weapons are ready for a presidential launch order in response to — or in anticipation of — a nuclear attack by North Korea or anyone else. There are backup procedures and backups for the backups.
And yet fundamental aspects of this nightmare sequence remain a mystery.
For example, what would happen if an American president ordered a nuclear strike, for whatever reason, and the four-star general at Strategic Command balked or refused, believing it to be illegal?

Argentine authorities received a few blips of hope in their effort to find a three-decade old submarine — and 44 crew members — that suddenly stopped communicating during a routine mission on Wednesday.
That hope came in the form of seven signals to a satellite, which defense officials believe may have been attempts to communicate. Contact wasn’t made and nothing was transmitted, but the signals, if from the sub, are the first signs of life from the ARA San Juan.
“We received seven satellite calls that likely came from the submarine San Juan. We are working hard to locate it,”

LaToya Cantrell, a City Council member who first gained a political following as she worked to help her hard-hit neighborhood recover from Hurricane Katrina, won a historic election Saturday that made her the first woman mayor of New Orleans.
The Democrat will succeed term-limited fellow Democrat Mitch Landrieu as the city celebrates its 300th anniversary next year.
“Almost 300 years, my friends. And New Orleans, we’re still making history,” Cantrell told a cheering crowd in her victory speech.
The leader in most polls before the runoff election, she never trailed as votes were counted.
Her opponent, former municipal Judge Desiree Charbonnet, conceded the race and congratulated Cantrell late Saturday. Later, complete returns showed Cantrell with 60 percent of the vote.
“I do not regret one moment of anything about this campaign,” Charbonnet said.
The two women led a field of 18 candidates in an October general election to win runoff spots.

A Republican tax plan has passed the House, but obstacles remain in the Senate. One of those obstacles: The plan appears to be not just unpopular, but also distinctively — almost historically — unpopular.
My fellow George Washington University political scientist Chris Warshaw compiled public polls capturing support for major legislation dating back almost 30 years. Here’s what he found:
On average, only about 30 percent of Americans support the tax plan. This is lower than support for almost any of these legislative initiatives. The only thing that was less popular was … the Republican health-care...

Embattled Senate candidate Roy Moore is pinning his hopes for victory on Alabama’s long-held tradition of sharp defiance to perceived threats from forces outside the state.
That rebellious spirit, which dates to long before the state’s segregationist Gov. George Wallace became a national figure in the 1960s by railing against the “central government” in Washington, has been apparent in recent days as top state GOP officials have closed ranks around Moore amid a stream of allegations of sexual misconduct against the Republican and calls by national party leaders for him to step aside.

When Britain's 21-year-old Princess Elizabeth married 26-year-old Lieutenant Philip Mountbatten at Westminster Abbey in 1947, the wedding sparked joy and celebration in a country just recovering from World War II.
Seven decades on, the couple who would become Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip - now 91 and 96, respectively - are still going strong, their marriage a bedrock in British public life amid a world of change.
On Monday, they mark their 70th wedding anniversary, though officials say the milestone will be celebrated privately and no public events are planned. The royal family is reportedly marking the date with a gathering at Windsor Castle.
The queen is the first monarch in British history to celebrate a platinum wedding anniversary.
At their 50th wedding anniversary, Elizabeth praised her husband as "quite simply... my strength and stay all these years."
Elizabeth first met Philip, a naval officer and the son of Prince Andrew of Greece, as they attended the wedding of Philip's cousin in 1934.
The pair wed at Westminster Abbey in London on Nov. 20, 1947. It would be nearly another six years before Elizabeth would be crowned as monarch, also at Westminster Abbey.

The Palestinians threatened on Saturday to suspend all communication with the United States if the Trump administration follows through with plans to close their diplomatic office in Washington. The potential rupture in relations threatens to undermine President Donald Trump’s bid for Mideast peace — a mission he has handed his son-in-law, Jared Kushner.
Senior Palestinian negotiator Saeb Erekat said the U.S. decision was “very unfortunate and unacceptable,” and accused Washington of bowing to pressure from Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu’s government “at a time when we are trying to cooperate to achieve the ultimate deal.”

A special envoy from President Xi Jinping of China discussed regional and mutual concerns with senior North Korean officials in Pyongyang on Saturday, the North’s state media said.
The trip by the special envoy, Song Tao, to the North Korean capital came as the Trump administration pressed Mr. Xi to help restrain North Korea’s nuclear and missile programs by exerting China’s economic leverage over its impoverished neighbor.
“The two sides exchanged their views on such matters of mutual concern as the situation of the Korean Peninsula and region and bilateral relations,” the North’s official Korean Central News Agency said, without offering further details on Mr. Song’s discussions with Ri Su-yong, a top North Korean foreign relations official.
During his visit, Mr. Song was widely expected to try to ease the standoff over North Korea’s nuclear weapons and missile programs.
Relations between the two neighboring communist countries have shown signs of fraying in recent years as North Korea stepped up its missile and nuclear tests, and China supported American-led efforts to impose increasingly tougher sanctions against the North.

Why was Piglet staring down the toilet? He was looking for Pooh. Today, November 19th is Toilet Day. Urine for a treat. So what should we all do to celebrate? Spend a penny.
Go to the jax, the john, the loo, the crapper, the lav, the WC. Use the facilities, the bathroom, the restroom, the washroom, the little girls’/boys’ room (if we’re going to be more decorous and euphemistic, using the name of the room so no one has to contemplate bodily functions). Take a pee, a slash, a leak, a widdle. Number one and number two. Go on, go on, go on.
We prefer the loo or the toilet, the Brits like the lavatory, the French have the double-vee-cee, the Americans use the restroom.
You could get a thesis out of the social constructs around the terminology for basic functions, and what the degree of openness or euphemism says about various societies.

An anti-LGBT Ohio lawmaker who resigned this week over “inappropriate behavior” with another man at his legislative office had a history of aggressively pursuing gay men during his time in Washington D.C.
The revelations are a stark contrast to the conservative beliefs — like marriage only occurring between a man and a woman — that state Rep. Wesley Goodman touted in his public life.
Goodman, a former congressional staffer who also worked for conservative groups, was “all over Craigslist,” Chris Donnelly, who posted ads on the classifieds site, told Cleveland.com.
Donnelly, also a Republican congressional aide, said Goodman replied to one of his posts and they had a sexual rendezvous in 2008. He showed the news site emails from an account using the name Brad Murphey — a “straight/curious” man who needed to keep things quiet.

Charles Manson -- the man who masterminded one of the most heinous murder sprees in American history -- is dead  ... this according to the sister of his famous victim.
Debra Tate tells TMZ she received a call from the prison telling her Manson died 8:13 PM Sunday.
We're told the prison is contacting all of the victims' families.
Manson died of natural causes, according to prison officials.
Manson was recently wheeled into Bakersfield hospital and escorted by 5 uniformed cops. Our sources had said at the time, "It's just a matter of time." He was covered in blankets and looked ashen in the gurney.
TMZ broke the story ... Manson was taken from Corcoran State Prison to the hospital back in January where he was being treated for intestinal bleeding.
As we reported ... Manson was supposed to undergo surgery but it was deemed too risky.
Manson has been locked up since his arrest in December 1969 for the Tate-LaBianca murders. He was convicted of conspiracy to commit the slayings, which occurred one day after the next in August 1969.
Manson was not present, but members of the so-called Manson Family slaughtered 5 people, including actress Sharon Tate, at her home in the Beverly Hills area. Manson's goal was to start a race war he called "helter skelter" ... from the Beatles song.
The night after the Tate murders, members of the family randomly murdered Leno and Rosemary LaBianca. In all, the family inflicted 169 stab wounds and 7 gunshot wounds.
Manson got the death penalty in 1971, but when that was ruled unconstitutional ... it was changed to 9 consecutive life sentences.
Manson was 83.

Authorities were searching southwest Texas for suspects or witnesses after a U.S. Border Patrol agent was killed and his partner injured Sunday while on patrol in the state’s Big Bend area, officials said.
Agent Rogelio Martinez and his partner were “responding to activity” near Interstate 10 in Van Horn, Tex., when both were seriously injured, according to a Customs and Border Protection news release.
Martinez’s partner called for help. Other agents arrived, provided medical care and took them to a hospital.
Martinez died of his injuries; his partner, who was not identified, remained in the hospital in serious condition, officials said.

Marshawn Lynch — as he’s done for the duration of the NFL season — sat for the national anthem prior to the Raiders’ game against the Patriots in Mexico City.
However, Lynch stood for the Mexican national anthem.
Lynch initially sat for the anthem in his first preseason game back since coming out of retirement. He followed in the footsteps of Colin Kaepernick, who started sitting for the anthem, before ultimately taking a knee for the duration of the 2016 season.
He was supportive of Kaepernick’s movement in an appearance on Conan in Sept. 2016:
“I’d rather see him take a knee than stand up, put his hands up, and get murdered,” Lynch said. “So, I mean, my take on it is [expletive]’s got to start somewhere, and if that was the starting point — I just hope people open up their eyes to see there’s really a problem going on, and something needs to be done for it to stop. And I mean, if you’re really not racist, then you’re going to see what he’s done, what he’s doing, [not] as a threat to America, but just addressing a problem that we have.”
Players who have taken a knee or sat during the national anthem the past two seasons have done so to protest police brutality and systemic injustices against people of color in the United States.
That’s why Lynch stood for the Mexican national anthem. He’s not a citizen of that nation, and has nothing to protest as far as what goes on within their country.

A day after Zimbabwean President Robert Mugabe defied the nation’s calls to resign, lawmakers here frantically searched on Monday for a legal path to dismiss the long-ruling leader.
Parliamentarians met in the afternoon to begin impeachment proceedings, even as questions were raised about the viability of the process. Impeaching Mugabe could take weeks, and would require forming a broad coalition from the country’s fragmented opposition.
“We are going to take the impeachment route,” said Lovemore Matuke, the parliament’s chief whip.

A woman who says Alabama Senate candidate Roy Moore abused her when she was a 14-year-old girl has described the alleged encounter.
Leigh Corfman told NBC News that Mr Moore, then a 32-year-old prosecutor, "seduced" her at his house in 1979.
Several Alabama newspapers have endorsed Mr Moore's Democratic opponent, a remarkable step in such a staunchly Republican state.
Mr Moore, who denies the allegation, is currently lagging in opinion polls.
Most of the Republican establishment has lined up against the 70-year-old former Alabama supreme court judge and firebrand Christian conservative, whom they did not want elected in the first place.
Things Republican Roy Moore believes
Ms Corfman originally told the Washington Post how she was approached by Mr Moore outside a courthouse in Etowah County in 1979.
She had been sitting with her mother on a bench awaiting a child custody hearing in her parents' divorce case.

A report from Politico this week, which found that the special counsel Robert Mueller is gearing up to interview the White House communications director, Hope Hicks, indicates that a significant part of the Russia investigation is probably moving into its final stages.
Hicks has long been one of President Donald Trump's most trusted advisers, and she was present during some events that are key to the special counsel's investigation.
Mueller's investigation includes multiple components. In addition to looking into whether members of the Trump campaign colluded with Moscow to tilt the 2016 election in Trump's favor, the special counsel is also investigating Trump on suspicion of obstruction of justice related to his decision to fire James Comey as FBI director.
As part of that investigation, ABC News reported on Sunday, Mueller has asked the Department of Justice for all emails connected to Comey's firing.
Mueller has also requested documents related to Attorney General Jeff Sessions' recusal from the Russia investigation. Sessions announced his recusal in March after it emerged that he had failed to disclose contacts with Sergey Kislyak, then Russia's ambassador to the US, in his Senate confirmation hearing in January.

Preliminary coalition talks collapsed between Chancellor Merkel and three potential coalition partners over the weekend. President Steinmeier has taken the parties to task, urging them to fulfill their political duty.
German President Frank-Walter Steinmeier did not announce any concrete steps in a brief statement delivered in Berlin on Monday after he met with German Chancellor Angela Merkel. Instead he encouraged Germany’s political parties to reconsider whether they might not be able to create a working majority.
"I expect the parties to make the formation of a new government possible in the foreseeable future," Steinmeier said, adding that the parties had a responsibility that "cannot be simply given back to the voters."
That was a reference to fresh elections. If no majority coalition emerges, Steinmeier is bound by the German constitution to nominate a chancellor for approval by the German parliament, the Bundestag. If no stable government can be formed after three rounds of voting there, the president would have to ask Germans to return to the polls.
That's a possibility that Steinmeier wants to avoid. Steinmeier said he would be holding talks with various leaders of the political parties in an attempt to broker an agreement.

Argentina's navy says its ARA San Juan submarine, which has been missing since Wednesday, reported a mechanical breakdown in its last communication.
The submarine, with 44 crew on board, disappeared 430km (267 miles) off the Argentine coast and no trace of it has been found.
"The vessel surfaced and it reported a breakdown," naval commander Gabriel Galeazzi said.
He did not give further details of the nature of the breakdown.
Capt Galeazzi, who heads the naval base in Mar del Plata, south of Buenos Aires, said that the vessel had been asked to go directly to Mar del Plata.
Capt Galeazzi said that mechanical problems were not uncommon and rarely posed a risk.
However, it is unclear why these details were not released before.

North Korean state-media lashed out at President Trump as an “old lunatic” who offered a “load of rubbish” about the reclusive regime during his recent swing through Asia.
“A load of rubbish spouted by the old lunatic Trump during his recent visit to South Korea was a total of all nonsense and paradox so far let out by him against the DPRK,” said an editorial in the Minju Joson newspaper on Sunday, referring to North Korea by the initials of its formal name — the Democratic People’s Republic of Korea.
The newspaper also said Trump “insulted” President Kim Jong Un’s government and fanned the flames of aggression.
“He insulted the state and social system of the DPRK and the life of its people. This thrice-cursed crime can never be pardoned,” the editorial said. “Not content with letting out all sorts of rubbish against the DPRK, he cried out for the use of power like a crazy gang leader, betraying his true colors as a mastermind of aggression. This is just an open declaration of war against the DPRK.”

The Environmental Protection Agency administrator came into office promising to discard his predecessor’s “overreaching” focus on climate change and concentrate on what he called the agency’s real mission: cleaning up the air, water and land.
But instead, Pruitt has rolled back or stalled environmental protections, given the fossil fuel and chemistry industries more sway over public health decisions and taken steps that critics fear will undermine work on pollution cleanups, according to a POLITICO analysis of what he’s accomplished to date. He says he will be tough on environmental crimes, but his agency is also easing up on enforcement and collecting far less in penalties than previous administrations, according to agency watchdogs.
Pruitt is the most unorthodox EPA administrator in decades, an avowed critic of the agency who has alienated much of his career staff. He’s spent heavily on travel to meet with business executives and GOP leaders, who want to see a much weaker EPA and could back Pruitt in a future political campaign. He has declined to disclose his daily schedule, employs a large entourage of bodyguards and built a “privacy booth” for communications in his office. He has questioned manmade climate change and kicked respected scientists off his advisory boards, replacing them with representatives from the businesses and the states he regulates.

The Trump tax cuts are zipping through Congress at the legislative version of light speed. House Republicans unveiled their plan for overhauling America’s tax code on November 2; they passed it two weeks later. The Senate GOP revealed its (actual) tax bill last Tuesday; Mitch McConnell plans to vote it out of the upper chamber the week after Thanksgiving.
The frenetic pace of the GOP’s tax “reform” push has left some of the party’s own members short of breath. “You’re rewriting a tax code for a generation, and you are doing it in ten days,” Republican congressman Peter King said Thursday. “In [1986], it took two years to put together a tax reform bill.”
King’s exasperation is warranted. A couple of weeks might be enough time for legislators, policy analysts, and voters to consider the legislation’s first-order effects: Whose taxes will go up, whose will go down, and how much revenue will be lost in the process. But it’s far too brief an interval for lawmakers (let alone, the public) to comprehend the broader consequences of those changes.
Tax policy is about a lot more than generating revenue. Every tax code rewards certain kinds of economic activity and disincentives others. In the United States, we are especially reliant on tax incentives for shaping our industrial policy and providing social welfare.

A state lawmaker and the attorney for a woman whose profane sticker about President Donald Trump on her truck grabbed national headlines will discuss the case Monday.
State Rep. Ron Reynolds (D-Missouri City) said in a press release that the news conference will address the “injustice against Karen Fonseca.”
“We have to protect people’s First Amendment right to free speech,” Reynolds said in his written statement. “A difference in political views does not give Sheriff Nehls the right to target citizens. These actions by Sheriff Nehls could be an abuse of his law enforcement authority.”
Reynolds’ news conference is scheduled to begin at 10 a.m.
The controversy started after Fort Bend County Sheriff Troy Nehls posted a picture of the decal Wednesday on Facebook. The decal on the pickup’s rear window read, “F*** Trump, and f*** you for voting for him.”

Representative Nancy Pelosi, the Democratic leader, moved swiftly on Tuesday against the House’s longest serving lawmaker, calling for the House Ethics Committee to investigate sexual harassment charges against Representative John Conyers Jr., the top Democrat on the House Judiciary Committee.
Mr. Conyers, 88, confirmed a settlement of a wrongful termination complaint in 2015 from a staff member who had accused him of sexual harassment, although he denied that the staff member was fired for refusing to have sex with him. The settlement was first reported by Buzzfeed News on Monday.
Ms. Pelosi and senior Democrats on the Judiciary Committee offered little support.
“Any credible allegation of sexual harassment must be investigated by the Ethics Committee,” Ms. Pelosi said, adding that there should be “zero tolerance for harassment, discrimination, bullying or abuse in the House.”
Sexual harassment charges are roiling Capitol Hill, as they have shaken Hollywood, Silicon Valley and the media. But in Mr. Conyers’s case, the charges quickly meshed with other issues, from the advanced age of some House members to the desire of younger Democrats for new leadership.
Specifically, the House Judiciary Committee would become a focal point for inquiries into the conduct of President Trump and his administration — possibly even impeachment proceedings — if Democrats seize control of the House in the 2018 midterm elections. And some Democrats have been angling for stronger leadership.

For a president who delights in being a showman, ordering up a pardon was the perfect segue for his thinking on policies.
In remarks at the ceremony, President Donald Trump delighted in poking some fun at his predecessor — as well as himself and his penchant for executive orders — during the annual pardoning of the National Thanksgiving Turkey.
Trump joked that he had conferred with the White House counsel on whether he could overturn former President Barack Obama’s turkey pardons — including those for last year’s birds, Tater and Tot — much as he has for other executive actions.
However, the White House’s lawyers found that the prior pardons could “not be, under any circumstances, revoked,” Trump said. “So we're not going to revoke them. So, Tater and Tot, you can rest easy.”
The president gave the official pardon to Drumstick, a turkey raised in Minnesota, sparing him the Thanksgiving dinner table. Drumstick was chosen for the honor over the alternate, Wishbone, by 60 percent of respondents in an online White House poll. Both birds, however, will avoid the carving knife: They will be spend the rest of their days at the turkey sanctuary Gobbler’s Rest at Virginia Tech University.

The Federal Communications Commission announced on Tuesday that it planned to dismantle landmark regulations that ensure equal access to the internet, clearing the way for companies to charge more and block access to some websites.
The proposal, put forward by the F.C.C. chairman, Ajit Pai, is a sweeping repeal of rules put in place by the Obama administration. The rules prohibited high-speed internet service providers from blocking or slowing down the delivery of websites, or charging extra fees for the best quality of streaming and other internet services for their subscribers. Those limits are central to the concept called net neutrality.
The action immediately reignited a loud and furious fight over free speech and the control of the internet, pitting telecom giants like AT&T against internet giants like Google and Amazon, who warn against powerful telecom gatekeepers. Both sides are expected to lobby hard in Washington to push their agendas, as they did when the existing rules were adopted.
“Under my proposal, the federal government will stop micromanaging the internet,” Mr. Pai said in a statement. “Instead, the F.C.C. would simply require internet service providers to be transparent about their practices so that consumers can buy the service plan that’s best for them and entrepreneurs and other small businesses can have the technical information they need to innovate.”

Emmerson Mnangagwa, elected as the new leader of Zimbabwe's ruling political party and now poised to take over as the country's president within hours, has engineered a remarkable comeback using skills he no doubt learned from his longtime mentor, the newly resigned President Robert Mugabe.
Mnangagwa served for decades as Mugabe's enforcer — a role that gave him a reputation for being astute, ruthless and effective at manipulating the levers of power. Among the population, he is more feared than popular, but he has strategically fostered a loyal support base within the military and security forces.
A leading government figure since Zimbabwe's independence in 1980, he became vice president in 2014 and is so widely known as the "Crocodile" that his supporters are called Team Lacoste for the brand's crocodile logo.
The 75-year-old "is smart and skillful, but will he be a panacea for Zimbabwe's problems? Will he bring good governance and economic management? We'll have to watch this space," said Piers Pigou, southern Africa expert for the International Crisis Group.
Mugabe unwittingly set in motion the events that led to his own downfall, firing his vice president on Nov. 6. Mnangagwa fled the country to avoid arrest while issuing a ringing statement saying he would return to lead Zimbabwe.

Charlie Rose’s CBS News career came to an unceremonious end Tuesday when the network fired him over allegations of sexual harassment.
“A short time ago we terminated Charlie Rose’s employment with CBS News, effective immediately,” CBS News President David Rhodes wrote in a note to staff. “This followed the revelation yesterday of extremely disturbing and intolerable behavior said to have revolved around his PBS program. Despite Charlie’s important journalistic contribution to our news division, there is absolutely nothing more important, in this or any organization, than ensuring a safe, professional workplace — a supportive environment where people feel they can do their best work. We need to be such a place.”
PBS followed with an announcement that it no longer will distribute “Charlie Rose,” the nightly talk show hosted by Rose since 1991. Bloomberg, which also carried the show on its TV service, has also dropped it.
“In light of yesterday’s revelations, PBS has terminated its relationship with Charlie Rose and canceled distribution of his programs,” a PBS spokesperson said in a statement. “PBS expects all the producers we work with to provide a workplace where people feel safe and are treated with dignity and respect.”

Additional remains have been discovered of Sgt. La David Johnson who was killed in the October 4 ambush by ISIS fighters in Niger, according to a US official.
Another US official confirmed to CNN that the remains were bone fragments.
The remains were recovered on November 12 by a US military and FBI team that traveled to the area. Johnson's family was notified on Monday the official said.
"On Nov. 12, 2017, a joint US Africa Command military investigation team discovered additional human remains at the site where Sgt. La David T. Johnson's body was recovered following the Oct. 4 attack," a statement released by Pentagon spokesperson Dana White on Tuesday said.
"Today, we can confirm that the Armed Forces Medical Examiner has positively identified these remains as those of Sgt. Johnson."
close dialog

Celebrations erupted in the streets after Zimbabwe’s president, Robert Mugabe, resigned Tuesday, a stunning end to nearly 40 years of leadership announced in parliament during impeachment proceedings against him.
Car horns were blasting across Harare, the capital, as Zimbabweans expressed their joy at Mugabe’s departure. People sang and danced in the streets.
The resignation came with Mugabe facing a possible swift removal by parliament through impeachment and after only a handful of Cabinet ministers appeared at a meeting he called Tuesday.
Parliament’s speaker stopped proceedings to say lawmakers had received a letter from the president indicating his resignation was effective immediately. Parliament erupted into cheers.
Minah Mandaba, a member of the ruling ZANU-PF party’s Central Committee, danced and cheered as she left the joint sitting of parliament, where the resignation was announced.

In a big week for Syrian peace talks, President Assad was hosted by Russian President Vladimir Putin in Sochi, where the leaders of Iran and Turkey are also to convene. Fittingly, perhaps, the US had no input into the renewed effort for peace in Syria.
Putin said that with the defeat of ISIS (Daesh, Islamic State) and other terror groups in Syria now virtually achieved, the parties to the conflict must underpin the political means to win the peace. Significantly, the talks in the Russian Black Sea resort of Sochi reinforce the earlier Geneva accord which assents to President Bashar Assad and his government in Damascus as the sovereign authority of Syria.
The demand by Washington and its European allies for Assad to “stand down” has long ago expired. That void is a tacit acknowledgment the nearly seven-year covert war in Syria for regime change has been defeated or at least the covert war in its guise of Western-backed proxy militant groups.

The Trump administration is ending a humanitarian program that has allowed some 59,000 Haitians to live and work in the United States since an earthquake ravaged their country in 2010, Homeland Security officials said on Monday.
Haitians with what is known as Temporary Protected Status will be expected to leave the United States by July 2019 or face deportation.
The decision set off immediate dismay among Haitian communities in South Florida, New York and beyond, and was a signal to other foreigners with temporary protections that they, too, could soon be asked to leave.
About 320,000 people now benefit from the Temporary Protected Status program, which was signed into law by President George Bush in 1990, and the decision on Monday followed another one last month that ended protections for 2,500 Nicaraguans.
Haiti, the poorest country in the Western Hemisphere, is still struggling to recover from the earthquake and relies heavily on money its expatriates send to relatives back home. The Haitian government had asked the Trump administration to extend the protected status.

An Argentine navy submarine that's been missing for nearly a week may soon run out of oxygen if it hasn't surfaced, the country's navy says -- a scenario giving urgency to a multinational search for the vessel and its 44-member crew.
The navy lost contact with the ARA San Juan submarine on November 15, shortly after the vessel's captain reported a failure in the battery system while the sub was submerged off Argentina's South Atlantic coast, the military has said.
Ships and aircraft from at least seven nations have been scouring parts of the South Atlantic for the sub. On Tuesday, three vessels will move to an expanded search area, Argentine navy spokesman Enrique Balbi said.
"The search area is two times the size of Buenos Aires," Balbi said.
A day earlier, the spokesman said the search had entered a critical phase because the ARA San Juan crew's oxygen could run out by Wednesday in one of the worst-case scenarios.

Mystery and confusion surround a grisly incident that left one Border Patrol agent in Texas dead and another hospitalized with serious head trauma.
Three days after the incident, officials haven't confirmed how Rogelio Martinez was fatally injured.
FBI officials are exploring multiple causes — including an accident — but are leaning toward the possibility that the agents were attacked.
“There are a number of possible scenarios, but right now, we're going to pursue it as an assault on a federal agent,” Special Agent in Charge Emerson Buie told reporters at a news conference Tuesday.
A union representative for the border agents suggested that Martinez and his partner may have been bludgeoned by rock-wielding illegal immigrants crossing the treacherous terrain near the small town of Van Horn.
But a U.S. official told the Associated Press that theory is just "speculation," and other reports suggest the agents may have fallen into a ditch.
Martinez, 36, was discovered after 11 p.m. local time Saturday in the Big Bend area outside of Van Horn, according to a statement from the FBI, which has taken over the investigation.

The man who authorities say shot and killed a Pennsylvania police officer was caught Tuesday morning following a manhunt that lasted for three days.
Pennsylvania state police announced early Tuesday morning that authorities had apprehended Rahmael Sal Holt, who is accused of fatally shooting New Kensington Police Officer Brian Shaw following a Friday night traffic stop about 20 miles northeast of Pittsburgh.
Westmoreland County District Attorney John Peck said at a news conference Tuesday that Holt, 29, has been charged with first-degree murder of a law enforcement officer; murder of the first degree; possession of a firearm; and carrying a firearm without a license, according to an online court docket.
Westmoreland County District Attorney John Peck told reporters at a news conference Tuesday that Holt was arrested at a home in Pittsburgh. The Pittsburgh Tribune Review reported that several associates and relatives, including the suspect's mother, Sherry Holt, and another woman, Aysa Benson, were also arrested and accused of helping Rahmael Holt. Court records show the two have been charged with hindering apprehension, a third-degree felony.

Former Bosnian Serb commander Ratko Mladic has been jailed for life for genocide and other atrocities in the 1990s Bosnian war.
Known as the "Butcher of Bosnia", Mladic led forces during the massacre of Bosnian Muslims (Bosniaks) in Srebrenica and the siege of Sarajevo.
The UN tribunal in The Hague convicted him on 10 of the 11 charges.
Mladic, 74, was not in court when the sentence was read out. He had been removed for shouting at the judges.
They had rejected a request by his team to halt proceedings because of Mladic's high blood pressure. At the start of the session, he appeared relaxed, smiling and gesturing to the cameras.
Mladic has denied all the charges and his lawyer said he would appeal.
Wladic was the military commander of Bosnian Serb forces against Bosnian Croat and Bosniak armies. He had been on trial at the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia (ICTY) since 2012.
It found that Mladic "significantly contributed" to the genocide in Srebrenica in 1995, where more than 7,000 Bosniak men and boys were murdered, the worst atrocity in Europe since World War Two.
He was cleared of a second count of genocide in other municipalities. The other charges included war crimes and crimes against humanity.

LaVar Ball downplayed his son's shoplifting incident in China, as well as President Donald Trump's involvement in getting LiAngelo Ball and two other UCLA basketball players back to the United States earlier this week.
"Who?" LaVar Ball told ESPN on Friday, when asked about Trump's involvement in the matter. "What was he over there for? Don't tell me nothing. Everybody wants to make it seem like he helped me out."
Multiple sources told ESPN that UCLA officials are debating how long to sideline the three suspended freshmen players who admitted to shoplifting during the basketball team's trip to China last week.
UCLA freshmen LiAngelo Ball, Cody Riley and Jalen Hill, who had been detained in China on suspicion of shoplifting, landed in Los Angeles on Tuesday evening and addressed the media on Wednesday before being indefinitely suspended by the team.
Trump, who returned late Tuesday from a trip through Asia, raised the players' case with President Xi Jinping of China during a visit to Beijing last week. All three players offered thanks to Trump during Wednesday's news conference.

Two of President Trump's hometown newspapers are hitting him for standing by GOP Senate candidate Roy Moore in the wake of explosive sexual misconduct allegations.
In nearly matching front-page headlines on Friday, the New York Post and the New York Daily News – both known for their punchy style – declared Trump as "with" a "perv" in the Alabama Senate race.
"I'm With The Perv!" the New York Post declared in bold letters.
"I'm With Perv," the Daily News wrote alongside photos of Trump and Moore. 
Numerous women have come forward in recent weeks to accuse Moore of pursuing sexual and romantic relations with them when they were teenagers and he was in his 30s. One of the accusers was 14-years-old at the time of an alleged encounter with Moore, who was 32 at the time.
Moore has vehemently denied most of the allegations, and has resisted calls by dozens of GOP officials across the country to withdraw from the Senate race.

Eight people have been rescued and are in “good condition” after a U.S. Navy transporter plane carrying 11 crew and passengers crashed into the Pacific Ocean off Japan, the U.S. Navy’s 7th Fleet said Wednesday.
The search for the remaining three people is continuing.
This is the latest accident to befall the 7th Fleet, which is based in the Japanese port of Yokosuka, south of Tokyo, and has endured multiple collisions at sea this year, including two involving guided-missile destroyers that left 17 sailors dead.

The North Korean soldier whose harrowing escape to South Korea was caught on camera, is reportedly in stable condition and conversed with medical staff at the hospital, several South Korean media outlets reported Tuesday.
"He is fine," lead surgeon Lee Cook-Jung said of the soldier, who was revealed to be 24-years-old and is identified by his surname, "Oh," according to the Korean Herald and Dong-a Ilbo. "The patient is not going to die."
Lee said Oh made light conversation and talked about South Korean music, The Ilbo reported. Oh listened to several versions of a song from Korean pop music group "Girls' Generation," to which he said he was fan of.
To help with Oh's recovery process, doctors reportedly played television and music for Oh; however, fearing watching the news may be excessively stimulating for the recovering patient, they limited his privileges to channels with movies, the Ilbo said.
Oh was also reported to enjoy watching CBS' "CSI: Crime Scene Investigation."

Pyongyang has loudly denounced the decision by the United States to relist North Korea as a state sponsor of terrorism, with a foreign ministry spokesman warning it was a "serious provocation."
In a report published on North Korean state media KCNA, the spokesman said his country had nothing to do with terrorism, saying the relisting was an "absurdity."
"This is a serious provocation and a violent infringement upon our dignified country," the spokesman said according to KCNA.
The Trump administration announced on Monday that North Korea would again be included on the list of states which sponsor terrorism, adding the US Treasury Department would be initiating further sanctions on the already isolated nation.
"Today the United States is designating North Korea as a state sponsor of terrorism. Should have happened a long time ago. Should have happened years ago," President Donald Trump said.

Lebanese Prime Minister Saad Hariri announced Wednesday he was putting his resignation on hold, more than two weeks after he shocked the country by saying he was stepping down.
Speaking hours after he returned to Beirut, Hariri said he had accepted President Michel Aoun's wish for him to suspend his resignation to allow for more consultations on the reasons behind the move.
Hariri announced he was standing down on November 4 while in the Saudi capital, Riyadh, saying he feared his life was in danger. Lebanon said it could not accept his resignation until he returned to the country.
Aoun said at the time Hariri was being held against his will in Riyadh -- a claim Hariri denied -- and speculation swirled in Lebanon that he was being held hostage.

Current events in Zimbabwe show that while a week may be a long time in politics, it is really a very short blink of an eye in economics. Zimbabweans on the streets of Harare and Bulawayo may be hopeful for political change, but they are much more sanguine and realistic when it comes to improving the country's economy.
Presidents can be impeached in days or weeks. It takes years to wreck economies and usually even longer to repair them.
So, will Emmerson Mnangagwa be able to take Zimbabwe's economy off life support and at least start to put it on the road to recovery? Analysts are very sceptical that a quick solution is even feasible. The euphoria that has gripped the nation has certainly raised hopes that the future will be brighter, but if that improved sentiment is to deliver economic dividends, the government needs to make some drastic reforms.
The first tool President Mnangagwa would need to even get a recovery kick-started is hard currency. Zimbabwe hasn't had a currency of its own since 2009, after hyperinflation killed off the old Zimbabwean dollar.
Since then, the US dollar has been the main currency for transactions, as well as the South African rand. And in recent years a cash shortage has been slowly strangling the economy, which is half the size it was at the turn of the millennium.

Top crude exporter Saudi Arabia is lobbying oil ministers to agree next week on a nine-month extension to OPEC-led supply cuts, sources familiar with the matter said, as Riyadh seeks to ensure a price-sapping glut is eradicated.
A flag with the Organization of the Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) logo is seen during a meeting of OPEC and non-OPEC producing countries in Vienna, Austria September 22, 2017. REUTERS/Leonhard Foeger/Files
The Organization of the Petroleum Exporting Countries, non-member Russia and nine other producers are cutting oil output by about 1.8 million barrels per day until March 2018, and will discuss extending the deal at a Nov. 30 meeting in Vienna.
Oil prices have risen to almost $65 a barrel, the highest since 2015, supported by lower inventories. However, OPEC is wary prices could fall again since excess supply persists, while a flare-up in Middle Eastern political tensions has also played a part in the rally.
“The Saudis are lobbying to have a decision in November for nine months,” said a senior oil industry source with knowledge of the matter who declined to be identified.
Indications of support for a nine-month extension have come from the very top in Saudi Arabia, OPEC’s de facto leader, and Russia, the largest non-OPEC producer involved in the agreement.

The Catholic school in Adelaide apologised on Wednesday for the statue, which was completed recently.
The sculpture, portraying St Martin de Porres, was widely criticised after images of it were posted online.
The unfortunate position of the loaf of bread held by the saint led to some misreading the scene.
Blackfriars Priory School said it had commissioned a new sculptor to "substantially alter" the design.
In a message posted on Facebook, principal Simon Cobiac apologised to the school community for "any concerns and publicity" caused by the statue.
He said the school had approved its design and commissioned a sculptor in Vietnam, but "upon arrival the three-dimensional statue was deemed by the [school] to be potentially suggestive".
The Adelaide Advertiser newspaper said the statue had been installed last week and later covered with a black cloth.
It drew public attention after an image of the statue was posted on a popular Adelaide Instagram account, where it attracted hundreds of comments.

Hillary Clinton said in a new interview that her inability to run on an "agenda of change," coming off of President Barack Obama's two terms, was a significant problem for her 2016 campaign.
"It is true that when you run to succeed a two-term president of your own party, you have a historical headwind blowing against you," Clinton told radio host Hugh Hewitt. "It’s not just this campaign can be set apart from everything that’s ever happened in our politics. It is a challenge."
"If you are both the candidate defending a lot of the areas of agreement, but also putting forth an agenda for change, which is what I tried to do, it is often difficult to get the second part of that message through," she added. "So I do think it was a problem."
"I was proud to serve in the Obama administration. I did not agree with everything that President Obama decided, but on balance, I really think he did what had to be done to rescue the economy, which as we all remember, was in desperate straits," Clinton told the conservative radio host. "He did chart a course in the world that favored diplomacy and negotiation, something that I think is important."

Sen. Lisa Murkowski (R-Alaska) cast a decisive, dramatic vote to save health care for millions of people over the summer. The chances of her doing it again just went way down. 
With Republicans preparing to vote on tax cut legislation next week, Murkowski announced on Tuesday that she would not oppose the bill simply because it includes a provision repealing the Affordable Care Act’s individual mandate.
Murkowski made the announcement in an op-ed for the Fairbanks Daily News-Miner. And she was careful not to promise she’d vote for the final tax legislation.
That legislation would repeal a variety of corporate and personal taxes. But most of the cuts that benefit lower- and middle-income taxpayers are temporary and, once they expire, half of them would actually end up paying higher taxes, according to official estimates.
Those numbers could help sink the bill, which is expected to get no Democratic votes and thus needs 50 of the Senate’s 52 Republicans to vote for it. But Murkowski’s statement about the mandate leaves open the possibility she’d be one of the 50.

While Congress is on a weeklong Thanksgiving break, the breakneck speed of the Republican push to overhaul the US tax code has taken a bill close to passing in the Senate.
The latest version of the chamber's Tax Cuts and Jobs Act passed the Senate Finance Committee last Thursday, and Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell has said he wants to bring the bill for a full Senate vote when lawmakers return from the recess.
But on Tuesday, Republicans were hit with something of a triple whammy: Three different groups offered critical analyses of the bill's potentially negative effects on the federal budget, Americans' taxes, and the broader US economy. While the Senate is still expected to make changes to the legislation, each of the new studies shows that the Senate's bill has some significant underlying problems.
Perhaps the most damning of the new reports came from the Urban Institute and Brookings Institution's Tax Policy Center.
The nonpartisan group's analysis of the legislation found that while all income groups would get a tax cut from the bill in the short term and long term, many Americans would see their taxes increase.

A sound detected near the last known location of an Argentine navy submarine carrying 44 crew members is believed to have come from an explosion.
Enrique Balbi, spokesman for the Argentine navy, told reporters at a news conference Thursday that officials have found evidence showing that the abnormal sound, which was detected 30 miles north of the submarine's last-known location, was “singular, short, violent and non-nuclear” and “consistent with an explosion,” the Associated Press reported.
Balbi also said that officials do not know what caused the explosion and that there's no evidence the vessel had been attacked.

Lawyers for Michael T. Flynn, President Trump’s former national security adviser, notified the president’s legal team in recent days that they could no longer discuss the special counsel’s investigation, according to four people involved in the case, an indication that Mr. Flynn is cooperating with prosecutors or negotiating such a deal.
Mr. Flynn’s lawyers had been sharing information with Mr. Trump’s lawyers about the investigation by the special counsel, Robert S. Mueller III, who is examining whether anyone around Mr. Trump was involved in Russian efforts to undermine Hillary Clinton’s presidential campaign.
That agreement has been terminated, the four people said. Defense lawyers frequently share information during investigations, but they must stop when doing so would pose a conflict of interest. It is unethical for lawyers to work together when one client is cooperating with prosecutors and another is still under investigation.
The notification alone does not prove that Mr. Flynn is cooperating with Mr. Mueller. Some lawyers withdraw from information-sharing arrangements as soon as they begin negotiating with prosecutors. And such negotiations sometimes fall apart.

President Trump spoke to U.S. troops Thursday from his private Florida club Mar-a-Lago, telling them "we're really winning" in the fight against ISIS and in Afghanistan — all thanks to his administration's leadership.
"They say we've made more progress against ISIS than they did in years of the previous administration, and that's because I'm letting you do your job," Trump said, in a video call to branches of the U.S. armed forces.
The call was with the 82nd Airborne in Afghanistan, the 2nd Marine Raider Batallion in Iraq, the 5th Fleet aboard the USS Monterey, the 74th Expeditionary Fighter Squadron in Turkey and the Coast Guard at the Kuwait Navy Base.
This Thanksgiving A Majority Would Prefer To Hold The Side Of Political Talk 

Julia Poff, a 46-year-old woman in Sealy, Texas, has been accused of mailing homemade explosives to then-President Obama and Texas Gov. Greg Abbott in October 2016. A third package went to the Social Security Administration.
Only Abbott opened the package, but according to documents filed in court in Texas this week, "it failed to explode because he did not open it as designed." Had the device exploded, the documents state that it could have caused "severe burns and death" to the state's Republican governor.
The federal agent assigned to the case testified that the package had an "obliterated shipping label" for an EBay order that was sent to Julia Poff, which led authorities to her address. They found a garage full of fireworks, and a number of pieces of evidence, including a salad dressing bottle cap in the explosive device that matched salad dressing witnesses say Poff had used for her anniversary dinner, and packaging for Pall Mall red cigarettes containing pyrotechnic powder, later found at her home.
The package sent to Obama also included a cat hair "microscopically consistent" with the hair of one of Poff's cats.
Court documents say that Poff was known to be critical of both Obama and Abbott. She had also applied for Social Security benefits and been denied.

Kate McClure didn’t expect to run out of gas on her drive to Philadelphia last month.
And she definitely didn’t expect that her misfortune would give her the opportunity to change someone else’s life.
Pulled over on the side of I-95, McClure, 27, was approached by a homeless man named Johnny. She was apprehensive at first, but Johnny told her to get back into her car and to lock the doors while he walked to get her help. He went to a nearby gas station, used his last $20 to fill a can and brought it back to fill up her car.
Grateful, but without a dollar to repay him, McClure promised she would come back with something.
In the weeks since, she’s returned to the spot along I-95 where Johnny stays with cash, snacks and Wawa gift cards. Each time she’s stopped by with her boyfriend, Mark D’Amico, they’ve learned a bit more about Johnny’s story, and become humbled by his gratitude.
Eventually, the Florence Township couple knew they had to do something more.

The chief of the Russian General Staff says Russia is likely to scale down its military presence in Syria “significantly” before the year’s end.
Moscow embarked on an air campaign in Syria in October 2015 to prop up its longtime ally President Bashar Assad. Russia’s operation ultimately helped to turn the tide of the war in Assad’s favor.
Gen. Valery Gerasimov said in comments carried by Russian news agencies Thursday that the scale-down that Putin announced earlier this week will be “significant.”

North Korea’s latest defector, a young soldier known only by his family name Oh, is a quiet, pleasant man who has nightmares about being returned to the North, his surgeon said on Thursday.
Lee Cook-jong, a South Korean surgeon who operated the defected North Korean soldier with gunshots, speaks during an interview with Reuters at a hospital in Suwon, South Korea, November 23, 2017. REUTERS/Yang Hee-kyong
“He’s a pretty nice guy,” said lead surgeon John Cook-Jong Lee, who has been operating and caring for the 24-year-old. Oh has become a focus of worldwide attention after he was badly wounded by fellow North Korean soldiers as he scrambled across the border in the Demilitarized Zone that separates North and South on Nov. 13.
Video of Oh’s escape released on Wednesday showed him stumbling over the border and being dragged unconscious through the undergrowth by South Korean troops.
Surgeon Lee has been almost the only person to speak with Oh since he arrived at the hospital, he told Reuters in an interview at his office at Ajou University Hospital, just a few floors away from where the defector lies guarded by South Korean special forces and intelligence officers.

Pope Francis visits Myanmar next week, a delicate trip for the world’s most senior Christian to a majority Buddhist country accused by Washington of the “ethnic cleansing” of Muslim Rohingya people.
He will also visit Bangladesh to where more than 600,000 people have fled from what Amnesty International called “crimes against humanity” including murder, rape torture and forcible displacement, allegations the Myanmar military denies.
The trip is so delicate that some of the pope’s advisors have warned him against even saying the word “Rohingya,” lest he set off a diplomatic incident that could turn the country’s military and government against minority Christians.
The most tense moments of the Nov. 26-Dec. 2 trip are likely to be private meetings with army head Senior General Min Aung Hlaing and, separately, civilian leader Aung San Suu Kyi.

President Donald Trump placed North Korea back on the state sponsors list of terrorism on Monday, which some experts say is unlikely to do much to change Pyongyang's stance on its nuclear program. 
"Today, the United States is designating North Korea as a state sponsor of terrorism. It should have happened a long time ago. It should have happened years ago," Trump said from the White House. "The North Korean regime must be lawful. It must end its unlawful nuclear and ballistic missile development, and cease all support for international terrorism—which it is not doing."
Trump accused North Korea of "repeatedly" supporting international terrorism, "including assassinations on foreign soil." The president cited Otto Warmbier, the American student who died in June after being imprisoned in North Korea for 17 months, during Monday's announcement. 

As the investigation into the murder of Baltimore Police Detective Sean Suiter continues, Police Commissioner Kevin Davis revealed during a press conference on Wednesday evening that Suiter was shot with his own gun and he was set to testify in a police corruption case the next day.
Suiter, 18-year veteran officer, was gunned down on Nov. 15 in West Baltimore while conducting a follow-up on a homicide investigation. He sustained a close-contact gunshot wound to the head.
During the press conference, Davis confirmed that Suiter was set to testify in an unspecified case against officers who were indicted in March. Davis said that the U.S. attorney's office and the special agent in charge of the FBI's Baltimore field office assured him that Suiter was not a target in any ongoing criminal investigation.
"There is no information that has been communicated to me that Detective Suiter was anything other than a stellar detective, great friend, loving husband and dedicated father," Davis said.

Police arrested an Indiana high school teacher Wednesday after her students caught her on video using what they say was cocaine in a classroom.
The 24-year-old teacher, Samantha Cox, is seen in the video acting strangely in an empty classroom early Wednesday morning.
"She’s in the corner, hiding with a chair and a book and what appears to be cocaine, putting it into lines," Will Rogers, a student, told WGN9.
Soon after recording the teacher, students notified administrators and Cox was taken from the school in handcuffs. Authorities plan on charging her with possession of a controlled substance and drug paraphernalia.
While conducting their investigation, Police told The Northwest Indiana Times that they suspected the teacher had a “mixture of cocaine and heroin.”
Police said the students did the right thing by reporting their teacher.

At least 235 people were killed and another 109 injured in an attack on a Sufi mosque in Egypt's North Sinai region on Friday, Egyptian state-run media reported, in what appears to be the deadliest terror attack on Egyptian soil.
After at least two explosions, gunmen who were waiting outside the mosque opened fire at worshipers as they fled Friday prayers, state-owned Ahram Online said.
The attack targeted al Rawdah mosque, situated in the village of al Rawdah between Bir al-Abed and the city of al-Arish.
Bodies lie on the floor of Bir al-Abed&#39;s al Rawdah mosque following a gun and bomb attack Friday.
Bodies lie on the floor of Bir al-Abed's al Rawdah mosque following a gun and bomb attack Friday.
Key developments:
Coordinated attack: Gunmen fired on people fleeing after explosions took place at the mosque. The attackers also opened fire on ambulances, witnesses said.
The target: The mosque, located in northern Sinai, is known as the birthplace of an important Sufi cleric.
World leaders respond: Egypt has declared three days of mourning, while figures in the international community condemned the attack. US President Donald Trump called it a "horrible and cowardly terrorist attack on innocent and defenseless worshipers in Egypt."

Turnout at U.S. retailers was relatively subdued on Black Friday, with many shoppers flocking to stores to eye items in person and enjoy the festive atmosphere while waiting to do their actual bargain hunting online.
There were few signs of the over-the-top frenzy that had been a hallmark of the start to the U.S. shopping season in years past, and some stores appeared to be getting creative with gimmicks beyond heavy discounts to lure shoppers through their doors.
The day after Thanksgiving is traditionally when retailers offer “doorbuster” deals attracting bargain hunters. Many department and big-box stores have said they will compete fiercely on price this quarter while keeping inventory lean.

A Texas state trooper was killed in the line of duty during a routine traffic stop on Thanksgiving — and the alleged gunman was nabbed following an hours-long manhunt.
Highway Patrol Trooper Damon Allen, 41, was gunned down around 4 p.m. Thursday on I-45 in a rural county near Fairfield, about 90 miles south of Dallas, authorities said.
Allen, a 15-year veteran, had pulled over suspected shooter Dabrett Black, 32, for a traffic violation when moments later, Black allegedly blasted multiple shots at Allen with a rifle, according to cops.
Allen, a married father of three, was killed at the scene, authorities said.
The shooter quickly fled in a 2012 Chevrolet Malibu, sparking a massive manhunt.

Columbia police released new details of events leading up to Thursday night's shooting.
Police said two men were sitting inside a car when one of them discharged the gun while trying to holster the weapon. The two men reportedly know each other.
Officers have not made any arrests and the investigation is ongoing, according to police.
Columbia police officers are investigating a shooting at the Columbia Mall. 
Investigators told ABC 17 News a 19-year-old person sustained life-threatening injuries after the shooting in the parking lot of the mall. Police the entirety of the incident took place in a car they were searching.
Police officers are still interviewing witnesses as of 1:30 a.m. Friday. They say they do not believe they are looking for anybody and have everyone they need to talk to. 

A justice from South Africa's Supreme Court of Appeal took just minutes to more than double Oscar Pistorius' prison sentence to 13 years and five months for the murder of girlfriend Reeva Steenkamp.
Justice Willie Seriti said the Supreme Court upheld an appeal by prosecutors against Pistorius' original six-year sentence for shooting Steenkamp multiple times in his home in 2013.
It's rare for the Supreme Court to change the sentences handed down by trial judges so dramatically.
"I did not expect the Supreme Court of Appeal to hand down such a lengthy sentence of imprisonment," legal analyst Ulrich Roux said on the eNCA news channel. "But, if one looks at what the law states, and given the fact that murder does carry the minimum sentence of 15 years in prison, I think the decision could be vindicated."
Pistorius' lawyers have just one avenue open to them if they want to challenge the new sentence handed down by the Supreme Court, and that is to appeal to the Constitutional Court, the highest court in South Africa.

Emmerson Mnangagwa, who fled into a brief exile after losing a power struggle less than three weeks ago, became Zimbabwe’s new president on Friday — succeeding Robert Mugabe, the leader he had backed for decades before helping oust him last week.
“We should never remain hostages of our past,” Mr. Mnangagwa said in his inaugural address. Referring specifically to Mr. Mugabe, he said: “To me personally, he remains a father, mentor, comrade in arms and my leader.”
In a rapid reversal of fortunes that abruptly ended one of the longest reigns in Africa’s post-colonial history, Mr. Mnangagwa was sworn in at a ceremony at the National Sports Stadium in Harare, the capital.
Mr. Mnangagwa — who served for half a century as his predecessor’s right-hand man — became only the second leader of Zimbabwe since independence in 1980.
Under an alternately sunny and cloudy sky, Mr. Mnangagwa said in his address that the country’s domestic politics had “become poisoned and rancorous and polarizing,” apparently referring to the factional fighting inside the governing party, ZANU-PF.

An ominous new development in the search for a missing Argentine submarine raises concerns it may have plunged off the continental shelf. It has a crew of 44 sailors.
An international agency said it detected an underwater sound that's consistent with an explosion near the submarine's last-known position in the south Atlantic. On Thursday, an organization that monitors underwater nuclear testing said it picked up the sound just hours after the submarine's disappearance last week. The Argentine navy is not saying what made the noise, but is now searching the area it came from.
A relative of one of the 44 crew members of Argentine missing submarine, is comforted outside Argentina's Navy base in Mar del Plata, on the Atlantic coast south of Buenos Aires, on November 23, 2017.
Relatives of the crew of the San Juan camped out at the Mar del Plata naval base are heartbroken and angry over the news of the apparent explosion. They're waiting for confirmation from the navy, but many now fear the worst, reports CBS News correspondent Adriana Diaz.

Barely an hour after Chancellor Angela Merkel watched her efforts to form a broad coalition government fall apart, she retreated to a private room with two dozen conservative allies. Four weeks of intense talks had just ended, with three deadlines missed. The mood was somber. One of her colleagues stood up to thank her, initiating a standing ovation.
It was a polite gesture to mark the end of a polite era. But German politics is now poised to enter a more raucous phase.
The breakdown of the coalition talks last weekend has done more than dent Ms. Merkel’s seeming invulnerability and raise the prospect of new elections, analysts say. Although the Social Democrats agreed on Friday to meet with the chancellor’s party next week — raising hopes for, if not a coalition, then a tolerated minority government — the current situation may well signal the breakdown of Germany’s postwar tradition of consensus and the dawn of a messy and potentially unnerving politics.
“The distinctive political tradition of the Federal Republic of Germany is change through consensus,” said Timothy Garton Ash, a professor of European studies at the University of Oxford. That was what was at stake, he said. “It hasn’t worked so far this time.”

The US Navy stopped the search and rescue mission to find three sailors who went missing after their plane crashed into the Philippine Sea on Wednesday, a statement said.
"Our thoughts and prayers are with our lost shipmates and their families," said Rear Adm. Marc Dalton, commander, Task Force 70. "As difficult as this is, we are thankful for the rapid and effective response that led to the rescue of eight of our shipmates, and I appreciate the professionalism and dedication shown by all who participated in the search efforts," said the Navy statement, which was released Thursday.
The Navy is withholding the names of the three sailors pending next of kin notifications.
The sailors were aboard a C2-A Greyhound transport plane that crashed into the ocean southeast of Okinawa on Wednesday afternoon.
A total of 11 crew and passengers were headed to an aircraft carrier when the plane crashed into the Philippine Sea around 2:45 p.m. Japan Standard Time, the Navy said.

Congressional Republicans have implanted nearly 50 expiring provisions in their tax-cut bills that, if left unaddressed, would transform what Republicans promised would be middle-class tax relief into a law that raises taxes for tens of millions of Americans.
More than 80 percent of the tax breaks set to go away would be taken from households. The perks for corporations are generally permanent, including the biggest single benefit in the bill: a permanent reduction of the corporate tax rate from 35 percent to 20 percent.

Celebrities like LeBron James and Kim Kardashian are calling on authorities to release a woman serving a life sentence for killing a man who had hired her for sex when she was 16.
Cyntoia Brown, now 29, fired the shot that killed a 43-year-old Nashville realtor who had picked her up for sex. It is unclear what sparked the renewed interest in Brown’s 2006 conviction, but there was a recent report about it on Fox 17.
“We were very, very appreciative of the fact that such an incredible number of celebrities would join our plea,” Charles Bone, a lawyer who took on the case pro bono, told The New York Times. “She was thrilled by the fact that people really cared.”
The Department of Corrections declined Fox 17’s interview request, but a PBS documentary filmmaker shared some of the footage with the station.
“We started the conversation,” Dan Birman told Fox 17. "This is a young girl who's at the tail end of three generations of violence against women. She had no chance."

The UK’s digital minister has said the October 2016 data breach that Uber disclosed this week does affect UK users — though it’s still unclear how many are impacted at this stage.
At this stage, our initial assessment is that the stolen information is not the sort that would allow direct financial crime, but we are working urgently to verify that further, and we rule nothing out. Our advice to Uber drivers and customers is to be vigilant and to monitor accounts, especially for phishing activity. If anyone thinks they are a victim, contact the Action Fraud helpline and follow the NCSC guidance on passwords and best practice.
On Tuesday, a year after it had learned about the breach, Uber informed the press that hackers had accessed the personal data of 57 million Uber users and drivers.
It said ~50M Uber riders were affected and around seven million drivers. Data accessed included names, email addresses and phone numbers in the case of Uber users. Some 600,000 US driver’s license numbers were also accessed. Uber has claimed no financial information leaked.
It also apparently paid $100,000 to the hackers to delete the data.
Uber also said some of the data involved users of its service outside the US, though it has not yet publicly provided a breakdown of specific affected markets.

The death toll in a bomb and gun attack on a Sufi mosque in northern Sinai has risen to 305, with 27 children among the dead, Egypt's state prosecutor said Saturday.
Another 128 people were injured, according to a statement from the public prosecutor read out on Egyptian state-run news channel Nile TV.
Between 25 to 30 armed men carried out the assault on the al Rawdah Sufi mosque in Bir al-Abed, the statement said.
The prosecutor also gave more detail about how the brutal attack unfolded. The attackers arrived in five SUVs and were armed with automatic machine guns, the statement said. They took position in front of the mosque and its entrances.
Survivors of the incident now at the hospital described massive gunfire and loud explosions at the start of the attack. A number of attackers, some of them masked, then entered the mosque, the statement said.

Former Trump campaign manager Corey Lewandowski said Saturday that Time magazine should recognize that President Trump is the only right choice for the magazine's coveted "Person of the Year" distinction.
Lewandowski told Fox News that Time and other mainstream media outlets don't give Trump "the credit he's deserved."
"The mainstream media has never wanted to give this president the credit that he's deserved. I don't know who else can be the Time magazine Person of the Year other than our president, Donald Trump," the former Trump aide said.
"As you know, the stock market is through the roof. People's 401(k)s are doing better than they were a year ago," he added. "Why should we be surprised?"
The former campaign manager's statement comes after Trump tweeted Friday that the magazine told him he could possibly be "Person of the Year" for the second year in a row. Trump said he turned the magazine down.

Senior White House officials insisted Saturday that President Trump is legally allowed to appoint an acting director for the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB), which is an independent agency.
Officials say Trump has the right to supercede an appointment by the exiting director.
The officials called Trump’s appointment of Office of Management and Budget Director Mick Mulvaney to lead the CFPB “a typical, routine move” in line with years of precedent.
Trump appointed Mulvaney on Friday night to serve as acting director of the CFPB, hours before former Director Richard Cordray left the agency. Cordray promoted his chief of staff Leandra English to the deputy director position before leaving.
The conflicting appointments mean there are two people who can claim to be the acting director of one federal agency.

U.S. Border patrol agents have detained a Florida teenager trying to enter Canada whom police want to interview in connection with the death of his grandmother.
The Jacksonville Sheriff's Office said at a news conference late Friday that the 15-year-old was stopped near Buffalo, New York.
Officials in Florida started looking for the boy and his 53-year-old grandmother on Wednesday after they failed to pick up the teen's father at the airport. The father had been on vacation with his girlfriend and his mother was watching her grandson while they were gone.
When the father got to his home in Neptune Beach, near Jacksonville on Florida's Atlantic coast, he found it had been ransacked. His mother's home in nearby Mayport was also ransacked. Weapons were missing from both homes and the grandmother's 2015 Dodge Dart was also gone.
Officials said at the news conference that the father is a corrections officer for the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office.

The U.S. Navy identified the three sailors lost after a Navy plane crashed in the Philippine Sea shortly after takeoff from Japan on Wednesday.
The Navy identified the three sailors lost at sea as: Lt. Steven Combs, Aviation Boatswain’s Mate (Equipment) Airman Matthew Chialastri and Aviation Ordnanceman Airman Apprentice Bryan Grosso.
“Our thoughts and prayers are with the families of these Sailors,” Vice Adm. Phil Sawyer, commander of U.S. Seventh Fleet, said.  “Their service and sacrifice will be lasting in Seventh Fleet and we will continue to stand the watch for them, as they did bravely for all of us.”   
Combs, a Florida native, was assigned to “Providers” of Fleet Logistics Support Squadron and was part of the carrier Air Wing Five while aboard the Ronald Reagan, the Navy stated.
Chialastri, from Louisiana, was previously assigned to USS America, the “Pro’s Nest” in Jacksonville, Fla. and Center for Security Forces Detachment Kittery Point in NH.
Grosso, a Florida native, was previously assigned to the Naval Air Technical Training Center in Pensacola, Fla. and Naval Recruit Training Center in Great Lakes, Ill.
All three men were awarded with the National Defense Ribbon. 

Wednesday was a typical afternoon but an exciting one — Thanksgiving was the next day, and Jamie Billquist and his wife, Rosemary, would partake in one of their favorite traditions: the Turkey Trot.
Rosemary Billquist, 43, got home from work about 5 p.m., and left shortly after to walk the couple’s dogs, Stella and Sugar, near the field behind their Sherman, N.Y., house. Jamie Billquist, 47, stayed at home, watching television.
A little while later, the dogs came racing to the back of the house, barking loudly. Jamie Billquist panicked. He called Rosemary’s cellphone, but she didn’t pick up.

The United States seems set to cut off its supply of arms to Kurdish fighters in Syria, in a move by President Donald Trump that is sure to please Turkey but further alienate Syrian Kurds who bore much of the fight against the Islamic State.
In a phone call Friday with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan, Trump said he'd "given clear instructions" that the Kurds will receive no more weapons, adding that "this nonsense should have ended a long time ago," said Turkish Foreign Minister Mevlut Cavusoglu.
The White House appeared to confirm the move in a cryptic statement about the phone call that said Trump had informed President Erdogan of "pending adjustments to the military support provided to our partners on the ground in Syria."
Trump's decision appeared to catch both the Pentagon and the U.S. State Department off guard. Officials at both agencies, who would normally be informed of changes in U.S. policy toward arming the Syrian Kurds, said they were unaware of any changes. The officials spoke on condition of anonymity.

For 37 years, it was the official newspaper of Robert Mugabe. Then, this month, the staff of the Zimbabwe Herald got an impossible assignment: They would have to cover the downfall of their benefactor.
In the days after Mugabe was detained by the military, editors and reporters gathered in a wood-paneled newsroom in an old office building downtown, trying to figure out what to do. Should they back Mugabe or the military takeover? Did they still have to echo the party line? What was the party line, anyway?

Two men sought by authorities after an altercation at a central London subway station that led to panic at the heart of the Oxford Street shopping district turned themselves in to police for questioning Saturday, officials said.
Two men aged 21 and 40 went to a police station voluntarily after a public appeal was launched, British Transport Police said. Both were interviewed by police. They haven't been identified or charged with any crime.
Authorities believe the two men had some type of confrontation on the Oxford Circus subway platform Friday afternoon, sparking panicky, false reports that guns had been fired.
Several people were injured and nine were taken to hospital, including one with leg injuries, after chaos erupted in the packed station on Friday.
Panic spread quickly near the Oxford Circus subway station on Black Friday, one of the busiest shopping days of the year. But police said after evacuating two subway stations that there were no indications that any shots had been fired.

Thousands of Pakistani police officers in riot gear fired tear gas on Saturday as they tried to clear out supporters of a firebrand cleric who have paralyzed the Pakistani capital for weeks with a protest on a main highway.
At least 200 people were injured in the violent confrontation, the authorities said. And protests spread to other cities in response to the confrontation in Islamabad, where supporters of the cleric, Khadim Hussain Rizvi, have been camped at the Faizabad Interchange, blocking the main road from Rawalpindi.
Mr. Rizvi, who leads the Tehreek-e-Labaik Pakistan party, is demanding the resignation of Pakistan’s law minister, Zahid Hamid, over a change to electoral laws that amended the wording of an oath sworn by lawmakers.
The move was quickly reversed, but his supporters had denounced the initial change as blasphemy — a highly combustible issue in Pakistan, and one that has repeatedly led to acts of violence.

President Trump will meet with Senate Republicans on Tuesday ahead of crucial votes in the GOP effort to pass a massive tax cut package, as conservatives move even closer to notching a major legislative victory.
The meeting will come during a weekly lunch Republicans hold as they go over their agenda. There are 52 Republicans in the 100-seat Senate, and the GOP needs a simple majority of votes to pass their version of the tax cut bill as soon as Thursday or Friday.

Justice Department lawyers representing President Trump say the Trump Organization's decision to walk away from its Trump SoHo hotel supports the argument for dismissing a lawsuit alleging the president is in violation of the Emoluments Clause of the Constitution.
In a letter to U.S. District Judge George Daniels in Manhattan on Friday, the Justice Department said that the exit from the SoHo location "undermines" a lawsuit from competing hotels and restaurants and watchdog groups arguing that Trump's business empire, including his hotels, amount to an illegal receipt of money from foreign governments, Reuters reported.
“This development undermines the hospitality plaintiffs’ reliance on alleged competition with the Trump SoHo to demonstrate standing,” the letter reportedly reads. 
The lawsuit claims that Trump is in violation of the Emoluments Clause, which prohibits elected leaders from receiving gifts or benefits from foreign officials, because he retains ownership of his businesses while in the White House.

Egypt’s security forces were on high alert Saturday after striking back at militants whose massacre of more than 300 people at a Sinai mosque raised fears of a new and bloodier phase in the country’s struggle against Islamist insurgents. 
Egypt’s state-run Information Service tried to portray Friday’s carnage — at least 305 dead, or about quarter of the male population of the village of Rawda — as a sign of “weakness, despair and collapse” among militants opting for easy civilian targets rather than hitting heavily armed security forces as in the past.

Volcanic eruptions on the Indonesian resort island of Bali have prompted officials to cancel flights and move about 24,000 residents out of the way as a thick ash cloud from Mount Agung, thousands of meters high, drifts east and southeast along the archipelago.
Residents were evacuated from 224 points around the island while Lombok International Airport on Pulau Lombok, the island due east of Bali, has closed temporarily, said Ari Ahsan, spokesman for Ngurah Rai International Airport in Bali.
At Ngurah Rai, Bali's main airport, flight cancellations stranded roughly 5,500 passengers, Ahsan said.
Indonesia's Center for Volcanology and Geological Hazard Mitigation raised its aviation notice from an orange alert to a red one Sunday.

At a senior staff meeting early in President Trump’s tenure, Reince Priebus, then the White House chief of staff, posed a simple question to Jared Kushner: What would his newly created Office of American Innovation do?
Mr. Kushner brushed him off, according to people privy to the exchange. Given that he and his top lieutenants were paid little or nothing, Mr. Kushner asked, “What do you care?” He emphasized his point with an expletive.
“O.K.,” Mr. Priebus replied. “You do whatever you want.”
Few in the opening days of the Trump administration dared to challenge Mr. Kushner’s power to design his job or steer the direction of the White House as he saw fit. But 10 months after being given free rein to tackle everything from the federal government’s outdated technology to peace in the Middle East, the do-whatever-you-want stage of Mr. Kushner’s tenure is over.
Mr. Kushner, the president’s son-in-law and senior adviser, who had been in seemingly every meeting and every photograph, has lately disappeared from public view and, according to some colleagues, taken on a more limited role behind the scenes. He is still forging ahead on a plan to end the conflict between Israel and the Palestinians, a goal that has eluded presidents and diplomats for generations, and he has been credited with focusing attention on the government’s technological needs. But he is no longer seen as the primary presidential consigliere with the limitless portfolio.

By the time Senator Mitch McConnell, the majority leader, made the last of his repeated pleas to President Trump to keep his distance from the Senate candidacy of Roy S. Moore, it was too late.
To Mr. McConnell, only the president could extinguish a fire that he sees as endangering Republicans’ Senate majority. But Mr. Trump, speaking by phone last Tuesday with Mr. McConnell, responded with the same argument he had been making for days inside the White House.
The women who have called Mr. Moore a sexual predator, the president believes, may not be telling the truth.
“Forty years is a long time. He’s run eight races, and this has never come up,” Mr. Trump said to the television cameras on the South Lawn hours after his conversation with Mr. McConnell, effectively endorsing Mr. Moore before boarding Marine One. “He says it didn’t happen,” the president added. “You have to listen to him, also.”

If you had to pick the year Time magazine’s “person of the year” jumped the shark, you’d probably start with 2006. That was when Time looked at the rise of open-publishing platforms like Wikipedia, YouTube, and Facebook, and decided the most influential person was the collective “you.” It was cheesy, trite, and had the exact effect Time wanted: everybody talked about it.
Time’s annual “person of the year” designation has always been a gimmick, going all the way back to Charles Lindbergh in 1927. Time was once a scrappy upstart, but for decades it was a very serious must-read magazine. Now that the heyday of newsmagazines has receded, the spectrum of people who have ever held a physical copy of Time in their hands has shriveled. Yet the “person of the year” still creates a residual media buzz—attention that, as my colleague David Graham wrote in 2012, really isn’t justified. “Year-end wrap-ups,” he wrote, “simply aren’t news.”

A man who survived the Las Vegas massacre in October died several weeks later in a hit-and-run in southern Nevada.
Roy McClellan, 52, was killed Nov. 17 when he was hit by a car in Pahrump, about 60 miles west of Las Vegas.
He was walking on the roadway when he got hit by a Chevrolet Camaro that fled the scene, according to the Nevada Highway Patrol.
McClellan and his wife made it out safely when a gunman opened fire at the Route 91 Harvest music festival on October 1, killing 58 people, his widow said.
The attack is the deadliest mass shooting in modern US history.

Pakistan's Law Minister Zahid Hamid apologized to protesters Sunday for provoking outrage and he assured the nation he believes in the finality of the Prophet Mohammed.
The apology came as Pakistani forces moved against protesters blocking a key road in the capital Sunday after demonstrators attacked a police checkpoint, state media reported.
The Pakistan Rangers have taken a position close to the Faizabad sit-in in Islamabad after protesters set ablaze a car and four motorbikes, witnesses said.
The rangers are an armed paramilitary force under the command of Pakistan's military.
At least two people have died and more than 250 others been injured in street demonstrations, according to hospital officials.
Protesters are demanding Hamid's resignation for what they consider blasphemy after parliamentary bills were amended, weakening rules that require lawmakers to reference the Prophet Mohammed when taking their oaths. The government has apologized and denied making such changes, calling them clerical mistakes.

Robert Mugabe and his wife are set to retire in luxury after Zimbabwe granted its deposed president a $10 million “golden goodbye” package.
The 93-year-old will also receive immunity from prosecution and full military protection despite being ousted by a military takeover.
On top of the lump sum, Mugabe will enjoy his full presidential salary of $150,000 until his death, after which time his 52-year-old wife Grace Mugabe will continue to receive half of the salary.
Mugabe resigned in on Tuesday, November 21, after 37 years in power. His resignation and paved the way for a smooth transition of power and brought to an end his impeachment hearing.
According to local media, a senior official of the ruling ZANU-PF party said the former president and his wife would receive $5m up front and the rest in installments.

An explosion in a port city south of Shanghai on Sunday killed two people and injured at least 30 others as it knocked down buildings and left streets littered with damaged cars and debris, the government and news reports said. 
The early morning explosion struck a riverfront neighborhood in Ningbo, one of China's busiest ports, the official Xinhua News Agency and other outlets reported. Xinhua said it occurred at a factory but a police statement said the cause was under investigation.
Two people were killed and two more seriously injured, the district office announced on its social media account. It gave no details of the deaths.
At least 30 others were taken to hospitals, according to Huanqiu.com, a website operated by the newspaper Global Times. It gave no details of their injuries.
China suffers frequent deadly fires and industrial accidents, often blamed on negligence.

For more than a dozen years, Alex Ovechkin has skated between two worlds: his country of birth and his professional home. He’s beloved, cheered and revered in both.
He regularly has tried to appease supporters in these disparate homes, making his living playing hockey in the United States’ capital while spending much of his offseason in Russia’s. And while the hockey star has never hidden his affection for Vladimir Putin, Ovechkin this month raised the stakes considerably, announcing on his Instagram account that he was organizing a movement to support the Russian president.

The Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB) today announced that Leandra English has been officially named deputy director of the agency. English, who had been most recently serving as the agency’s chief of staff, has previously held key leadership positions at the CFPB, the Office of Management and Budget, and the Office of Personnel Management. David Silberman, who had been serving as acting deputy director, will continue in his role as associate director of the Research, Markets, and Regulations division.
“Leandra is a seasoned professional who has spent her career of public service focused on promoting smooth and efficient operations. As deputy director, we will continue to benefit from Leandra’s in-depth knowledge of the operational needs of this agency and its staff,” said CFPB Director Richard Cordray. “I would like to thank David Silberman for taking on the additional role of acting deputy director during a busy time and appreciate his continued service as associate director of Research, Markets, and Regulations.”

Donald Trump’s motorcade was disrupted on Saturday, Nov. 25, by a driver in a red van who reportedly cut in and made “obscene gestures and screamed several expletives” at the U.S. president.
The incident happened as Trump made his way back to his Mar-a-Lago residence in Florida after spending his morning playing golf at Trump International in West Palm Beach.
“At one point a man in a red van attempted to cut into the motorcade,” a White House pool report stated. “Local law enforcement pulled over the vehicle, where the driver made obscene gestures and screamed several expletives.”
Trump’s trip to Trump International was the fourth day in a row that the president has visited one of his golf properties over the Thanksgiving holidays.
The Florida trip also marks the hundredth day he’s spent at a property he owns since his inauguration earlier this year.

North Korea issued a direct challenge to President Donald Trump with the launch of an ICBM missile that Defense Secretary James Mattis said demonstrates it has the ability to hit "everywhere in the world."
Pyongyang blasted a missile in the early hours of Wednesday morning local time that flew higher, and demonstrated a longer range, than any of its past tests, despite repeated warnings from Trump, who has said he would counter the isolated north Asian country with "fire and fury" if it threatened the US.
The missile spent around 53 minutes in the air, reaching a height of up to 4,500 kilometers (2,800 miles), before splashing down in waters around 210 kilometers (130 miles) west of Japan's Aomori prefecture, according to authorities in Japan and South Korea.
Hours after the launch, Trump sounded more restrained, telling reporters Tuesday at the White House that the US "will handle" the situation. "We will take care of it," the President said, adding later that North Korea "is a situation that we will handle."

The odds of a government shutdown grew dramatically Tuesday as President Trump tweeted that he saw no path to a year-end deal with Democrats “Chuck and Nancy,” who then promptly backed out of a meeting at the White House.
Shortly after Trump’s “I don’t see a deal!” tweet, Senate Minority Leader Charles Schumer (N.Y.) and House Minority Leader Nancy Pelosi (Calif.) said they didn’t see the point of sitting down with Trump. 
“If the President, who already said earlier this year that ‘our country needs a good shutdown,’ isn’t interested in addressing the difficult year end agenda,” the Democrats said in a statement, “we’ll work with those Republicans who are, as we did in April.”
Later, at the White House, flanked by empty chairs with name cards for Schumer and Pelosi, Trump said he was “not surprised” by the move and accused the Democrats of being “all talk” and “no action.”

CFPB power struggle rages on between Muvlaney, English
In a victory for the Trump White House, a temporary restraining order to halt the president's pick for acting director of the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB), Mick Mulvaney, was denied by a judge late Tuesday though the decision is likely to be appealed.
U.S. District Judge Timothy Kelly ruled in favor of Trump in his effort to appoint White House budget director Mulvaney to lead the bureau, the nation's top financial watchdog agency.
“Denying the president’s authority to appoint Mr. Mulvaney raises significant constitutional questions,” Kelly, a Trump nominee for the bench, said.
The ruling comes after a nasty partisan spat that pitted the Trump administration against an Obama-era holdover.
Leandra English was elevated to acting deputy director Friday when Richard Cordray resigned. The fight for control bled into the weekend and on Sunday, English filed an emergency restraining order to keep Mulvaney out.

Adding fuel to its growing feud with President Donald Trump, CNN told POLITICO it will be boycotting the White House Christmas party for the media this year.
“CNN will not be attending this year's White House Christmas party,” a CNN spokesperson said. “In light of the President's continued attacks on freedom of the press and CNN, we do not feel it is appropriate to celebrate with him as his invited guests. We will send a White House reporting team to the event and report on it if news warrants.”
The annual event, scheduled for Friday at 2 p.m., is typically seen as a time when reporters and their bosses can mingle freely with administration members, but Trump's posture toward the press has been uniquely aggressive.
Since Trump began his run for office, CNN has been one of his favorite targets. He has often criticized the network as “fake news” and alleged that the network makes up stories.

Sen. Lindsey Graham, R-S.C., defended President Trump’s tweets from over the weekend that called CNN International a “major source of (Fake) news” and explained why many Republicans distrust CNN’s reporting.
CNN anchor Wolf Blitzer pressed Graham on Tuesday about whether he was concerned about the Libyan media questioning the credibility of a CNN report on Libyan slave auctions after seeing Trump’s tweet.
“Well, I think the President feels like that CNN and every other major news outlet in this country is just unfair to the point of being over-the-top unfair,” Graham said in response. “I think there's some truth to that. But you're a good news organization.”
Graham then noted that the reporting on the Libyan slave auctions was “well done” and said he hoped Trump knew the report was “real.”
“But you've got to understand, too, that if you're President Trump, you can't turn on CNN or any other news network in the country without somebody beating the hell out of him,” Graham added. “And I guess that wears on him.”

The Washington Post says a woman who approached reporters with a story that Alabama Senate candidate Roy Moore got her pregnant as a teen actually "appears to be part of undercover sting operation" run by conservative activist James O'Keefe — suspicions the newspaper says were confirmed when the woman was spotted walking into the offices of Project Veritas on Monday.
O'Keefe, who founded Project Veritas, is countering the newspaper's story with his own narrative, releasing secretly recorded videos of Post employees that he says prove "how shockingly one-sided their editorial team is."
O'Keefe and the Post have put out dueling videos of a brief interview outside his offices on Monday in which the conservative activist seeks to turn the tables and question Post reporter Aaron C. Davis, who repeatedly asks O'Keefe whether the woman works for him.
The Post also published video footage of one of its reporters speaking to the woman who claimed to be Moore's victim. In it, reporter Stephanie McCrummen asks her who she is working for and tells her, "If there's anything you want to say about why you're here and how you came to be sitting here, I really would like to know that story as well."

Since his election in 2013, Pope Francis has constantly used his pulpit to champion the downtrodden and draw attention to the misery of the powerless and the persecuted.
He risked the fury of Turkey by describing the mass killings of Armenians in World War I as a genocide. He apologized for the silence of church leaders in the Rwandan genocide of 1994. And three months ago, he denounced “the persecution of our Rohingya brothers,” referring to the Muslim minority that has suffered a systematic campaign of murder, rape and arson by Myanmar’s military.
“I would like to express my full closeness to them,” he said at the Vatican at the time, “and let all of us ask the Lord to save them, and to raise up men and women of good will to help them, who shall give them their full rights.”

Saudi Arabia has released Prince Mutaib bin Abdullah, the most influential of the hundreds of businessmen and current or former officials detained three weeks ago in an anti-corruption crackdown, an associate of the royal family and an American official tracking the events each said Tuesday.
The release of Prince Mutaib, who had been held along with the others in a five-star Ritz-Carlton hotel in Riyadh, is a sign that the officials leading the crackdown are moving expeditiously to resolve some of the claims. But the kingdom has disclosed almost nothing about the charges against any of the detainees or about any settlement talks with them, so final outcomes, including in the case of Prince Mutaib, may be difficult to discern.
It could not be immediately determined if the prince, 65, was now able to move freely; it was more likely that he had been transferred to some form of house arrest, the American official said. It also could not be determined if he had surrendered any assets in exchange for his provisional release, or whether his assets remained frozen.

A volcano with a deadly history on Indonesia's Bali, one of the world's most popular resort islands, has spewed ash 7,600 meters (4.7 miles) high and closed the island's international airport for a third day Wednesday.
Authorities have told 100,000 people to leave an area extending 10 kilometers (6 miles) from Mount Agung as it belches grey and white ash plumes, the low clouds hanging over the volcano at times hued red from the lava welling in the crater. The volcano's last major eruption in 1963 killed about 1,100 people, but it's unclear how bad the current eruption might get or how long it could last.
Officials extended the closure of Bali's international airport for another 24 hours due to concerns the thick volcanic ash could harm aircraft.
Airport spokesman Ari Ahsanurrohim said more than 440 flights were canceled Tuesday, affecting nearly 60,000 passengers, about the same as Monday. The closure was in effect until Thursday morning. Without aircraft, getting in or out of Bali requires traveling hours by land and taking a boat to another island, enduring choppy seas in Bali's rainy season.

Even though the announcement only came yesterday that Prince Harry would be marrying American-born actress Meghan Markle, an event that marries the Camelot of the U.K. with the celebrity excitement of Hollywood, these bars have already concocted cocktails in their honor — cocktails that are sure to have their customers feeling just a little bit royal themselves.
In 1986, the Queen of England dined for her first time in a public restaurant and it was at Trader Vic’s in San Francisco, famous for supposedly inventing the Mai Tai. She was in the States to see then-President Ronald Reagan and spent a couple of days on his ranch, overlooking the Santa Ynez Valley in California. A bad storm put a kink in this plan and at the last minute she was flown to the city. A man called Bill Bacon arranged for the Queen, Prince Philip and Nancy Reagan, along with about 40 guests, to have dinner at the San Francisco Trader Vic's in the famous Trafalgar Room.

Tampa police are questioning a person in connection with four fatal shootings within a month in the city's Seminole Heights neighborhood, Tampa Police Chief Brian Dugan said Tuesday.
Dugan said police were acting on a tip about a man with a gun when they confronted the person at a local McDonald's and confiscated the weapon. Police are interviewing the person at headquarters to learn more about the firearm, and any possible connection to the killings.
The person is not under arrest or in police custody, Dugan said. The police chief said authorities don't know if the gun was used in the killings.
Dugan said the person "might be completely innocent," but added: "I'm optimistic on this one but only time will tell. We have a lot of work to do."
Police wouldn't elaborate about why they think the person may be connected to the killings.
close dialog

The search is intensifying for a missing 17-year-old Florida girl and a 27-year-old soccer coach from her high school who authorities say are together and might be headed northeast, potentially to New York or Canada.
Caitlyn Frisina, 17, and Rian Rodriguez, 27, might be traveling north after the teen left her home on her own, leaving behind her phone, "which she fully erased," the Columbia County Sheriff's office said in a Facebook post on Sunday. Police said they found footprints outside of the teen's home, and she appears to have left through a window.
Frisina's parents told police they had "no indicators" of "any type of relationship between these two," Murray Smith, public information officer for the Columbia County Sheriff’s Office, told ABC News today.
From interviews, authorities said they have learned of what Smith described as the "blossoming of a potential relationship" between Frisina and Rodriguez.

Following the news of NBC's decision to fire Matt Lauer over sexual misconduct claims, many of the host's former colleagues spoke out in shock and dismay about the charges. .
NBC News chairman Andy Lack announced Lauer's termination in a memo to staff that was read at the top of Wednesday's Today show, citing "detailed complaint from a colleague about inappropriate sexual behavior in the workplace" for the reason behind his firing.
Natalie Morales, who co-anchored the Today show with Lauer before replacing Billy Bush on Access Hollywood, discussed his firing on Access Hollywood Live Wednesday morning, saying she "woke up to the news like everyone this morning — just in shock."
Morales acknowledged the rumors that she and Lauer had an affair, which they have both previously denied. “I have personally dealt with rumors in the past for years that were hurtful to me, my family – they diminished my hard work. I’ve addressed those rumors head-on in the past," she said. "That is not the story today. The story today is the courage of a colleague who did come forward, and when and if she wants to tell her story publicly, I’m sure she will. But it did take a lot of courage for her to come forward. It was no doubt a very painful decision.”

Early Wednesday morning, President Trump made a British white nationalist group very happy — even exultant.
“THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES, DONALD TRUMP, HAS RETWEETED THREE OF DEPUTY LEADER JAYDA FRANSEN'S TWITTER VIDEOS! DONALD TRUMP HIMSELF HAS RETWEETED THESE VIDEOS AND HAS AROUND 44 MILLION FOLLOWERS! GOD BLESS YOU TRUMP! GOD BLESS AMERICA!” read a tweet from the main Twitter account of Britain First, which bills itself as a political party but has been widely condemned as an extremist group that targets mosques and Muslims.

Washington (CNN)Donald Trump potentially has millions of lives in his hands as the threat of a devastating war with North Korea swiftly escalates.
Yet the President of the United States is raising new questions about his temperament, his judgment and his understanding of the resonance of his global voice and the gravity of his role with a wild sequence of insults, inflammatory tweets and bizarre comments.
On Wednesday Trump caused outrage and sparked fears of violent reprisals against Americans and US interests overseas by retweeting graphic anti-Muslim videos by an extreme far right British hate group. Earlier this week he used a racial slur in front of Native American war heroes. He's attacked global press freedom, after cozying up to autocrats on his recent Asia tour.
And now there are reports that the President has revived conspiracy theories about former President Barack Obama's birthplace and is suggesting an "Access Hollywood" video on which he was heard boasting sexually assaulting women, and for which he apologized last year, had been doctored.

After a nearly two-month search, Tampa police arrested and charged a 24-year-old man with four counts of murder in connection to a series of fatal shootings that had terrified residents in the city's Seminole Heights neighborhood.
Howell Donaldson III was taken into custody Tuesday afternoon at a nearby McDonald's after police recovered a gun that they said had been used in the four killings.
Donaldson admitted that he owned the gun but did not admit to the killings, Tampa Police Chief Brian Dugan said, but police are convinced that they finally caught the person responsible.
"We've had other guns, but we knew this was the one," Dugan said. "Now the work begins to shore up the case and get a full prosecution."
The arrest came 51 days after the first of four shootings in Seminole Heights, each of which targeted citizens doing ordinary things, like waiting at a bus stop or crossing the street. The four seemingly unconnected victims were each killed -- but not robbed -- while walking alone at night within a half-mile area, police said, leading to fears of a serial killer on the loose.
close dialog

The court session in The Hague was meant to be the final act of a decades-long legal process over the atrocities of the Bosnian and Croatian wars. Instead, it descended into chaos, confusion and, ultimately, death.
As judges at the International Criminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia were delivering rulings on Wednesday on appeals related to Croatia’s involvement in the 1992-95 Bosnian conflict, one of the six defendants, Slobodan Praljak, addressed the court.
“Slobodan Praljak is not a war criminal,” he declared slowly and deliberately in Croatian, just moments after judges upheld Mr. Praljak’s 20-year jail sentence for war crimes and crimes against humanity. “I reject yourjudgment with contempt.”
In a scene befitting the movie director Mr. Praljak had been before the Bosnian war erupted, he pulled out a small container, raised it to his lips and ostentatiously swallowed the contents.
His lawyer then announced that Mr. Praljak, a tall, distinguished-looking man with silver hair and a goatee, had ingested poison.

President Donald Trump is eager to sign into law big changes to the tax code.
The House approved its tax rewrite on Nov. 16, and the Senate is trying to clear its version with a full vote this week.
If the Senate passes the measure, the two chambers will have to iron out their differences in a version that can pass both chambers.
Both plans lower individual income tax rates for the middle class. However, they use a slower-growing inflation measure than the one used now, which causes income bracket thresholds to grow more slowly and thus eventually pushes more people into higher tax brackets.
Both bills reduce the corporate income tax from 35 percent to 20 percent.
They also switch the United States to a territorial system, which only taxes income earned within a country's borders. The Senate bill is more favorable to multinationals, with provisions that increase taxes on intangible income earned abroad while incentivizing the re-entry of intangible assets.

Two American men who were reportedly honeymooning in Thailand were detained after they shared photos of their exposed butts taken at two famous Bangkok temples.
The pair, Joseph and Travis DaSilva of San Diego, both 38, were arrested at Don Mueang International Airport in Bangkok on Tuesday, just days after they uploaded photos of their bared backsides to Instagram, the Bangkok Post reported; the photos were taken at Wat Arun (The Temple of Dawn) and Wat Pho temples.
“They were detained as they were about to leave Thailand,” said Col. Cherngron Rimpadee, an immigration police spokesman. The colonel said the couple were on a “watch list” after their social media posts caught authorities’ attention.
"Once they are through with the charges, the Thai immigration police will revoke their visas and push for deportation," he said, according to the BBC. "They will also be blacklisted from coming back to Thailand."
He added that the two men admitted to taking down their pants and posing for photos at the temples.

Brexit supporters accused Prime Minister Theresa May on Wednesday of being far too weak with the European Union after reports that she is ready to pay what Brussels is demanding to settle the divorce bill to leave the bloc.
The Daily Telegraph newspaper said the net bill would total 45 billion to 55 billion pounds. While some UK officials have cast doubt on the numbers, the sides are moving closer to a deal on cash.
Brexit campaigner Nigel Farage told Reuters that Britain should walk away from the talks rather than offer such sums.
“This is a complete sell-out that is not in our national interest,” said Farage, a former leader of the UK Independence Party (UKIP) who played a big role in the 2016 referendum in which 52 percent of Britons voted to leave the EU.
“The British prime minister needs to say: ‘Look, either start to behave reasonably, either start to behave in a grown-up way, or ... we are walking away’,” said Farage, who remains a member of the European Parliament.
In the referendum, 17.4 million voters backed leaving the EU while 16.1 million voters backed remaining. Britain is due to leave on March 29, 2019, but is yet to clinch a deal with Brussels on the overall divorce terms.

Behind closed doors, President Trump has revived a conspiracy theory that his predecessor Barack Obama was not born in the U.S., according to a report.
A senator who spoke to the New York Times on the condition of anonymity recounted a conversation with Trump in which he questioned the authenticity of President Barack Obama’s birth certificate, a falsehood he has fueled since 2011.
Trump has repeated the theory in recent months, even though he held a press conference in September 2016 and announced, “President Obama was born in the United States — period.”
Three years after Obama released a short-form birth certificate in 2008 to quell rumors he was born in Kenya, Trump revived the birther movement to undermine the legitimacy of the country’s first black President.

The Trump administration is holding talks on providing nuclear technology to Saudi Arabia — a move that critics say could upend decades of U.S. policy and lead to an arms race in the Middle East.
The Saudi government wants nuclear power to free up more oil for export, but current and former American officials suspect the country’s leaders also want to keep up with the enrichment capabilities of their rival, Iran.
Saudi Arabia needs approval from the U.S. in order to receive sensitive American technology. Past negotiations broke down because the Saudi government wouldn’t commit to certain safeguards against eventually using the technology for weapons.
Now the Trump administration has reopened those talks and might not insist on the same precautions. At a Senate hearing on Nov. 28, Christopher Ford, the National Security Council’s senior director for weapons of mass destruction and counterproliferation, disclosed that the U.S. is discussing the issue with the Saudi government. He called the safeguards a “desired outcome” but didn’t commit to them.

A majority of Supreme Court justices seemed to agree Wednesday that the abundance of private information available about Americans in the digital age might require new restraints on government’s ability to access it.
In the case before the court, that might mean law enforcement must prove more to a judge about suspected criminal wrongdoing to collect cell-tower records that can provide what Justice Elena Kagan called “24/7” tracking of a person.
But the justices indicated that was only one issue implicated by an explosion of digital information that is transforming Americans’ expectation of privacy.

Almost lost amid the furor surrounding President Donald Trump’s widely condemned promotion Wednesday morning of anti-Muslim videos was the president’s suggestion that his current media nemesis, Joe Scarborough, was somehow involved in the tragic death of an intern in 2001. Though PolitiFact has ruled Trump’s tweet “pants on fire,” the urban myths surrounding the death of Scarborough intern Lori Klausutis in his Florida district office have never truly disappeared from the fever swamps, and the president seemed to give them new life by suggesting MSNBC fire Scarborough based on this “unsolved mystery.”
“Looks like I picked a good day to stop responding to Trump’s bizarre tweets,” Scarborough replied. “He is not well.”
Although Trump’s tweet, a pedestrian attack beneath the dignity of the office of the President, is disgusting in its own right, the unfortunate reality is that there is no viable legal action Scarborough can take against the president for libel or defamation for one simple reason: The president is immune.

The White House has developed a plan to force out Secretary of State Rex W. Tillerson, whose relationship with President Trump has been strained, and replace him with Mike Pompeo, the C.I.A. director, perhaps within the next several weeks, senior administration officials said on Thursday.
Mr. Pompeo would be replaced at the C.I.A. by Senator Tom Cotton, a Republican from Arkansas who has been a key ally of the president on national security matters, according to the White House plan. Mr. Cotton has signaled that he would accept the job if offered, said the officials, who insisted on anonymity to discuss sensitive deliberations before decisions are announced.
It was not immediately clear whether Mr. Trump has given final approval to the plan, but he has been said to have soured on Mr. Tillerson and in general is ready to make a change at the State Department. Mr. Tillerson was at the White House on Thursday morning, although he was not listed on the White House public schedule.
Asked by reporters if he wanted Mr. Tillerson to stay on the job on Thursday, Mr. Trump said only, “He’s here. Rex is here.”

Matt Lauer expressed “sorrow and regret for the pain I have caused” in a statement on Thursday morning, his first public comments after NBC News fired the star “Today” show anchor amid allegations of inappropriate sexual behavior with colleagues.
“Some of what is being said about me is untrue or mischaracterized, but there is enough truth in these stories to make me feel embarrassed and ashamed,” Mr. Lauer wrote in a message issued by his public relations team. “I regret that my shame is now shared by the people I cherish dearly.”
“There are no words to express my sorrow and regret for the pain I have caused others by words and actions,” Mr. Lauer wrote. “To the people I have hurt, I am truly sorry. As I am writing this I realize the depth of the damage and disappointment I have left behind at home and at NBC.”
Mr. Lauer’s abrupt downfall comes amid a head-spinning series of harassment and abuse claims that have toppled powerful men in journalism, comedy, Hollywood and Silicon Valley, including the movie mogul Harvey Weinstein and another famed television morning host, Charlie Rose of CBS.

Sen. John McCain (R-Ariz.) said on Thursday that he will support the Senate Republicans' tax plan, which GOP leadership wants to pass this week.
“After careful thought and consideration, I have decided to support the Senate tax reform bill. I believe this legislation, though far from perfect, would enhance American competitiveness, boost the economy, and provide long overdue tax relief for middle class families," McCain said in a statement.
McCain added that the Senate legislation would "directly benefit all Americans, allowing them to keep a higher percentage of what they earn."
McCain's decision is the latest boost to Republicans, after every GOP senator voted to start debate on the legislation Wednesday evening.
It's also a reversal from the ObamaCare repeal effort in July, when McCain joined with GOP Sens. Susan Collins (Maine) and Lisa Murkowski (Alaska) to kill the "skinny repeal" legislation. Murkowski announced on Wednesday that she would back the tax-reform bill.

The British backlash to President Trump picked up steam Thursday with fresh calls to cancel a planned a state visit and Britain’s prime minister standing by her denunciations of Trump’s retweets of a fringe anti-Muslim group.
Prime Minister Theresa May blasted Trump for crossing a line by posting the inflammatory videos on his Twitter page Wednesday — and then warning May to essentially mind her own business and focus on Islamist terror instead of him.

An Army veteran says Sen. Al Franken groped her in December 2003, telling CNN that while she was deployed in Kuwait, the Minnesota Democrat cupped her breast during a photo op.
Stephanie Kemplin, 41, of Maineville, Ohio, is the fifth woman in two weeks to accuse Franken of inappropriate touching, and the second person to allege that such behavior took place while Franken was on a USO tour. Three of the five women have been identified by name.
Kemplin said while she was stationed in the Middle East during the Iraq War, she met Franken -- at the time, a comedian and writer -- as he was visiting American troops with the USO. A longtime fan of "Saturday Night Live," Kemplin got in line to take a photo with Franken.
"When he put his arm around me, he groped my right breast. He kept his hand all the way over on my breast," Kemplin said in an interview. "I've never had a man put their arm around me and then cup my breast. So he was holding my breast on the side."
Kemplin repeatedly used the word "embarrassed" to describe her immediate reaction at the time.

Russell Simmons announced on Thursday that he is stepping down from leadership roles in business after writer Jenny Lumet accused him of sexual assault in 1991 in a column for The Hollywood Reporter.
The immediate responses from Hollywood and Republican politicians have been telling
Lumet – the screenwriter behind Rachel Getting Married and The Mummy – alleges in a detailed account that Simmons offered her a chauffeured ride home in 1991. When she got in the car, however, Simmons told his driver to lock the doors, took Lumet to his apartment and sexually assaulted her. "At no time that night did I say: 'Russell, I will go home with you,'" Lumet writes. "Or, 'Come home with me.' Or 'I will have sex with you.' Or 'I have the desire to have sex with you.'"
Simmons issued a statement shortly after The Hollywood Reporter published Lumet's article. "While I have never been violent, I have been thoughtless and insensitive in some of my relationships over many decades and I sincerely and humbly apologize," Simmons wrote. "This is a time of great transition. The voices of the voiceless, those who have been hurt or shamed, deserve and need to be heard. As the corridors of power inevitably make way for a new generation, I don't want to be a distraction, so I am removing myself from the businesses that I founded."

As the judge at The Hague read out a verdict confirming Slobodan Praljak's 20-year prison term for war crimes, the white-bearded former Bosnian Croat general rose to his feet.
"Slobodan Praljak is not a war criminal. I am rejecting your verdict with contempt," Praljak shouted defiantly.
He then tilted his head back and drank from a small vial. As the judge appealed for him to sit down, Praljak declared: "I have taken poison."
The judge, looking disconcerted, suspended proceedings. The International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia confirmed later Wednesday that Praljak had been given immediate medical help in the courtroom before being taken to the hospital, where he died.
Authorities in the Netherlands were on Thursday urgently investigating what the substance was and how Praljak was able to obtain it while being held in UN detention.

An angry father of a murder victim detonated two grenades in a Ukrainian court Thursday, killing himself and at least one other person.
The blast went off at a courthouse in Nikopol, a town in southern Ukraine, the BBC reported citing local news sources.
Those present during the explosion were attending a hearing for a murder trial from a February 2016 shooting that appeared to stem from a territorial struggle in connection with a known drug trafficking area.
Three of those on trial were wounded in the blast, the BBC reports. The defendants were accused of firing on a vehicle with an assault rifle and fatally striking two of the passengers.
At least nine people were wounded in the incident, including two convoy officers, a court officer, a prosecutor and civilians, police said.
All the victims were transported to local hospitals with "shard injuries."

Malaysia’s high-profile trial of two women accused of killing the estranged half brother of North Korean leader goes on recess Thursday with the last hearing until next year.
Indonesia’s Siti Aisyah, 25, and Vietnam’s Doan Thi Huong, 29, are accused of smearing a nerve agent on Kim Jong Nam’s face in a crowded airport terminal in Kuala Lumpur on Feb. 13. The two are the only suspects in custody, though prosecutors have said four North Koreans who have since fled the country were also involved.
Prosecutors have focused on proving the women’s guilt but shied away from scrutinizing any political motive behind the killing. Defense lawyers, who say their clients were duped into carrying out the attack, will look to shift that focus when the trial resumes Jan. 22.
Kim Jong Nam was captured on airport security camera footage as he was approached by two women, who appear to smear something on his face. Footage showed Kim gesturing for help before he suffered seizures. He was dead within two hours.
Kim was carrying four diplomatic passports that identified him as Kim Chol, aged 46.

A day after its latest intercontinental ballistic missile launch, North Korea released photos of what it’s calling the “Hwasong-15.” And the collective response from missile experts was — not to get too technical — whoa.
The missile and its launcher truck do, at first blush, appear to support North Korea’s claim that this missile is much more technologically advanced than previous iterations.
Although there is still much that can’t be gleaned from the photos, and North Korea does have an inglorious record of exaggeration, analysts generally agree that the Hwasong-15 marks a significant leap forward in North Korea’s missile development.

A 24-year-old college graduate who was arrested in a string of deadly shootings that terrorized a Florida neighborhood was ordered held without bond Thursday on four counts of premeditated first-degree murder.
Howell Emanuel Donaldson was arrested Tuesday after he asked a co-worker at a McDonald's restaurant to hold a bag carrying a gun. The co-worker looked inside the bag, spotted the weapon and approached a Tampa police officer who was sitting in the restaurant doing paperwork. When Donaldson returned to the McDonald's, police were waiting.
The arrest brought immense relief to the Seminole Heights neighborhood, where many outdoor activities had stopped since the first death Oct. 9. Two more fatal shootings happened in the weeks that followed, and residents were so scared that police escorted children while they trick-or-treated. The fourth killing happened in November.
Judge Margaret R. Taylor set a Tuesday hearing to determine whether Donaldson will be held in jail until his trial. Appearing via a video linkup from the Hillsborough County Jail, Donaldson was shackled and wore a sleeveless, blue padded anti-suicide vest. Two bailiffs held him by the arms during the hearing as family members of the victims watched from the courtroom.

Across the media and entertainment universe, powerful men—as of writing, Garrison Keillor is the latest; as of reading, who even knows?—are being felled quickly after allegations of sexual harassment and sexual abuse.
But inside politics, the repercussions have, so far, been softer. Minnesota Democratic Senator Al Franken, accused of groping several women and giving another an unwanted kiss, has offered a strange mix of contrition and defiance in saying he will stay in office. Roy Moore, the GOP Alabama U.S. Senate candidate, has bounced back in polls after multiple allegations against him that range from the creepy to the criminal. Behind them looms President Trump, who was even recorded boasting about sexual assaults. (Behind him looms Bill Clinton, who escaped impeachment and settled into elder-statesman status.)
But the case of Representative John Conyers, the otherwise venerable Michigan Democrat, is a particularly complex one. It demonstrates the way that a man’s stature can protect him, and how that stature plays into the backlash against him. It also shows how one generation’s pioneers often end up as the next generation’s impediments to progress.

Former Trump national security adviser Michael Flynn will plead guilty Friday to "willfully and knowingly" making "false, fictitious and fraudulent statements" to the FBI about conversations with Russia's ambassador, according to court documents.
He is due to appear in court later Friday morning, a court spokesperson said. The White House declined to immediately comment.
Flynn is the first Trump administration official and the fourth connected to the campaign to be charged as part of special counsel Robert Mueller's investigation into possible collusion between the Russian government and members of Trump's team, as well as potential obstruction of justice and financial crimes.
Trump's former campaign chairman Paul Manafort and his deputy Rick Gates were indicted last month; they pleaded not guilty. And Trump campaign foreign policy adviser George Papadopoulos pleaded guilty for making a false statement to the FBI over contacts with officials connected to the Russian government.

Time is quickly running out for U.S. Secretary of State Rex Tillerson.
America’s top diplomat heads to Europe next week hobbled by reports that the White House is preparing to oust him. On stops in Brussels, Vienna and Paris, he’ll face foreign leaders who will do their best to express comity but also wonder how much longer he’ll remain in the job.
Trump administration officials said privately Thursday that the president is considering replacing Tillerson with CIA Director Mike Pompeo. Publicly, officials offered a tepid defense of the secretary of state, while President Donald Trump sidestepped the question entirely.
“I think it’s a death blow,” Thomas Wright, director of the Center on the United States and Europe at the Brookings Institution, said Thursday. “The secretary of state is only powerful in the sense that he’s a voice for the president or the administration, and what they did to him today is just devastating.”

President Donald Trump said he wouldn’t benefit financially from the Republican tax legislation on Capitol Hill. In fact, he said he would get socked by it.
"So right now, America's tax code is a total dysfunctional mess," Trump said in a speech in St. Charles, Mo., on Nov. 29, 2017. "The current system has cost our nation millions of American jobs, trillions and trillions of dollars, and billions of hours wasted on paperwork and compliance. It is riddled with loopholes that let some special interests -- including myself, in all fairness. This is going to cost me a fortune, this thing -- believe me. Believe me, this is not good for me."
Trump’s claim sounded dubious. The analyses of the bills we have seen show advantages, not disadvantages, for the wealthy as well as corporations.

A San Francisco jury acquitted an illegal immigrant Thursday charged with killing Kate Steinle, the 32-year-old woman whose death President Trump used to justify his proposed border wall and his crackdown on “sanctuary cities.”
Steinle was shot in the back as she and her father strolled along Pier 14 in San Francisco on July 1, 2015. Jose Ines Garcia Zarate, a much-deported illegal immigrant from Mexico, had been released from jail, where he was being held on a drug charge, even though federal immigration authorities had sought to detain him.
Steinle signed a confession during a police interrogation and while it was admitted at the trial, defense lawyers took issue with its validity and the circumstances under which it was obtained.
The case was one of the most politicized criminal trials in years, a fact the judge instructed the jurors to ignore.
In a tweet hours after Thursday’s verdict, Trump called it “disgraceful.”

Late night host Jimmy Kimmel took his Twitter spat with Alabama Senate candidate Roy Moore offline Thursday night, delivering a monologue on his own understanding of “Christian values” and lobbing insults at the Republican accused of molesting teenage girls as young as 14.
The two began trading barbs online earlier Thursday, when Moore addressed Kimmel on Twitter, writing “if you want to mock our Christian values, come down here to Alabama and do it man to man,” in response to a bit the ABC late night host had filmed at a Moore rally. Kimmel quickly accepted, albeit with an insult, “sounds great Roy - let me know when you get some Christian values and I’ll be there!”
Kimmel offered a lengthier rebuke of Moore, who has built his campaign in large part around his identity as a Christian, in his Thursday night monologue.

The latest twist in the wild Tennessee coaching search involves the Vols making a trip out to Los Angeles to meet with Washington State head coach Mike Leach, two sources told SI.
Word is the meeting with Leach and Tennessee AD John Currie lasted a few hours and went "very well," SI has learned. And I’m told there would be genuine interest in the Vols job from the Washington State head man. However this whole deal is complicated by the dynamic swirling around within UT’s leadership. We’ve heard from multiple sources there is a lot of in-fighting, finger-pointing and back-stabbing taking place amongst Tennessee brass. As SI reported earlier this week, there is a growing faction at Tennessee pushing to get Currie removed. Former Vols head coach Phil Fulmer is said to be one of those battling with Currie and that could muck up the process to reel in Leach.
Leach is also getting interest from Arkansas for its head coaching vacancy.

In a St. Louis suburb this week to sell the Republican tax bill, President Donald Trump appeared on stage with twin symbols of his vision of the country's heritage - a pair of American flags and a row of Christmas trees, adorned with red, white and blue ornaments.
"I told you that we would be saying 'Merry Christmas' again," Trump said, eliciting roars of approval from hundreds of supporters at the St. Charles Convention Center.
The theme had little to do with the president's push on taxes, aside from a reference early in his 46-minute speech that tax cuts would serve as a"big, beautiful Christmas present" to the economy. But the backdrop made clear that a president who has repeatedly used the flag to win leverage in a debate over the meaning of NFL players' protests during the national anthem was prepared to weaponize the trees in another front in the culture wars.
Trump was signaling to his base that he was following through on a campaign promise to shelve what he and his supporters view as political correctness aimed at marginalizing the nation's Christian majority in the name of diversity.

Desperate relatives pleaded with Argentine officials not to end efforts to rescue 44 crew members aboard a missing submarine after the navy announced Thursday it had shifted its focus to a search-only mission, effectively acknowledging there's no hope they'll be found alive.
The announcement, more than two weeks after the ARA San Juan disappeared off Argentina's coast, shocked and angered relatives, including some who fainted or needed medical attention upon hearing the news, Susana Alvarez, a friend of one of the missing officers, told state-run news agency Télam.
"We feel that they are still alive," one woman told CNN affiliate Todo Noticias. "Please do not suspend the rescue."

Pope Francis referred to the Rohingya people by name on Friday, the first time he has directly addressed Myanmar's persecuted Muslim minority in his Asia tour.
"The presence of God today is also called Rohingya," the Pope said after speaking to an interfaith audience in the Bangladeshi capital of Dhaka.
He did not use the term in public earlier in the week in Myanmar, to the dismay of campaigners for the Rohingya, whose stories of escaping violence in the country have provoked international condemnation. Friday is the final full day of his trip.
After his speech, the Pope met a group of Rohingya refugees one by one, giving some of them blessings and listening to the stories of others.

Japan's much admired Emperor Akihito is set to abdicate on April 30, 2019, at age 85 in the first such departure from the Chrysanthemum Throne in about 200 years, the government said Friday.
Akihito's elder son Crown Prince Naruhito will ascend the throne a day later, beginning a new as yet unnamed era.
The decision was made Friday at a meeting of the Imperial House Council, which was chaired by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and included parliamentary leaders, supreme court judges and imperial family members.
Akihito expressed his apparent wish to abdicate in August 2016, citing his age and health.
Abe will provide the summary of the meeting at the next Cabinet session early next week ahead of the formal approval expected on Dec. 8, Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga told reporters.

Many may associate Meghan Markle with the hit TV show "Suits", or for her relationship with Prince Harry. But the American actress is also known for her commitment to championing women's rights.
As a humanitarian, Markle has made a name for herself in the activism world by getting involved in a number of philanthropic projects. To date, the TV and movie actress has been bestowed the title of global ambassador for World Vision, advocate for UN Women, and counsellor for One Young World, a U.K.-based charity.
While the actress has been seen as a key figure in raising global attention to gender equality as of late, Markle herself claims her activist nature dates back to before she was a teenager.
"When I was just 11 years old, I unknowingly and somehow accidentally became a female advocate," Markle said at the UN Women's "20th anniversary of the Fourth World Conference of Women in Beijing" event in 2015.

The White House has a vermin problem.
A number of work orders at the White House show it is overrun with cockroaches and mice, which have taken up residence in the situation room as well as a mess hall in the basement of the West Wing, NBC reported.
Mouse traps were also set outside Vice President Mike Pence’s outer office along with the ground floor of the West Wing.
It appears the traps worked — later entries noted dead mice, with one request reading, “Landscape shop to check all the traps in the West Wing...because they’re smelling something funky or dead mouse.”
Trump once ordered Priebus to kill a fly in the Oval Office
In addition to dealing with the pressures of the job, Chief of Staff John Kelly has to contend with a colony of ants living in his office.
The Oval Office bathroom was also in need of a new toilet seat, with directions that it be installed “after hours please.”

The Senate passed the most sweeping tax rewrite in decades early Saturday, with Republicans lining up to approve an overhaul that will touch almost every corner of the United States economy, affecting families, small business owners and multinational corporations, with the biggest benefits flowing to the highest-earning Americans.
Senators voted 51-49, as Republicans approved the nearly 500-page bill in the early morning hours after lawmakers received a rewritten version, which contained significant changes from the original bill that passed two Senate panels last month along party lines.
Mitch McConnell, the Senate majority leader and Kentucky Republican, called it “a great day for the country.”
The president praised Republican lawmakers on Saturday morning on Twitter, saying, “Biggest Tax Bill and Tax Cuts in history just passed in the Senate. Now these great Republicans will be going for final passage. Thank you to House and Senate Republicans for your hard work and commitment!”

After six months of work, special counsel Robert S. Mueller III has indicted two advisers to President Trump and accepted guilty pleas from two others in exchange for their cooperation with his probe into Russian meddling in the 2016 election — a sign of mounting legal peril for the White House.
With the guilty plea Friday by former national security adviser Michael Flynn — one of Trump’s closest and most valued aides — the investigation has swept up an array of figures with intimate knowledge of the campaign, the transition and the White House.
It appears to have swiftly expanded beyond Russia’s interference in the campaign to encompass a range of activities, including contacts with Russian officials during the transition and alleged money laundering that took place long before Trump ran for office.
And Flynn’s agreement to fully cooperate with investigators suggests that Mueller is not done yet.

Authorities in North Carolina arrested the live-in boyfriend of 3-year-old Mariah Woods’ mother and charged him with multiple offenses, including concealing death, despite the fact that the missing toddler has not yet been found.
The Onslow County Sheriff’s Office and the FBI detained 32-year-old Earl Kimery Friday in connection with the disappearance of the toddler, WRAL reported. He's accused of "removing Mariah Woods' body from the scene of her death and did conceal Mariah Woods' death and body, knowing that Mariah died from unnatural causes. The defendant acted with deceit and intent to fraud," according to the arrest warrant.
The Sheriff’s office in a statement early Saturday morning announced evidence collected during their investigation has led them to believe Mariah is dead.
“At this time, the location of Mariah is unknown,” the statement said. “The searches now will shift to a recovery process.”

Alabama’s closely watched U.S. Senate race is a neck-and-neck contest as voter concerns about personal moral conduct weigh on the candidacy of Republican Roy Moore, according to a new Washington Post-Schar School poll.
With less than two weeks to go, support for Democrat Doug Jones stands at 50 percent vs. Moore’s 47 percent support among likely voters — a margin of a scant three points that sets up a nail-biter for the oddly timed Dec. 12 special election.
The survey shows that allegations of improper sexual behavior against Moore, a former Alabama chief justice, hang heavily over a race that would favor a Republican under ordinary circumstances in this deeply conservative state.
Fifty-three percent of voters say Jones, a former federal prosecutor, has higher standards of personal moral conduct than Moore. In contrast, about a third of likely voters say Moore, who has cast his campaign as a “spiritual battle” with heavy religious overtones, has higher moral standards.

Democratic leader Nancy Pelosi has joined the chairman of the House Democrats' campaign committee in calling on a first-term Democratic Nevada congressman to resign, following a report that he sexually harassed an aide during his 2016 congressional campaign.
In an article published by BuzzFeed Friday afternoon, Rep. Ruben Kihuen was accused of making repeated sexual advances toward his then-campaign finance director by a woman identified as "Samantha." BuzzFeed said it is withholding her surname at her request. Samantha alleges that Kihuen propositioned her for dates and sex, and twice touched her thighs without consent.
Samantha said she did not feel comfortable telling the campaign's leadership about the alleged harassment, so she quit.
Kihuen released a statement Friday night in response to the BuzzFeed article, in which he apologized -- but also claimed not to recall any alleged harassment.

A Florida teenager who was reported missing Sunday was found safe about 1,000 miles away in New York with a 27-year-old soccer coach, who was taken into custody, according to the Columbia County, Florida Sheriff's Office.
The search for Caitlyn Frisina, a 17-year-old from Fort White, began Sunday morning, when her parents discovered she was missing from their home.
Investigators confirmed that the high school senior was with her school's boys' soccer coach, Rian Rodriguez, 27, the sheriff's office said this week. The two were believed to be driving northeast in a red Mercury Sable.
Around 4 p.m. Friday, a New York State Police officer spotted that vehicle in Syracuse, New York, the Columbia County Sheriff's Office said via its Facebook page. The officer stopped the car and found Rodriguez and Caitlyn safe.
Rodriguez was taken into custody without incident, and Caitlyn was detained, the sheriff's office said. Rodriguez faces charges for interference with child custody and may face additional charges, said Columbia County Sheriff Mark Hunter, who said he got to deliver the news to Caitlyn's parents.

Secretive real estate deals in the Holy Land are putting one of Jerusalem's most powerful and ancient churches in the spotlight.
The Greek Orthodox Church calls itself the second-largest landowner in Israel, after the Israeli government. It says it owns some 30 percent of Jerusalem's walled Old City, the city's historic core, and controls the largest stake of any Christian denomination in the Church of the Holy Sepulcher, home to the traditional tomb of Jesus. It also owns lands throughout Jerusalem, Israel and the West Bank.
But in recent years, church leaders have quietly sold off several properties to anonymous investors fronted by companies registered in far-flung tax havens. Israeli and Jewish businessmen were later identified as some of the buyers.
These deals have only recently become public, raising panic among Israelis whose apartments are built on church land and leading to small but growing public protests by some Palestinian church members.
The church leadership is dominated by Greek nationals, but the church's local following is largely Palestinian. Some Palestinians are worried about possible implications for their quest for independence.

Israel launched surface-to-surface missiles at a military installation outside the Syrian capital Damascus overnight, Syrian state TV reports.
The attack caused damage but two missiles were intercepted, it added.
The Israeli military has not confirmed it carried out the strike.
UK-based monitoring group the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights earlier reported explosions near Damascus, which it said were caused by a suspected Israeli missile attack.
The extent of the damage is not yet clear although the TV report spoke of "material losses" at the base.
Head of the Syrian Observatory, Rami Abdel Rahman, told the AFP news agency the strike destroyed an arms depot - but his group did not know who it belonged to.
Israel has hit weapons sites before, in a bid to prevent arms being transferred to Syria's Lebanese ally Hezbollah. Arms convoys in particular have been singled out by the Israeli air force.

Former Yemeni President Ali Abdullah Saleh -- whose supporters are now in a shaky alliance with the Houthi rebels in the fight against the Saudi-led coalition -- tossed an olive branch on Saturday to Riyadh, saying he is open to talks with the coalition and ready to "turn the page."
But Saleh's message didn't sit well with the Houthis, whose spokesman called his remarks "a coup against our alliance and partnership." The reaction is another sign of a developing rift among rebel groups in the Yemen civil war.
Fighting between rebel groups has erupted in Sanaa in recent days, leading to dozens of deaths, officials from both sides told CNN.
Street fighting in the war-wracked country comes amid heightened regional tensions, most notably after Houthi rebels early last month launched a missile that was intercepted near the Saudi capital.
Saudi Arabia responded to the incident with a blockade of Yemen. That now has been partially lifted -- though not enough to stave off a humanitarian catastrophe, according to the United Nations.

Minutes before a cacophony of Cold War-era sirens blared across Hawaii on Friday, the staff at a Kauai Island adventure tour operator paused to gather in an outdoor parking lot. Huddled in the partial shade of palm trees, five colleagues embraced an expectant moment of quiet. The silence was cut at 11:45 a.m., as the sirens wailed for the first time in a generation.
As nuclear tensions between North Korea and the United States foment, Hawaii has reinstated a test of a statewide nuclear attack warning system not utilized since the 1980s. The drill will be repeated on the first business day of the month for the foreseeable future.
“It was as anticlimactic as I expected, but I wanted to come outside and really hear it,” said Peggy Sowl, sales manager at Kauai Outfitters. “Maybe they should be playing Broadway tunes if it’s the last sound we’re going to hear in the last 15 minutes of our lives.”
For Sowl, making light of the situation is more than just a coping mechanism, it’s a strategy for staying sane as talk of a potential nuclear attack increases.

In his first public comments about Michael Flynn pleading guilty Friday to lying to the FBI about his interactions with a Russian official, President Trump reiterated Saturday that his campaign did not collude with Russia during last year's presidential election.
“What has been shown is no collusion. No collusion. There’s been absolutely — there’s been absolutely no collusion, so we’re very happy,” Trump told reporters Saturday morning before departing for a fundraising trip to New York.
The president’s comments come the day after his former national security adviser pleaded guilty to lying about his contacts with then-Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak. In a statement Friday, Flynn said he has agreed to cooperate with special counsel Robert S. Mueller III’s team in its ongoing investigation into the Kremlin's attempts to influence the 2016 election, including possible coordination with the Trump campaign.

The acquittal of an undocumented Mexican immigrant in the shooting death of a woman on a San Francisco pier shocked her family, outraged President Donald Trump and galvanized anti-immigration forces across the country.
But for the jury, the high-profile murder case apparently came down to a question of reasonable doubt, according to experts in criminal prosecution. The jurors were evidently not convinced that the defendant, Jose Ines Garcia Zarate, acted with intent — a bar prosecutors needed to clear to convict him of the most serious charges.
"As controversial and tragic as this case may be, and as political as it has become, my best guess is that this turned out to be a very conventional case in that ... the defense just cast doubt on the prosecution's theory," said Robert Weisberg, a criminal justice professor at Stanford Law School.

The Supreme Court on Monday allowed the third version of the Trump administration’s travel ban to go into effect while legal challenges against it continue. The decision was a victory for the administration after its mixed success before the court over the summer, when justices considered and eventually dismissed disputes over the second version.
The court’s brief, unsigned orders on Monday urged appeals courts to move swiftly to determine whether the latest ban was lawful. Justices Ruth Bader Ginsburg and Sonia Sotomayor said they would have denied the administration’s request to allow the latest ban to go into effect.
The court’s orders mean that the administration can fully enforce its new restrictions on travel from eight nations, six of them predominantly Muslim. For now, most citizens of Iran, Libya, Syria, Yemen, Somalia, Chad and North Korea will be barred from entering the United States, along with some groups of people from Venezuela.
The restrictions vary in their details, but in most cases, citizens of the countries will be unable to emigrate to the United States permanently and many will be barred from working, studying or vacationing here.

Debbie Wesson Gibson was in her attic hauling out boxes of Christmas decorations last week when she noticed a storage bin she said she had forgotten about. Inside was a scrapbook from her senior year of high school, and taped to a page titled “Those Who Inspire” was a graduation card.
“Happy graduation Debbie,” it read in slanted cursive handwriting. “I wanted to give you this card myself. I know that you’ll be a success in anything you do. Roy.”
The inscription, Gibson said, was written by Roy Moore, the Alabama Republican nominee for U.S. Senate who in recent days has repeatedly denied the accounts of five women who told The Washington Post that he pursued them when they were teenagers and he was an assistant district attorney in his 30s. Since those allegations were published last month, four more women have come forward to allege that Moore made unwanted sexual advances. The accounts in The Post included those of Leigh Corfman, who said she was 14 when Moore touched her sexually, and Gibson, who said that she publicly dated Moore when she was 17 and he was 34, a relationship she said she “wore like a badge of honor” until she began reevaluating it in light of the accounts of other women, and now, Moore’s own denials.

President Trump said he would dramatically reduce the size of a vast expanse of protected federal land in Utah on Monday, a rollback of some two million acres that is the largest in scale in the nation’s history.
The administration said it would shrink Bears Ears National Monument, a sprawling region of red rock canyons, by about 85 percent, and cut another area, Grand Staircase-Escalante, to about half its current size. The move, a reversal of protections put in place by Democratic predecessors, comes as the administration pushes for fewer restrictions and more development on public lands.
The decision to reduce Bears Ears is expected to trigger a legal battle that could alter the course of American land conservation, possibly opening millions of protected public acres to oil and gas extraction, mining, logging and other commercial activities.
“Some people think that the natural resources of Utah should be controlled by a small handful of very distant bureaucrats located in Washington,” Mr. Trump said, speaking at Utah’s domed State Capitol. “And guess what? They’re wrong.”

As the White House contends with questions about who knew about former national security adviser Michael Flynn lying to the FBI, people close to Vice President Mike Pence are trying to make clear that President Donald Trump’s No. 2 knew nothing at all.
He was at a homeless shelter in Indiana, clad in an apron and doling out hot meals, the day last December when Egypt submitted a U.N. resolution that drew Flynn and Trump’s son-in-law and adviser Jared Kushner into international back-channel dealing.
He was celebrating his son’s wedding a week later when President Barack Obama slapped sanctions on Russia over its election meddling, setting off a chain of events that would culminate with Flynn pleading guilty to lying to the FBI about his contacts with Russian officials.
Pence’s aides have maintained for months that their man was out of the loop, blissfully ignorant to contacts between the Trump campaign and various foreign actors, from the Russian ambassador to WikiLeaks.

In July 2012, Charlie Craig and David Mullins walked into a cake shop in Lakewood, Colo. Across the counter was Jack Phillips, owner of the bakery he had opened 24 years earlier.
The two men told him they wanted a cake for their wedding reception. They even had a binder of possible ideas. Before they could open it, Mr. Phillips told them that while he would be happy to make them other products, he did not sell baked goods for same-sex weddings because of his Christian beliefs.
Mr. Craig and Mr. Mullins left embarrassed and, they say, distraught. After the Colorado Civil Rights Commission found in 2014 that Phillips had violated the state’s anti-discrimination law and ordered him to make cakes for same-sex weddings or not design wedding cakes at all, Phillips says he felt forced to choose between his faith and his life’s work.

A San Marcos police officer was shot in the line of duty Monday afternoon while out serving a warrant, according to the City of San Marcos.
City officials said the officer was serving a warrant in the El Camino Real subdivision along with other officers when the suspect shot the officer multiple times.
The officer was wearing a protective vest and was taken to Central Texas Medical Center for treatment. However, he succumbed to his wounds and was pronounced deceased at 3:50 p.m.
Officials said they won't disclose the officer's name until next of kin is notified.
The suspect was shot by police during a standoff with San Marcos and Hays County SWAT. He was transported to an Austin hospital, but his condition was not disclosed in the City of San Marcos' release.
In response to the shooting, Gov. Greg Abbott said on Twitter, "We pray for the family of the San Marcos police officer killed in the line of duty. We remember the sacrifices our men and women in law enforcement make every day. #BackTheBlue."

Federal prosecutors asserted Monday that a longtime associate of Paul Manafort, the former chairman of President Trump’s campaign, has been “assessed to have ties” to Russian intelligence — the first time the special counsel has alleged a Trump official had such contacts.
The statement came as prosecutors working for special counsel Robert S. Mueller III withdrew their support for a joint bail deal filed last week that would have released Manafort from home detention and GPS monitoring while he awaits trial on charges including money laundering and fraud.
Manafort, 68, and his longtime deputy, Rick Gates, 45, have both pleaded not guilty to charges filed Oct. 30.
In the four-page filing Monday, prosecutor Andrew Weissman urged the judge to reject the bail deal, arguing that Manafort and a Russian colleague have been secretly ghostwriting an English-language editorial that appeared to defend Manafort’s work advising a Russia-friendly political party in Ukraine.

Britain’s divorce negotiations with the European Union hit a major snag on Monday, when a hard-line Northern Ireland party that is a crucial ally of Prime Minister Theresa May pulled its support at the last minute from an agreement on the future of the border between the United Kingdom and Ireland.
The abrupt decision, which appeared to take Mrs. May by surprise as she held talks in Brussels, derailed a draft deal between Britain and the European Union that is a prerequisite for moving on to the next stage of negotiations.
It denied Mrs. May a much-needed breakthrough in the stalled talks. It frustrated leaders of the European Union, who increasingly appear to have the upper hand in the discussions. And it underscored yet again Mrs. May’s weakness at home, and the complexity of the task facing her as Britain tries to unscramble more than four decades of European integration.
“Once again Theresa May has come out of Brexit talks with her tail between her legs,” said Tom Brake, a member of Parliament from the Liberal Democrats, an opposition party. “As each day goes by, it becomes clearer that the best deal for everyone is to stay in Europe. The people of the U.K. must be given a vote on the deal and an opportunity to exit from Brexit.”

Ali Abdullah Saleh, the former leader of Yemen, was known as a hardy survivor of Middle Eastern politics who had ruled for more than three decades and re-emerged to play a major role in his country’s devastating civil war.
Mr. Saleh, who was killed on Monday in Yemen under circumstances that remained unclear, was a canny manipulator of Yemen’s complex tribal politics who once likened his presidency to “dancing on the heads of snakes,” but his Machiavellian skills and good luck finally ran out. Aides said he died after an explosion at his home in Sana, the capital. Yemen’s Houthi rebels, his onetime allies in the war, said they had killed him in an ambush in the desert.
On Saturday Mr. Saleh had publicly broken with the Houthis, calling on Yemenis to “defend the nation” against them. That move in a lifetime of juggling alliances proved to be his last.

In anticipation of the legalization of same-sex marriage in Australia, a 37-year-old lawmaker debating the issue in the House of Representatives took a moment to make it personal, turning to his partner and popping the question.
Tim Wilson, a member of the Liberal Party, was speaking Monday on a bill intended to remove a ban on same-sex marriage, a step that has gained wide support from voters throughout the country. During his speech on the House floor, Wilson said the same-sex marriage debate has been “the soundtrack” to his own relationship with his longtime partner, Ryan Bolger, a 33-year-old schoolteacher.

Orders to seize guns from prohibited buyers at 10-year high: report
© Getty Images
The number of orders issued to the Bureau of Alcohol Tobacco Firearms and Explosives (ATF) to take back guns reached a 10-year high last year, according to an investigation published Monday by USA Today.
The FBI provided ATF agents with 4,000 directives to take guns back from individuals who should not have been able to purchase the weapons due to mental health problems, criminal backgrounds or other concerns.
"These are people who shouldn't have weapons in the first place, and it just takes one to do something that could have tragic consequences," former ATF official David Chipman told the newspaper. "You don't want ATF to stand for 'after the fact.'" 
USA Today noted that the number of successful seizures last year is unclear and that the number of guns that should not have been purchased may be higher because more than one firearm may be bought in one dealing.

Sacramento lobbyist Pamela Lopez has claimed that, in 2016, Democratic Assemblyman Matt Dababneh followed her into a bathroom, masturbated in front of her and urged her to touch him. Dababneh has strongly denied the allegation.
"It was Matt Dababneh," Lopez told The Times in a November interview.
Lopez jolted the California political world seven weeks ago when she first shared her account of an encounter in Las Vegas, joining more than 140 women as they denounced in an open letter a "pervasive" culture of sexual harassment and misconduct in the state Capitol.
Lopez had not publicly accused Dababneh until Monday, when she formally filed a complaint with the Assembly and named him at a news conference. The Times had been preparing a report on her accusations against Dababneh, and sought the assemblyman’s comment late last week.

Representative John Conyers Jr., who faces allegations that he sexually harassed former employees, announced Tuesday that he will leave Congress immediately, and he endorsed his son, John Conyers III, to replace him.
Mr. Conyers, the longest-serving current member of the House and the longest-serving African-American in history, called into a local radio show on Tuesday to break the news.
“I am retiring today,” Mr. Conyers said from a hospital in Michigan. “I am in the process of putting together my retirement plans. I will have more on that soon.”
He continued to deny that he has harassed any of his former employees and said he did not know where the allegations came from.
“My legacy can’t be compromised or diminished in any way by what we are going through now,” Mr. Conyers said. “This too shall pass. My legacy will continue through my children.”

A fast-moving, wind-driven brush fire broke out Monday night in the foothills near Thomas Aquinas College in Santa Paula and swept into the city of Ventura early Tuesday, burning homes and forcing thousands to evacuate. The extent of the losses was unclear, but fire officials said there was little they could do stop the flames being pushed by gusts of 50 mph. One person was reported killed in a traffic accident on a road closed because of the fire.
California could be hit with significantly more dangerous and more frequent droughts in the near future as changes in weather patterns triggered by global warming block rainfall from reaching the state, according to new research led by scientists at Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory. Using complex new modeling, the scientists have found that rapidly melting Arctic sea ice now threatens to diminish precipitation over California by as much as 15% within 20 to 30 years.

U.S. Special Counsel Robert Mueller has asked Deutsche Bank (DBKGn.DE) for data on accounts held by President Donald Trump and his family, a person close to the matter said on Tuesday.
Special Counsel Robert Mueller departs after briefing the U.S. House Intelligence Committee on his investigation of potential collusion between Russia and the Trump campaign on Capitol Hill in Washington, U.S., June 20, 2017.
Mueller is investigating alleged Russian attempts to influence the 2016 U.S. presidential election and potential collusion by Trump aides.
Germany’s largest bank received a subpoena from Mueller several weeks ago to provide information on certain money and credit transactions, the person said, without giving details, adding key documents had been handed over in the meantime.
Deutsche Bank, which has loaned the Trump organization hundreds of millions of dollars for real estate ventures, said it would not comment on any of its clients.
The bank rejected demands in June by U.S. House Democrats to provide details of Trump’s finances, citing privacy laws.
Russia has denied meddling in the election and Trump has said there was no collusion.
A disclosure document posted on the U.S. Office of Government Ethics website in June showed liabilities for Trump of at least $130 million to Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas.

Top House Republicans are slamming a last-minute addition to the Senate tax bill that has drawn the scorn of corporate America.
In its frantic push to win votes for its tax plan on Friday, Senate Republicans added back a corporate alternative minimum tax, which a separate House plan would eliminate along with an individual AMT. The provision, which helped the Senate to offset the cost of other tax breaks in its plan, has now emerged as a sticking point as the chambers get set to work toward a joint, final bill.
"I think that both the individual and the corporate AMT — it's costly, it's complex — really on the business side, undermines many of the pro-growth and pro-American provisions in the tax code," Rep. Kevin Brady, R-Texas, who is set to lead the House and Senate conference committee, told CNBC's "Squawk Box" on Tuesday.
On Monday, House Majority Leader Kevin McCarthy, R-Calif., told CNBC that "I think [the corporate alternative minimum tax] has to be eliminated because that would destroy [research and development." The tax "should be eliminated for sure," McCarthy added.

The Supreme Court began hearing arguments Tuesday in one of the term’s most anticipated cases: whether the First Amendment protects a Colorado baker from creating a wedding cake for a same-sex couple.
An attorney for the baker who owns Masterpiece Cakeshop told the court that Jack C. Phillips should not be forced to design his custom-made cakes for same-sex couples against his deeply held religious beliefs and should be exempt from Colorado’s anti-discrimination law.
Several justices questioned what other types of business owners would be exempt if the court made an exception for Phillips.

President Trump has dramatically scaled back two national land monuments in Utah. The administration and Republican leaders in Utah say taking the land out of the hands of the federal government will allow the state to decide what to do with it, including protecting some areas and possibly allowing development in others.
As expected, environmental and Native American groups were outraged. Patagonia, which sells outdoor clothing and gear, splashed a statement across its website reading "The President Stole Your Land" and calling Trump's move "illegal."
The battle over Trump's authority to shrink monuments may be just beginning. Native American tribes and conservation groups are mounting legal challenges, even as the administration turns its focus to possibly shrinking half a dozen more in other states.
Before President Trump even finished his triumphal visit to Utah Monday, the first lawsuits were being filed.

The Irish prime minister Leo Varadkar, has told the Dáil (Irish parliament) that "the ball is now in London's court" after Brexit talks between the UK and the EU broke up on Monday.
He said that he accepted that Prime Minister Theresa May was negotiating in good faith but had difficulties.
Mr Varadkar said the talks were between a sovereign state, the United Kingdom, and the 27 sovereign states of the EU.
"They don't involve one political party to the exclusion of others", he added.
No agreement has been reached between the UK the EU after a DUP backlash against proposals for the Irish border.
The Irish government has been seeking guarantees from the UK that there would be no customs checks on the border with Northern Ireland after Brexit and movements of goods and people would remain seamless.
However speaking at Westminster on Tuesday, tDUP deputy leader Nigel Dodds blamed the Irish government for the failure in the Brexit negotiations, accusing it of behaving in a "reckless and dangerous way".

Former Georgian President Mikheil Saakashvili was freed by his supporters on Tuesday only hours after authorities detained him.
Masked Ukrainian officers took Saakashvili into custody in his apartment building in the capital Kiev earlier on Tuesday, as protesters outside the building rallied in his support. Saakashvili at one point even climbed on the apartment building’s rooftop to address supporters.
The van in which authorities attempted to drive him away from the scene was blocked by protesters, who held up for hours. Saakashvili was eventually freed and repeated his calls for protests against current Ukrainian President Poroshenko.

Turkey has joined a growing chorus of key US allies in warning President Donald Trump about the perils of recognizing Jerusalem as the capital of Israel, describing it as a "fatal mistake" that would spark fresh conflict in the Middle East.
Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan said Tuesday that a reported plan for such recognition, in whole or in part, would be a "red line for Turkey" and could lead to Ankara cutting diplomatic ties with Israel.
"As the temporary president of the Islamic Cooperation Organization, we will follow this issue very closely," Erdogan said at his party's weekly meeting in the Turkish capital.
In a series of tweets earlier on Tuesday, Turkish presidential spokesman Ibrahim Kalin described the reported plan as "a fatal mistake ... such a move would undermine all peace efforts and trigger new tensions and conflicts."
Three other major US allies have registered their concerns this week about the reported plans of the Trump Administration to recognize Jerusalem as the Israeli capital.

The Republican National Committee announced Monday night that it is reopening the spigot for Roy Moore in Alabama and will work to elect a candidate accused of sexual misconduct against teenage girls to the U.S. Senate.
The underlying facts have not changed in the three weeks since the RNC cut off Moore. In fact, new women have come forward, additional evidence has emerged and the candidate — who categorically denies any wrongdoing — has struggled to keep his story straight.

Eric Conn, the Kentucky lawyer who defrauded the Social Security system of more than half a billion dollars before fleeing the U.S. in June, has been arrested in Honduras, according to that country's Public Ministry. Wanted by the FBI, he also sent taunting messages while on the lam.
Conn had been under house arrest when he cut off his ankle monitor a month before his sentencing hearing and left it in a backpack along I-75 in Lexington, Ky. He was later traced to New Mexico, where a truck he had been using was found near the border. The FBI says the vehicle had been provided by a co-conspirator.
Conn eventually made it to Honduras, where agents of the Technical Agency for Criminal Investigation arrested him in the northern city La Ceiba, along the Caribbean coast. At the time, he was leaving a restaurant in a shopping center. Honduran officials say Conn is being sent back to the U.S. on Tuesday.

No man can serve two masters, the Bible teaches, but Mike Pence is giving it his all. It’s a sweltering September afternoon in Anderson, Indiana, and the vice president has returned to his home state to deliver the Good News of the Republicans’ recently unveiled tax plan. The visit is a big deal for Anderson, a fading manufacturing hub about 20 miles outside Muncie that hasn’t hosted a sitting president or vice president in 65 years—a fact noted by several warm-up speakers. To mark this historic civic occasion, the cavernous factory where the event is being held has been transformed. Idle machinery has been shoved to the perimeter to make room for risers and cameras and a gargantuan American flag, which—along with bleachers full of constituents carefully selected for their ethnic diversity and ability to stay awake during speeches about tax policy—will serve as the TV-ready backdrop for Pence’s remarks.

Ayman Safadi, the foreign minister of the Hashemite Kingdom of Jordan, has been actively campaigning on Twitter against US President Donald Trump's plan to recognize Jerusalem as Israel's capital. His is one of many voices throughout the region, among countries the Jewish state has relations with and those it doesn't, among its enemies and luke-warm friends, warning of the consequences of such a move.
On December 3, Safadi tweeted that he had spoken with his counterpart in the United States, Secretary of State Rex Tillerson “on dangerous consequences of recognizing Jerusalem as capital of Israel. Such a decision would trigger anger across Arab, Muslim worlds, fuel tension and jeopardize peace efforts.” 
Safadi had reached out to the Arab League and Organization of Islamic Cooperation, which represents 57 Muslim countries, for support against the US move, he said. He went further on December 4, tweeting that he had spoken with foreign ministers from Egypt, Saudi Arabia, Kuwait, Morocco, Iraq, Oman and Tunisia. 
Jordan appears to see the recognition as a serious crisis. This is compounded by Israel's lack of an ambassador in Jordan since July, after an Israeli security guard shot two Jordanians.

Several homes in Los Angeles’ Bel-Air neighborhood were burning Wednesday morning as a wind-driven wildfire prompted a full closure of the 405 Freeway as well as mandatory evacuations in an area of multimillion-dollar homes.
The fire was estimated to cover about 50 acres by 6:20 a.m., but Los Angeles fire officials said it was being fueled by 25 mph winds and would likely grow.
Ash and smoke swirled in the sky as dozens of firefighters fought flames atop hills adjacent to the 405. Television news video showed multiple homes in flames.
Authorities have ordered the evacuation of all homes between Mulholland Drive on the north, Sunset Boulevard on the south, Roscomare Road on the east and the 405 Freeway on the west. Earlier in the morning they ordered evacuations along Casiano Road, Moraga Drive and Linda Flora Drive. Residents of Mandeville Canyon and Sullivan Canyon should be prepared for evacuation, the department said.
The fire also caused massive gridlock along one of the city’s most congested commuter corridors. Caltrans announced the full closure of the 405 Freeway between the 101 and 10 treeways. It has also closed all onramps to the 405.
Residents near Bel Terrace and North Sepulveda Boulevard raced outside their homes Wednesday morning as flames encroached on their homes.

Wind-whipped wildfires raged for a third day Wednesday in Southern California -- including a fresh blaze near the posh Bel Air area and Interstate 405 -- threatening further damage after burning more than 65,000 acres, torching scores of buildings and forcing tens of thousands of people to flee their homes.
The fires are burning extremely dry terrain along the northern and western edges of Los Angeles, and, more extensively, Ventura County, northwest of the nation's second most-populous city.
Heavy Santa Ana winds blamed for spreading the infernos still threaten to multiply the destruction. Among the smaller fires that popped up Wednesday morning was a 50-acre blaze burning near I-405 close to the Getty Center arts complex, Bel Air and UCLA.
Videos of that fire showed bright flames glowing ominously close to I-405 motorists early Wednesday.
The winds might die down during sunlight Wednesday, but they're expected to pick up in the evening and Thursday -- perhaps as gusty as 50 mph, posing a risk of further spread.

There may never be an end to the Harvey Weinstein stories. The disgraced mogul, who has been accused of sexual misconduct by dozens of women, is once again the subject of a stunning report from The New York Times that details the shocking ways in which he maintained a hold on the entertainment industry for decades. Keeping his grip required dire complicity; in one section, the Times says that at least eight C.A.A. agents knew about Weinstein’s alleged misconduct, “largely from actresses they represented,” but did not do anything about it.
In a statement to the newspaper, the powerful agency apologized “to any person the agency let down for not meeting the high expectations we place on ourselves,” and noted that it will revise “management structure to include more women and improve its sexual harassment policies.” Weinstein, meanwhile, denies claims of non-consensual acts, and his spokeswoman disputed claims in the Times’ article about inappropriate actions, as Weinstein has a different recollection from his accusers.
Oscar-winning actress Gwyneth Paltrow provides a shocking anecdote about the purported complicity of agents during Weinstein’s heyday. Paltrow, one of many women who spoke on the record with the Times about allegedly being harassed by Weinstein, said that she reported the alleged incident over two decades ago to her own agent, Rick Kurtzman of C.A.A. Though he “looked incredulous” and was disgusted, he did not suggest that she speak about the issue with agency leaders. Kurtzman declined to comment to the Times.

A former Democratic congressional aide said Al Franken tried to forcibly kiss her after a taping of his radio show in 2006, three years before he became a U.S. senator.
The aide, whose name POLITICO is withholding to protect her identity, said Franken (D-Minn.) pursued her after her boss had left the studio. She said she was gathering her belongings to follow her boss out of the room. When she turned around, Franken was in her face.
The former staffer ducked to avoid Franken’s lips. As she hastily left the room, she said, Franken told her: “It’s my right as an entertainer.”
“He was between me and the door and he was coming at me to kiss me. It was very quick and I think my brain had to work really hard to be like ‘Wait, what is happening?’ But I knew whatever was happening was not right and I ducked,” the aide said in an interview. “I was really startled by it and I just sort of booked it towards the door and he said, ‘It’s my right as an entertainer.’”
The former staffer, who was in her mid-20s at the time of the incident, said she did not respond to Franken.

Time magazine has named “The Silence Breakers” as its 2017 Person of the Year, recognizing the women (and some men) who came forward with stories of sexual harassment and assault and helped force a nationwide reckoning.
The magazine calls them “the voices that launched a movement.”
Among them Ashley Judd and Rose McGowan, the actresses whose stunning accusations against movie mogul Harvey Weinstein helped lead to his downfall; and activist Tarana Burke, creator of the #MeToo movement, along with the Hollywood star who amplified it on social media, Alyssa Milano.

President Vladimir Putin, who’s ruled Russia for 18 years, announced he will seek a new six-year term in March. Constitutional limits mean it’s likely to be his last.
“I can’t think of a better time or place to announce it -- thank you for your support -- I will run for the post of president of the Russian Federation,’’ Putin told an event at the GAZ auto factory in Nizhny Novgorod on Wednesday. In comments carried live on national television, he was responding to a worker who asked him to “do us a favor” and confirm his intentions, triggering chants of “GAZ is behind you!”
At the peak of his power at home and abroad, Putin is expected to win a landslide in the contest, due on March 18, with a recent poll showing he’d get 67 percent of the vote. Though popular domestically, his aggressive rebuilding of Russia’s global influence has brought a surge in tension with the West. Relations with the U.S. are at the lowest since the Cold War, with Russia facing more sanctions over allegations of Kremlin meddling in last year’s American presidential election.  
Russia’s isolation deepened Tuesday when its athletes were banned from competing under the country’s flag at the Winter Olympics in February because of a major doping scandal that has already tarnished Putin’s triumph at the 2014 Games in Sochi.

Two men appeared in court Wednesday in London on terror charges over an alleged plot to kill British Prime Minister Theresa May, according to British government officials.
Officials say the men conspired to launch a suicide-knife attack on Downing Street, the official home of the Prime Minister.
News of the foiled assassination plot broke shortly after the head of Britain's domestic intelligence service MI5, Andrew Parker, had briefed the cabinet on the terrorist threat and informed ministers that his service had thwarted nine terrorist attacks this year.
He informed ministers of the plot during the briefing, although the information was held back from the media for several hours.
Both of the conspirators were arrested last week in raids by counterterrorism officers in London and Birmingham, according to police officials. One of the men, named as Naa'imur Zakariyah Rahman, 20, is accused of preparing acts of terrorism.

A state-run newspaper in a Chinese city near the border with North Korea on Wednesday published a page of "common sense" advice on how readers can protect themselves from a nuclear attack or explosion.
China has voiced grave concern over North Korea's nuclear and missiles programme, as well as calling on the United States and South Korea to stop provoking Pyongyang.
An American B-1B supersonic bomber flew over South Korea on Wednesday as part of a large-scale joint military drills with Seoul. Kim Jong Un's regime has warned the drills would push the Korean Peninsula to the "brink of war."
The full-page article in the Jilin Daily explains how nuclear weapons differ from traditional arms and instructs people how to protect themselves in the event of an attack.

A baby boy mistakenly declared dead by an Indian hospital last week, passed away on Wednesday morning.
Dr. Sandeep Gupta, who was treating the baby at the Delhi New Born Center said "we knew from the beginning that he may not survive but we were trying our best."
The baby was born at the Max Super Speciality Hospital in Shalimar Bagh, New Delhi, last Thursday but pronounced dead two hours later, the boy's grandfather, Praveen Malik, told CNN.
His mother had given birth to twins but the girl was declared stillborn.
On the way to the cremation ground, the family found the boy still breathing after noticing "some movements" inside one of the polythene bags containing the babies' bodies.

The race for mayor in Atlanta early Wednesday was too close to call, with one candidate declaring herself the city's new leader and the other vowing to request a recount.
The margin was razor-thin, with several hundred votes separating Keisha Lance Bottoms and Mary Norwood.
Bottoms spoke early Wednesday at an Atlanta hotel, saying near the end of her speech that "I am just in awe of what God is able to do."
"I'm so honored to be your 60th mayor," she told her cheering supporters.
But Norwood took the podium at her own rally and said that absentee ballots from military members were yet to figure in the totals, and she believes some ballots have yet to be tabulated.
"We will be asking for a recount," Norwood said.
Just 759 votes separated the candidates early Wednesday morning, Norwood told supporters.

A veteran Florida python hunter last weekend snagged a record 17-foot snake, a behemoth so immense he said it could "kill any full-grown man."
The South Florida Water Management District said Monday python hunter Jason Leon broke the agency's old record with his kill of a Burmese python in southern Miami-Dade County at around 2:45 a.m. Friday.
"That snake could pretty much kill any full-grown man," Leon told NBC6. "If that snake was alive right now it would probably take like three of us to be able to control that snake."
A python hunter in the Everglades snagged a 17-foot python early Friday morning, setting a new record.  (South Florida Water Management District)
The 17-foot, 1-inch python, weighing 132 pounds, is the longest ever brought in for the agency's Python Elimination Program. Leon also holds the overall state record with an 18-foot-8-inch python he caught in 2013.
Jason Leon, who snagged this 17-foot python, also holds the Florida state record.  (South Florida Water Management District)
Leon said in a video posted by the SFWMD he spotted the female snake in submerged water, grabbed her and quickly shot her in the head while holding the snake. There was a smaller male python nearby, but he was not captured, Leon said.
“We’re going to find a 20-footer tonight,” he joked after bringing the snake to the district’s field office in Homestead.

In a stunning close to his congressional career, Sen. Al Franken (D-Minn.) on Thursday announced he will resign amid multiple allegations that he inappropriately touched women.
Franken, while denying the allegations, said he will leave the Senate in the coming weeks. His announcement came one day after the emergence of another accusation of misconduct led a majority of Senate Democrats to call for Franken’s resignation.
Striking a defiant tone in a speech on the Senate floor, Franken defended his political legacy and made clear he was not admitting to the behavior described by his accusers.

The return of powerful winds Thursday pushed the destructive Ventura County fire closer to several communities, prompting new evacuations.
Communities both on the coast and inland were under threat. At 4 a.m., officials closed the 101 Freeway between Routes 126 and 150. According to the California Highway Patrol, that left no open routes between Santa Barbara and Ventura counties. The freeway was reopened around 7 a.m.
The Thomas fire has scorched about 90,000 acres and carved a path of destruction that stretches more than 10 miles from Santa Paula to the Pacific Ocean.
As flames raged toward neighborhoods in Ojai, Carpinteria and Fillmore, officials issued new evacuation orders in Ojai Valley, notifying residents with an emergency cellphone alert. Authorities said they were helping residents of five assisted-living facilities evacuate, while people at Ojai Hospital were advised to shelter in place.

Two students were killed when a gunman opened fire at a northern New Mexico high school Thursday morning, law enforcement officials said.
The suspected gunman was also killed, a spokesman for the New Mexico State Police told Fox News. It's unclear how the gunman died or what the motive for the attack may have been.
Aztec High School, which is located in the Four Corners region and near the Navajo Nation, was evacuated after a period of being in lockdown. Authorities said they cleared the buildings at the school, and students were boarding buses to another location where they could be reunited with their parents.
A law enforcement official and a Navajo Nation spokesman said more than a dozen others were injured during the incident, however, it wasn't immediately clear how they were hurt.
"It's tragic when our children are harmed in violent ways especially on school campuses. We express our condolences to those families who have been harmed," Russell Begaye, president of the Navajo Nation, said in a press release.

Officials, religious leaders and activists across the Middle East on Thursday condemned President Trump’s decision to recognize Jerusalem as Israel’s capital, with U.S. allies and foes alike denouncing the move as reckless and likely to ignite further violence in the region.
Criticism of the move, which breaks with decades of U.S. policy, poured in from countries including Morocco, Egypt, Pakistan and Iran. Lebanon’s Hezbollah called it “malicious aggression,” and Turkey’s president said it would plunge the region into a “ring of fire.”

Former South Carolina police officer Michael Slager was sentenced today to 20 years in prison for the 2015 deadly shooting of unarmed black man Walter Scott.
U.S. District Judge David Norton made the ruling after saying he would follow sentencing guidelines to send Slager to prison for 19 to 24 years. The former officer could have faced life in prison. Norton ruled that Slager committed second-degree murder and obstruction of justice.
It was an emotional day for both the Scott and Slager families. At one point Scott's mother looked the former officer in the eye and told him she forgave him.
Walter Scott's brother, Rodney Scott, called the death of his brother the worst day of his life. Rodney Scott said he wants Slager to pay for his actions.

Seventy-six years after the attack on Pearl Harbor, researchers are sharing rare underwater images of the USS Ward -- the U.S. Navy destroyer that fired the first American shots in World War II.
The Ward has rested on the ocean floor near Ponson Island in the Philippines since it came under attack by kamikazes later in the war. But on Sunday, Dec. 7, 1941, the ship fatefully found itself outside of Pearl Harbor, Hawaii, conducting routine antisubmarine patrols.
At 6:45 a.m. that day, the destroyer's crew spotted a Japanese midget submarine.
A full hour before the Japanese would attack Pearl Harbor by air, the USS Ward sank the Japanese sub, considered the first American shots in World War II. It would later be revealed that four other Japanese vessels were lurking near the harbor before the attack.

Germany's Social Democrats have given the green light for their party to enter preliminary coalition talks with Chancellor Angela Merkel's party in a vote that could trigger an end to the country's political deadlock.
More than 600 SPD delegates gathered on Thursday in Berlin and debated the question for several hours before voting overwhelmingly for the exploratory talks to begin.
In a speech earlier in the day, party chief Martin Schulz -- who is facing a vote on his own leadership later on Thursday -- called for a "yes" vote in spite of significant misgivings.
Schulz had ruled out entering a coalition with the Christian Democratic Union (CDU) and Christian Social Union (CSU) -- the so-called "Grand Coalition" that has ruled Germany for the last four years -- but has recently retreated from his position.

North Korea last week chose a night launch for its most powerful intercontinental ballistic missile to date, to illustrate its ability to make a sneak attack. Problem is, the U.S. knew about it days ahead of time.
U.S. military intelligence detected preparations for the missile event at least 72 hours before the launch on November 29, according to The Diplomat. A U.S. government source said officials observed North Koreans setting up the launch pad for the Hwasong-15 missile firing table three hours before the launch, and saw the missile being erected an hour later.
With its network of spy planes, satellites and drones hovering over North Korea, the U.S. demonstrated it was watching the 3 a.m. launch that North Korean state-run news agency KCNA claimed showed “the capability of making surprise launch of ICBM in any region and place any time.”
The observation windows roughly matched the warning time U.S. intelligence had before North Korea’s previous two missile launches, which happened more than two months ago.

In the Canberra parliament's final session of the year on Thursday, lawmakers engaged in a lengthy debate as several amendments put forward by opponents of the bill to legalize same-sex marriage were voted down.
The Australian Parliament voted 146 to 4 in support of same-sex marriage.
"What a day for love, for equality, for respect! Australia has done it," Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull told the House. "Every Australian had their say and they said it is fair, get on with it!
Supporters of same-sex marriage gathered outside Parliament House and packed the public gallery in anticipation of the legislation going through.
"It's a historic day for Australia today and I think the celebrations around the country when we finally … achieve marriage equality are going to be immense," Greens party senator Janet Rice said.
The law will likely come into effect in about a month, with the first wedding expected about a month later.

The leaders of Greece and Turkey publicly aired their grievances Thursday in a tense news conference as a two-day visit to Athens by Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan got off to a rocky start.
The Greek government had expressed hopes the visit, the first to Greece by a Turkish president in 65 years, would help improve often frosty relations between the two neighbors. The NATO allies are divided by a series of decades-old issues, including territorial disputes in the Aegean Sea, and have come to the brink of war three times since the early 1970s.

Late-night hosts poked fun at President Trump after he appeared to slur his words during a speech Wednesday in which he recognized Jerusalem as Israel's capital.
During the speech, Trump appeared to stumble at the end of the phrase "God bless the United States."
The White House blamed Trump's slurred speech on a dry throat.
"His throat was dry. There's nothing to it," White House spokesman Raj Shah told the Los Angeles Times.
"I know what you’re getting at," Shah said when pressed if the garbled words could be a sign of health concerns. "I’m saying there’s nothing to it."
Trevor Noah made fun of Trump's stumble on Comedy Central's "The Daily Show."
“As disturbing as it was today to watch Donald Trump add fuel to the Middle East conflict, it was even more disturbing to watch the conflict between Donald Trump's teeth and his tongue,” Noah said. 

FBI Director Christopher A. Wray defended the agency’s integrity Thursday, telling skeptical Republican lawmakers that its agents are “decent people committed to the highest principles of integrity and respect.’’
Wray was asked at the House Judiciary Committee hearing about how FBI personnel handled sensitive probes of President Trump and his former political rival, Hillary Clinton.
Republicans repeatedly pressed him to explain the conduct of a senior agent, Peter Strzok, now under investigation by the Justice Department’s inspector general for allegedly sending anti-Trump and pro-Clinton messages to another senior FBI staffer involved in those probes.

Palestinian protesters and Israeli security forces clashed Friday in Jerusalem and the West Bank amid heightened tensions in the region and elsewhere over US President Donald Trump's decision to recognize Jerusalem as the capital of Israel.
One man, a 30-year-old Palestinian, was shot and killed during clashes in eastern Gaza, Palestinian Authority's Ministry of Health said, with more than 200 people injured across the West Bank, Gaza and Jerusalem, 50 of whom needed hospital treatment.
Most of the injuries were minor, the ministry said, adding that they were caused by bullets, rubber bullets, tear gas and asphyxiation.
An Israeli army statement said what it called violent riots had broken out in about 30 locations Friday afternoon across the West Bank and Gaza.
About 3,000 protesters have been involved in the West Bank unrest, it said, with six people arrested and about 10 injured.

The Labor Department released its official hiring and unemployment figures for November on Friday morning, providing the latest snapshot of the American economy.
• 228,000 jobs were added last month. Wall Street economists had expected an increase of about 200,000, according to Bloomberg.
• Average earnings rose by 5 cents an hour and are up 2.5 percent over the past year.
The American job market is the strongest it’s been in a decade, and arguably the strongest since 2000. The United States has now added jobs for 86 consecutive months — a downward blip in September was later revised to show a small gain — and the unemployment rate is lower than it ever got during the last boom, which ended when the housing bubble burst. Even wage growth, long the weak spot in an otherwise strong recovery, is showing signs of picking up.
“It’s a really, really strong economy,” said Tom Gimbel, chief executive of LaSalle Network, a staffing firm in Chicago. “Companies really want to take advantage of the economy, so they want to hire and get while the getting’s good.”

Fires raged on in much of Southern California on Friday, as fast-moving flames scorched more than 158,000 acres across four counties, blackening the air and forcing closures of schools and roadways.
In San Diego County, where a small grass fire that broke out Thursday morning had grown by night to 4,100 acres, residents near Bonsall and Oceanside scrambled to heed evacuation orders. At least six people were injured, and at least 65 structures destroyed.
Brian Jones, a concrete contractor from Bonsall, dropped off his horses at the county fairgrounds after fleeing his home. “I didn’t want to leave,” Mr. Jones said. And then the flames “started coming over the ridge, right at the edge of our development, and it was ‘Oh, boy — time to go.’”
Evacuation orders were lifted late Thursday in parts of Los Angeles and Riverside Counties, but the situation remained dire in Ventura County, where 132,000 acres had burned and more than 430 structures were destroyed. That fire, just 10 percent contained, threatened to cross on Friday into Santa Barbara County, where new evacuations had been ordered.
“This fire just keeps on going on us,” said Capt. Israel Pinzon, a spokesman for the California Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

Rep. Trent Franks, an Arizona Republican who is among the most conservative members of the House, said he would resign his seat after House officials learned that he had asked two female employees to bear his child as a surrogate.
Franks’s announcement came as the House Ethics Committee said it would create a special subcommittee to investigate Franks for conduct “that constitutes sexual harassment and/or retaliation for opposing sexual harassment.”
His resignation, which Franks said is effective Jan. 31, will end the ethics investigation.

Candidate Donald Trump, his son Donald Trump Jr. and others in the Trump Organization received an email in September 2016 offering a decryption key and website address for hacked WikiLeaks documents, according to an email provided to congressional investigators.
The September 4 email was sent during the final stretch of the 2016 presidential race -- on the same day that Trump Jr. first tweeted about WikiLeaks and Clinton.
"WIKILEAKS: Hillary Clinton Sent THOUSANDS of Classified Cables Marked "(C)" for Confidential," he tweeted, sharing a story from the Gateway Pundit, a conservative, pro-Trump website.
The email came two months after the hacked emails of the Democratic National Committee were made public and one month before WikiLeaks began leaking the contents of Clinton campaign chairman John Podesta's hacked emails. It arrived less than three weeks before WikiLeaks itself messaged Trump Jr. and began an exchange of direct messages on Twitter.

A band of cold air that delivered a rare blanket of snow to parts of southern Texas rolled through the Deep South on Friday bringing threats of more weekend snow, sleet and dicey travel conditions from the Mid-Atlantic to New England.
Parts of Alabama, Georgia, Louisiana and Mississippi reported snow flurries before dawn. In Georgia, nearly two dozen school systems closed ahead of the wintry weather.
“It’s the first snow of the season and any time you even mention snow in the South, you’re going to get people a little panicky,” said David Nadler, a meteorologist at the National Weather Service’s office south of Atlanta.
This first taste of winter will vary along the path across the South, with sleet and snow expected — but not certain — in much of Virginia, but likely producing snow in larger amounts farther north in New York City, Massachusetts and Maine.
The National Weather Service said a half inch to an inch of snow is forecast across many areas of the South by Friday night. Winter weather advisories have been posted for parts of Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, Georgia and the Carolinas. The advisories were issued for cities including Baton Rouge, La., Hattiesburg, Miss., and Birmingham, Ala.

The Irish border deal hammered out after objections from the Democratic Unionist party has inadvertently edged Britain towards a soft Brexit deal, political leaders in Ireland have said.
Ireland’s prime minister said he was delighted with the deal because it not only delivered an invisible border with Northern Ireland but the DUP clause had unexpectedly delivered a new promise of barrier-free trade between the whole of Ireland and the UK in the event of no deal.
Leo Varadkar pledged that May would have “no closer friend” in the next stage of negotiations on the back of the agreement on the Irish border.
He said it was in Ireland’s interest to help Britain get a deep and ambitious deal because Ireland wanted to preserve the £50bn-a-year trade it does with the UK, its biggest export partner.

The UN's Monusco mission said the peacekeepers were attacked by suspected rebels of the Allied Democratic Forces (ADF) in North Kivu province.
Five soldiers with the DR Congo's armed forces (FARDC) were also killed.
UN Secretary-General Antonio Guterres described it as the worst attack on UN peacekeepers in recent history.
He sent his condolences to Tanzania, their home country.
DR Congo has suffered years of instability with rival groups fighting for control of territory.
A Monusco statement said rebels had launched an attack against an operating base at Semuliki in Beni territory on Thursday evening.
"This resulted in protracted fighting between suspected ADF elements and Monusco and FARDC Forces," it added.

President Trump hosted his first White House Hanukkah party on Thursday night, where he touted his administration's decision to declare Jerusalem the capital of Israel.
Trump hosted hundreds of attendees at the White House for the party, with a guest list that had been narrowed from previous administrations.
Congressional Democrats, as well as Jewish leaders who have been critical of Trump, were excluded from receiving invitations this year, The New York Times reported.
Meanwhile, the two Jewish Republican members of Congress, Reps. Lee Zeldin (N.Y.) and David Kustoff (Tenn.), were attending the party, their offices confirmed to the Times.
Trump's move the previous day to declare Jerusalem the capital of Israel and set in motion a plan to move the U.S. Embassy in Tel Aviv to Jerusalem was celebrated at the party Thursday. The decision was praised by pro-Israel voices but condemned by the Palestinians and others.

Pope Francis has called for a translation of a phrase about temptation in the Lord's Prayer to be changed.
The current wording that says "lead us not into temptation" is not a good translation because God does not lead humans to sin, he says.
His suggestion is to use "do not let us fall into temptation" instead, he told Italian TV on Wednesday night.
The Lord's Prayer is the best-known prayer in Christianity.
The pontiff said France's Roman Catholic Church was now using the new wording "do not let us fall into temptation" as an alternative, and something similar should be used worldwide.
"Do not let me fall into temptation because it is I who fall, it is not God who throws me into temptation and then sees how I fell," he told TV2000, an Italian Catholic TV channel.
"A father does not do that, a father helps you to get up immediately."
It is a translation from the Latin Vulgate, a 4th-Century Latin translation of the Bible, which itself was translated from ancient Greek, Hebrew and Aramaic.

Al Franken began his rise as a Democratic politician nine years ago by reluctantly apologizing to women for things he had said and written, enabling him to put his career as a bawdy comedian behind him and win a U.S. Senate seat.
You could argue that he never really got the hang of contrition. On Thursday, Franken stood in the Senate chamber after a string of half-apologies had failed to end a weeks-long groping scandal, and announced that he will resign his seat without so much as an “I'm sorry.”

The US District Court for the District of Columbia judge presiding over the criminal case for President Donald Trump's former national security adviser Michael Flynn has been recused from handling the case, a court spokeswoman said on Thursday.
According to a court filing, Judge Rudolph Contreras, who presided over a December 1 hearing where Flynn pleaded guilty to lying to the FBI about his contacts with Russia, will no longer handle the case.
The spokeswoman, Lisa Klem, did not say why Contreras was recused and added that the case was randomly reassigned.
Reuters could not immediately learn the reason for the recusal or reach Contreras.
An attorney for Flynn declined to comment.

As wildfires ravaged California this year, thousands of firefighters have taken on the massive task of containing and extinguishing flames over hundreds of thousands of acres.
But it's not as simple as showing up and spraying water.
"We don't just put blue stuff on the red stuff," said Scott McLean, spokesman for the California Department of Fire and Forestry Protection, known as Cal Fire.
Wildfires constantly evolve based on weather conditions. That forces firefighters and their incident commanders to constantly re-evaluate their approaches and strategies, including where to position people, equipment and logistical support.

The Iraqi military has "fully liberated" all of Iraq's territory of "ISIS terrorist gangs" and retaken full control of the Iraqi-Syrian border, it said Saturday in a statement.
"Our heroic armed forces have now secured the entire length of the Iraq-Syria border," Prime Minister Haider Al-Abadi said on his Twitter account. "We defeated Daesh (ISIS) through our unity and sacrifice for the nation. Long live Iraq and its people."
ISIS, an acronym for Islamic State in Iraq and Syria, rapidly captured large territories in Iraq and Syria and declared a caliphate in 2014. The group controlled more than 34,000 square miles of territory from the Mediterranean coast to south of Baghdad.
The campaign to eradicate the Islamic State took more than three years and about 25,000 coalition airstrikes. Iraqi forces have increasingly been pushing ISIS out of the country over the past few months. Troops last month retook the town of Rawa, one of ISIS's last footholds in the country. At that point, only pockets of ISIS resistance remained.

President Donald Trump offered a raucous retelling of his first year’s accomplishments at a campaign-style rally in Pensacola, Fla., making sure to tell voters who crossed the state line from Alabama that they should vote for Republican Roy Moore Dec. 12 to keep his agenda going.
Moore, a twice-removed Alabama Supreme Court chief justice, is in a tight race against Democrat Doug Jones after Moore was accused of sexual misconduct with a 14-year-old girl and several other teenagers when he was in his 30s.
"The future of this country cannot afford to lose a seat in the very, very close United States Senate,"  Trump said Dec. 8 at the Pensacola Bay Center, which is less than 30 miles from the Alabama border. "We need someone in that Senate seat who will vote for our Make America Great agenda … so get out and vote for Roy Moore."
Trump repeated some of his most prolific falsehoods since beating Democrat Hillary Clinton on Election Day and continued to attack the "fake news" media.

Amid backlash and boycotts, President Trump addressed a private gathering Saturday at the opening of the Mississippi Civil Rights Museum in Jackson — instead of speaking at the public opening ceremony.
The change in venue came after Trump’s plans to visit the museum, which honors civil rights martyrs, drew criticism from those who marched in the movement.
“President Trump’s attendance and his hurtful policies are an insult to the people portrayed in this civil rights museum,” U.S. Reps. John Lewis (D-Ga.) and Bennie Thompson (D-Miss.) said in a joint statement Thursday.

Both Israelis and Palestinians claim the city as their political capital and as a sacred religious site. Israel controls the entirety of the city. Any peace deal would need to resolve that.
The city’s status has been disputed, at least officially, since the 1948 Arab-Israeli War. Before that, the United Nations had designated Jerusalem as a special international zone. During the war, Israel seized the city’s western half. It seized the eastern half during the next Arab-Israeli war, in 1967.
Most foresee a peace deal that gives western Jerusalem to Israel and eastern Jerusalem to a future Palestinian state.
The United States, in order to present itself as a dispassionate broker, long considered Jerusalem’s status to be a conflict issue that was up to Israelis and Palestinians to decide. Mr. Trump is breaking with that traditional neutrality.

President Trump, armed with fresh ammunition against the mainstream media, fired off “fake news” attacks on Twitter after CNN incorrectly reported that his campaign received access to hacked emails well before the group WikiLeaks made the files public.
Trump called the mistake “vicious and purposeful” and said CNN’s slogan should be “THE LEAST TRUSTED NAME IN NEWS!” in a series of tweets Saturday morning.
“Watch to see if @CNN fires those responsible, or was it just gross incompetence?” Trump said.

Egypt on Saturday announced the discovery of two small ancient tombs in the southern city Luxor dating back some 3,500 years and hoped it will help the country’s efforts to revive its ailing tourism sector.
The tombs, located on the west bank of the river Nile in a cemetery for noblemen and top officials, are the latest discovery in the city famed for its temples and tombs spanning different dynasties of ancient Egyptian history.
“It’s truly an exceptional day,” Antiquities Minister Khaled al-Anani said. “The 18th dynasty private tombs were already known. But it’s the first time to enter inside the two tombs.”
Al-Anani said the discoveries are part of the ministry’s efforts to promote Egypt’s vital tourism industry, partially driven by antiquities sightseeing, that was hit hard by extremist attacks and political turmoil following the 2011 uprising.
The ministry said one tomb has a courtyard lined with mud-brick and stone walls and contains a six-meter (yard) burial shaft leading to four side chambers. The artifacts found inside were mostly fragments of wooden coffins. Wall inscriptions and paintings suggest it belongs to era between the reigns of King Amenhotep II and King Thutmose IV, both pharaohs of the 18th dynasty.

China expressed pessimism about bringing the North Korean standoff to a peaceful resolution, even as Kim Jong Un’s regime touted new United Nations support for “regular” talks. 
Chinese Foreign Minster Wang Yi said Saturday “the outlook is not optimistic” on the Korean Peninsula and urged all sides to end what he said was a “vicious cycle” of confrontation. Wang’s remarks -- part of a broad foreign policy speech in Beijing -- came hours after North Korea said a departing UN delegation had agreed to communications to help ease tensions.
Wang said there was still hope for a diplomatic solution to the frictions over North Korea’s nuclear ambitions. He reiterated a Chinese "freeze-for-freeze" proposal for North Korea to suspend weapons tests while the U.S. halts military drills in the area. “The first step to pull the situation on the peninsula out of the current ‘black hole’ of confrontation is to create the conditions and atmosphere to restart dialogue,” Wang said.

Voters can use the next general election to have their say on a final Brexit deal, Michael Gove has said.
The environment secretary praised Theresa May's "tenacity and skill" in securing a last-minute deal to end phase one negotiations on Friday.
But, writing in the Daily Telegraph, he said if British people "dislike the arrangement", they can change it.
Reports suggest the cabinet will meet on 19 December to discuss its "end state" plans for Brexit.
This is just two days before Parliament's two-week Christmas recess.
So, did 'soft Brexit' just win?
Mr Gove, one of the cabinet's leading Brexiteers, said the primary agreement between the two sides had "set the scene for phase two" negotiations - where issues such as trade will be discussed.
But he said that "nothing is agreed until everything is agreed" at the end of the process.

The author of an article that U.S. Special Counsel Robert Mueller believes Trump's former campaign manager Paul Manafort ghost-wrote in violation of a gag order said on Saturday he had sought input on the op-ed before publishing to avoid errors.
On Friday, Mueller unveiled evidence against Manafort to convince a judge that he wrote the article to improve his public image. Manafort is facing charges as part of an investigation into accusations of Russian meddling in the 2016 U.S. election and possible collusion between Russia and the Trump campaign.
The op-ed was published on Thursday in the English-language Kyiv Post under the byline of Oleg Voloshyn, a former spokesman for Ukraine's foreign affairs ministry.
In a telephone call with Reuters, Voloshyn said he wrote the article, but before publishing had shown it to Konstantin Kilimnik, a Ukrainian whom Mueller alluded to in a filing earlier this week as having ties to Russian intelligence.

Storms that yielded recording-breaking snowfall in the South during the week hit the Northeast on Friday evening and could continue causing problems throughout the weekend.
Winter Storm Benji was moving up the East Coast, with heavy snow predicted for a 2,000-mile stretch from the Deep South to New England. Some spots could see as much as 10 to 15 inches of snow pile up, forecasters said.
Winter weather warnings were issued Friday for parts of Massachusetts and northern Virginia, with travel expected to be hazardous in the Boston, New York, Philadelphia, Baltimore and Washington, D.C., metro areas. Officials warned that travel would be hazardous in those regions. 
Winter weather advisories were issued from Maine to northern Virginia.

Minnesota Gov. Mark Dayton’s top pick to fill Sen. Al Franken’s Senate seat, Lt. Gov. Tina Smith, is considering also running for the seat next year, as Dayton faces pressure from top Democrats in Washington to appoint more than a mere caretaker, according to two Democrats familiar with the discussions.
Franken said Thursday he would resign over allegations of sexual harassment, leaving Dayton to appoint a replacement until a special election next November to complete Franken’s term, which runs through 2020.
Dayton’s initial inclination was to pick Smith, a longtime aide and his second-in-command since 2015, to serve as a placeholder until next year’s election, a Democratic official told The Associated Press. The official requested anonymity because the official was not authorized to discuss private deliberations surrounding the appointment before Dayton’s announcement.

Santa Barbara County was under siege from the Thomas fire Sunday as fire crews fought to keep the destructive blaze from the region’s picturesque beach communities.
Authorities said the out-of-control blaze had scorched more than 200,000 acres by Sunday afternoon, growing by more than 25,000 acres during the day and triggering new evacuation orders for residents east of Mission Canyon and north of Highway 192.
Santa Ana winds, aided by extremely low humidity, pushed the Ventura County fire over the Santa Barbara County line Saturday night. The winds that bedeviled fire crews from San Diego to Ojai last week were gusting at speeds of up to 35 mph, fire officials said.
Their greatest concern was for Carpinteria. The fire was moving west above the city in an area of very dry vegetation that hasn’t burned in about 100 years, said Steve Swindle, spokesman for the Ventura County Fire Department.

In his sternest rebuke yet, Alabama Sen. Richard Shelby said repeatedly Sunday his state can “do better” than electing fellow Republican Roy Moore to the U.S. Senate, making clear that a write-in candidate was far preferable to a man accused of sexual misconduct.
Days before the pivotal race, Shelby, who is Alabama’s senior senator, said he had already cast an absentee ballot for another, unspecified Republican, even as other prominent state Republicans fell in line behind Moore.
Moore faces Democrat Doug Jones in the special election Tuesday to replace Jeff Sessions, now the U.S. attorney general.

Carson Wentz, QB, Philadelphia Eagles: Wentz exited the game against the Rams late in the third quarter with an undisclosed injury, and was quickly declared out due to a knee injury. He came up limping after absorbing multiple hits on a touchdown run that was negated by a holding penalty. Wentz stayed in the game for the remainder of the drive, which he capped with a fourth-down touchdown throw to Alshon Jeffery that gave the Eagles the lead.
Following the series, Wentz went to the trainers tent to be evaluated, and then was taken to the locker room a short time later. Nick Foles immediately began practicing snaps with center Jason Kelce on the sideline in anticipation of going in.
Late in the fourth quarter, ESPN's Adam Schefter reported that the Eagles are concerned that Wentz has torn his ACL, which would end his season.

Sen. Cory Booker (D-N.J.) is calling on President Donald Trump to resign over the more than a dozen sexual misconduct allegations against him.
Booker made the comments Saturday during a campaign event in Alabama to support Doug Jones, the state’s Democratic candidate for Senate. Jones is engaged in a tight race against embattled Republican candidate Roy Moore, whose campaign has been dogged by sexual misconduct accusations. 
Booker told VICE News that the sexual harassment allegations against Trump are “far more damning” than the claims against Sen. Al Franken (D-Minn.), who on Thursday announced his resignation from office after multiple women accused him of groping them.
“I just watched Al Franken do the honorable thing and resign,” Booker said. “My question is — why isn’t Donald Trump doing the same thing? Who has more serious allegations against him, with more women who have come forward.”

It’s standard practice for the league to review injuries and protocols, but there’s nothing standard about a player who suffers an apparent head injury and isn’t immediately removed from play.
On Sunday in Houston, Texans quarterback Tom Savage seemed to be in distress after taking a big hit from 49ers pass rusher Elvis Dumervil. Per a source with knowledge of the situation, Savage was cleared by the unaffiliated neurotrama consultant to return to action. After he did, a Texans trainer noticed that something was amiss with Savage, prompting a trip to the locker room for a full evaluation. At that point, Savage was diagnosed with a concussion and shut down for the day.
The video shows Savage’s hands shaking after the hit. Per the source, however, that video was not available to sideline personnel. And that likely will be one of the key questions that the league explores, given that video routinely is reviewed by the professionals on the sideline who are responsible for deciding whether a player should or shouldn’t return to the game.

After a three-point first half, the Jaguars-Seahawks tilt exploded into a back-and-forth thrill ride in the second half, which featured a 31-point third quarter. At one point, Jacksonville scored on three consecutive plays from scrimmage and with 10 minutes left to go in the game, the Jags had extended their lead to 27-10, thanks to brilliant throws from Blake Bortles and skillful special teams play. But Russell Wilson responded with yet another sterling fourth quarter, cutting the lead to 30-24 with two quick TD strikes. Seattle got the ball back with over two minutes to go, but immediately went four-and-out, with the final stop coming as a result of an uncharacteristic Jaguars blitz. Jacksonville took control of the AFC South and its destiny with the win, while Seattle stayed one game behind the Los Angeles Rams in the NFC West and briefly fell out of the sixth seed in the NFC.

The winners of the 2017 Nobel Peace Prize have warned countries that possess nuclear weapons to eliminate their "instruments of insanity" or risk mutual destruction.
The stark warning came Sunday as this year's peace prize was presented at a ceremony in Oslo, Norway, to the International Campaign to Abolish Nuclear Weapons.
ICAN (International Campaign to Abolish Nuclear Weapons) campaigner and Hiroshima survivor, Setsuko Thurlow signs the Nobel protocol, during a press conference at the Norwegian Nobel Committee, in Oslo, Norway, Saturday, Dec. 9, 2017. As long as atomic bombs exist, a disaster is inevitable, the head of the International Campaign to Abolish Nuclear Weapons, the winner of this year&#39;s Nobel Peace Prize, said Saturday. 
ICAN (International Campaign to Abolish Nuclear Weapons) campaigner and Hiroshima survivor, Setsuko Thurlow signs the Nobel protocol, during a press conference at the Norwegian Nobel Committee, in Oslo, Norway, Saturday, Dec. 9, 2017. As long as atomic bombs exist, a disaster is inevitable, the head of the International Campaign to Abolish Nuclear Weapons, the winner of this year's Nobel Peace Prize, said Saturday.

Three people have been arrested for allegedly throwing firebombs at a synagogue in the Swedish city of Goteborg, the second anti-Jewish attack in the Nordic nation in two days. Jewish groups condemned the attacks as “unconscionable” and demanded that authorities take action.
No one was injured in the attack late Saturday during a youth event at the synagogue and the adjacent Jewish center in Sweden’s second-largest city. Goteborg police spokesman Peter Nordengard said Sunday it is being investigated as an attempted arson.

The North Korean soldier shown on video dashing across the Demilitarized Zone and being shot five times — and surviving — was not that isolated country's typical defector. The overwhelming majority are women.
About 70% of the more than 31,000 defectors who have made it to South Korea since the end of the Korean War are women, according to the government’s Ministry of Unification. That figure has climbed in recent years, reaching about 80% from 2014-2016, and 85% this year.
The path to freedom for North Koreans usually begins by escaping across the long border with China, with the help of brokers who may lead them across Vietnam, Laos and Thailand before they finally make their way to South Korea.

The U.S. House of Representatives passed a resolution last week condemning "the ethnic cleansing" of Rohingya Muslims in Myanmar by that country's military.
The move, which is the first step to what could eventually lead to targeted sanctions against the Tatmadaw, the armed forces of Myanmar, came a day after Zeid Ra'ad al-Hussein, the U.N. High Commissioner for Human Rights, suggested that the Myanmar military may be guilty of genocide against the Muslim minority group.
Since August, more than 600,000 Rohingya have crossed into neighboring Bangladesh, where they live in squalid refugee camps. This exodus follows an army crackdown sparked by an Aug. 24 attack on Myanmar police posts and an army base by Rohingya insurgents.
The military insists its operations in Rakhine State are in response to a serious threat of insurgency. Myanmar's de-facto leader, Nobel Peace Prize Winner Aung San Suu Kyi, has defended the campaign.

Nikki R. Haley, the American ambassador to the United Nations, said on Sunday that women who have accused President Trump of sexual misconduct “should be heard,” a stunning break from the administration’s longstanding assertion that the allegations are false and that voters rightly dismissed them when they elected Mr. Trump.
Ms. Haley, a former governor and one of the highest-ranking women in Mr. Trump’s administration, refocused attention on the allegations against the president by insisting that his accusers should be treated no differently than the scores of women who have come forward in recent weeks with stories of sexual harassment and misconduct against other men.
“They should be heard, and they should be dealt with,” Ms. Haley said on CBS’s “Face the Nation.” “And I think we heard from them prior to the election. And I think any woman who has felt violated or felt mistreated in any way, they have every right to speak up.”

President Trump on Sunday slammed “the Fake News Media,” which he called “out of control,” after a string of major errors in reporting on his presidency emerged over the past week.
“Very little discussion of all the purposely false and defamatory stories put out this week by the Fake News Media,” he tweeted. “They are out of control - correct reporting means nothing to them.”
The president continued, “Major lies written, then forced to be withdrawn after they are exposed...a stain on America!”
Trump’s comments came after a Washington Post reporter tweeted a misleading photo about the crowd size at Friday’s rally in Pensacola, Fla., during which Trump took aim at ABC News’ Brian Ross and CNN. 
In a now-deleted tweet, the Post’s Dave Weigel posted a photo of a half-empty arena to mock Trump for saying the rally was “packed to the rafters.”
But that photo was not taken while Trump was speaking. Trump tweeted photos showing the arena when it was full.

An amateur terror attack struck the Port Authority Bus Terminal at 42nd Street and Eighth Avenue near Times Square on Monday morning, injuring three people and causing chaos in one of the busiest commuter hubs in the city, officials said.
Police identified the suspect allegedly behind the New York bus terminal explosion as Akayed Ullah, 27, and said the attack appears to be isolated.
Latest developments
Firefighters arrived on Eighth Avenue near the scene of a reported explosion on Monday morning in Manhattan.
Firefighters arrived on Eighth Avenue near the scene of a reported explosion on Monday morning in Manhattan.
Type of device: Ullah wore an "improvised low-tech explosive device attached to his body," which he intentionally detonated, Police Commissioner James O'Neill said.
Being treated: Ullah is now at Bellevue Hospital, where he is being treated for lacerations and burns to his hands and abdomen, New York City Fire Department Commissioner Daniel Nigro said.

Three women who publicly accused President Trump of sexual misconduct shared their stories on the Today show Monday and spoke of the retaliation they've suffered since coming forward.
In an interview with Megyn Kelly, Jessica Leeds, Samantha Holvey and Rachel Cooks spoke about their interactions with Trump. The president has denied all of the accusations, and during the interview, the White House released a statement slamming the "false claims."
The White House said the "timing and absurdity of these false claims speaks volumes" and reiterated that the American people "voiced their judgment" by electing the president.
The interview came hours before a news conference where the three women plan to demand that Congress investigate their claims.

Alabama Democrats see Tuesday’s special Senate election as a chance to renounce a history littered with politicians whose race-baiting, bombast and other baggage have long soiled the state’s reputation beyond its borders.
Many Republicans see the vote as chance to ratify their conservative values and protect President Donald Trump’s agenda ahead of the 2018 midterm elections.
At the center are Republican Roy Moore, a former jurist twice removed as state chief justice and now accused of sexual misconduct with teenage girls decades ago, and Democrat Doug Jones, an erstwhile federal prosecutor best known for prosecuting two Ku Klux Klansmen responsible for killing four black girls in the 1963 bombing of Birmingham’s 16th Street Baptist Church.
The winner will take the seat held previously by Trump’s attorney general, Jeff Sessions. Republicans control the Senate with 52 seats.

The Thomas fire raged with a new force through the weekend, expanding from Ventura County and crossing into Santa Barbara County to threaten Carpinteria and Montecito. Some of this beautiful landscape known for vineyards and beach views was subsumed in a mushroom cloud. “This region is the landscape of dreams, or so the mythology goes,” writes Times reporter Thomas Curwen. “Newcomers arrive. They raise the roof beam high over the simplest foundations and pass on to a new generation the hope that they too might believe in this sun-drenched paradise. Time, however, has cast a shadow on this pact, and it sometimes feels like a distant romance. Yet glimpses of it can still be seen, as the fires of this last week have shown.” Los Angeles Times
Parts of the coastal communities of Carpinteria and Montecito were evacuated as the Thomas fire grew and created new challenges for the exhausted fire crews. Authorities said the out-of-control blaze had scorched 230,000 acres by Sunday evening, making it the fifth-largest wildfire in modern California history.

President Donald Trump on Monday disputed a New York Times report that he watches hours of cable news programming as part of his daily routine, and he bashed CNN and MSNBC for good measure.
"Another false story, this time in the Failing @nytimes, that I watch 4-8 hours of television a day — Wrong! Also, I seldom, if ever, watch CNN or MSNBC, both of which I consider Fake News," Trump tweeted.
The Times on Saturday reported that the president consumes "long spells of cable news," including the big three cable news networks — CNN, MSNBC and Fox News — to get caught up on news, to hone his message and to rev himself up for a day of political jousting.
Trump, the Times reported, often "flips to CNN for news, moves to 'Fox & Friends' for comfort and messaging ideas, and sometimes watches MSNBC’s 'Morning Joe' because, friends suspect, it fires him up for the day." The president "spends at least four hours a day, and sometimes as much as twice that, in front of a television," according to the report.

Guillermo Del Toro’s “The Shape of Water,” Steven Spielberg’s “The Post,” and Martin McDonagh’s “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri” were among the big winners as nominations for the 75th Golden Globe Awards were unveiled in the wee hours on Monday morning.
“Three Billboards,” a revenge drama, “The Post,” a dramatic re-telling of the Pentagon Papers saga, and “The Shape of Water,” an offbeat story about the romance between a mute cleaning lady and a fish-like creature, earned best film and director nods, in addition to picking up nominations for the performances of several of its actors. “The Shape of Water” nabbed a leading seven nominations, while “Three Billboards” and “The Post” picked up six apiece. The other best drama nominees were Christopher Nolan’s World War II epic “Dunkirk” and Luca Guadagnino’s lyrical romance “Call Me by Your Name.”

President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia undertook a whirlwind tour to his new allies in the Middle East on Monday, underscoring the extension of Russia’s influence in the region and the continuing shrinkage of the United States’ role.
Mr. Putin touched down in rapid succession in Syria and Egypt, where he met briefly with their leaders, and planned to head later in the day for Turkey.
His excursion came as anger at the United States was running high over President Trump’s unilateral decision to recognize Jerusalem, the third holiest city in Islam, as the capital of Israel. That decision has helped isolate the United States and Israel, angering allies in Europe and the Arab world while helping to convince the Arab public that the United States is solidly anti-Muslim.
In Brussels on Monday, for example, Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel was firmly rebuffed when he encouraged the European Union to “recognize the facts” and endorse Mr. Trump’s action.

Saudi Arabia announced on Monday it will allow movie theaters to open in the conservative kingdom next year, for the first time in more than 35 years, in the latest social push by the country’s young crown prince.
It’s the latest stark reversal in a county where movie theaters were shut down in the 1980s during a wave of ultraconservatism in the country. Many of Saudi Arabia’s clerics view Western movies and even Arabic films made in Egypt and Lebanon as sinful.
Despite decades of ultraconservative dogma, Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman has sought to ram through a number of major social reforms with support from his father, King Salman.

Amid fears that North Korea is rapidly developing its submarine-launched ballistic missile technology, the United States, Japan and South Korea are teaming up for a drill to track such hard-to-detect missiles, military officials said Monday.
The drill is taking place over two days in waters between Japan and the Korean Peninsula, said South Korea’s Joint Chiefs of Staff, and will involve destroyers from the three nations doing computer-simulated training to track submarine missile launchings by North Korea.
The drills come in the wake of news reports that North Korea is making progress developing submarine-launched ballistic missiles, or SLBMs. The website 38 North, based at the U.S.-Korea Institute at Johns Hopkins University, obtained images of cylindrical objects, evidence that “suggests construction of a new submarine” at a facility on North Korea’s east coast.

People who’ve survived Bali’s Kerobokan prison have used many terms to describe it: overcrowded, understaffed, drug-filled, brutally violent.
One term they never use: escape-proof.
An American arrested on a drug charge this summer and sent to Kerobokan escaped from the prison on Monday, the latest person to abscond from the notorious facility.
Prison officials say Chrishan Beasley sawed through steel bars above his cell with a hacksaw, then used a rope to shimmy down a wall, according to the Associated Press. He may have overcome a final obstacle — a wall in an area under construction — using a ladder that workers...

The GOP tax bill that emerges from negotiations as soon as this week could prove less sweet for the Mars family than the candy-making magnates hope. 
House Republicans, backed by some deep-pocketed outside interests, are angling for the final package to include a full repeal of the estate tax, long a conservative bête noire that falls on a vanishingly tiny slice of the population. But Senate GOP leaders will draw a red line on their proposal to double its exemption to $22 million for couples, a Republican Senate aide tells me, saving $68 billion over the House version. 

The dust has begun to settle over how to view the Michael Flynn guilty plea and plea agreement.
The partisans have all weighed in on whether the plea is a “big nothing” or a critical crack in the president’s armor. The talking heads have now moved on to the issues du jour: did the president’s personal attorney, John Dowd, actually author Trump’s seemingly confessional tweet over why he fired Flynn (“he lied to the VP and the FBI”)? Is Trump, as president, “above the law” so that he simply cannot be charged with obstruction — or, maybe, any other crime — no matter how compelling the evidence against him?

When Mr. Moore’s campaign held its final rally in Midland City late Monday, it was Kayla Moore, the candidate’s wife, who grabbed the headlines with her attempt to inoculate her husband from charges of bigotry that have dogged him. But her comments likely raised more eyebrows than praises:
Fake news says he doesn’t like women in leadership positions, yet he supports me as the president of the Foundation for Moral Law, that he started 15 years ago today. So happy birthday, Foundation for Moral Law. Our chairman is also a woman and a prominent officeholder in the bank, not to mention all of the women that work in our campaign, and there are many.
Fake news would also have you think that my husband doesn’t support the black community. Yet my husband appointed the very first black marshal to the Alabama Supreme Court, Mr. Willie James. When he first took office as chief justice many years ago, he brought with him three people from Etowah County; two were black, and one of them is here tonight. We have many friends that are black, and we also fellowship with them in church and in our home.

President Trump attacked Sen. Kirsten Gillibrand (D-N.Y.) in a sexually suggestive tweet Tuesday morning that implied Gillibrand would do just about anything for money, prompting a swift and immediate backlash.
“Lightweight Senator Kirsten Gillibrand, a total flunky for Charles E. Schumer and someone who would come to my office 'begging' for campaign contributions not so long ago (and would do anything for them), is now in the ring fighting against Trump,” the president wrote. “Very disloyal to Bill & Crooked-USED!”

Edwin M. Lee, an affordable housing advocate and technocrat who became the first Asian-American to be elected as mayor of San Francisco, died early on Tuesday of undisclosed causes, his office said. He was 65.
“It is with profound sadness and terrible grief that we confirm that Mayor Edwin M. Lee passed away on Tuesday, December 12 at 1:11 a.m. at Zuckerberg San Francisco General Hospital. Family, friends and colleagues were at his side,” his office said in a statement.
Brent Andrew, the spokesman for the Zuckerberg San Francisco General Hospital and Trauma Center, said Mr. Lee arrived at the hospital in an ambulance at about 10 p.m. on Monday.
Mr. Andrew was unable to say what condition Mr. Lee was in when he arrived. But he said that the ambulance had picked up the mayor, along with his wife, who was not a patient, from a residential area of shops and restaurants.

The man accused of blowing up a homemade explosive in a pedestrian subway tunnel in the heart of New York City posted on Facebook earlier in the day saying, "Trump you failed to protect your nation," according to a criminal complaint.
Akayed Ullah, a 27-year-old Bangladeshi man, faces a number of federal and state terrorism charges after he allegedly detonated a device made of a battery, wires, metal screws and a Christmas tree lightbulb during the busy morning commute on Monday.
Five people were treated for minor injuries at area hospitals, while the suspect was said to be seriously injured.
In an interview with investigators, Ullah admitted that he built and detonated the device and said he was inspired to do so by ISIS.
"I did it for the Islamic State," Ullah told investigators, according to the federal complaint.

A former US sergeant who defected to North Korea and became Pyongyang's prisoner for nearly 40 years has died.
Charles Jenkins, 77, lived in Japan where he had settled with his family after his 2004 release.
He was among four US soldiers who defected in the 1960s and later became North Korean film stars, but was the only one who was released.
The others reportedly died in North Korea, including James Dresnok who was said to have died of a stroke in 2016.
Charles Jenkins died on Sado island on Monday, where he was living with his wife Hitomi Soga, also a former prisoner of North Korea.
He collapsed outside his home, Japanese media reports said, and later died of heart problems in hospital. His wife said in a statement that she was "very surprised" by his death and "cannot think of anything", according to AFP news agency.

The troubling allegations made by former NFL Network employee Jami Cantor via an amended complaint filed Monday present, in many instances, something far more tangible than the he said/she said claims that often turn on who is believed, or not believed, by a judge or a jury. With allegations of texts, photos, and videos sent to Cantor, it will be easy to prove, or to disprove, that the materials were generated and sent.
The document, a copy of which has been obtained and posted by Deadspin.com, routinely cites and quotes tangible evidence that would have been digitally created and preserved.
For example, at paragraph 23(a), the amended complaint alleges that former NFL Network executive producer Eric Weinberger’s explicit text messages said that Cantor was “put on earth to pleasure me,” and that “watching you walk down the hall makes me crazy, your ass drives me insane.”

French president Emmanuel Macron hosted about 50 heads of state in Paris on Tuesday to build momentum and increase investment to move companies and governments towards the Paris agreement global temperature goals.
In 2009, industrial nations agreed to fund climate-related projects in developing nations, with $100 billion a year by 2020. The latest estimates have the funding at $62 billion.
Macron and others are depending on the private sector to fill in the gap.
And private investors have been making announcements at the One Planet summit. On Tuesday morning, over 225 institutional investors, controlling over 26 trillion dollars of assets, say they will be working with 100 polluters, to put pressure on them as shareholders to reduce their carbon impact.
Investors are now paying attention to climate change.

Dennis Rodman is urging President Trump to allow him to travel to North Korea as a peace envoy, according to media reports.
The former NBA star’s plea came after the State Department barred American passport holders from traveling there starting Sept. 1, after the death of Otto Warmbier, a U.S. student who had been imprisoned for theft in the reclusive nation.
Rodman, who wanted to travel to the North’s capital Pyongyang for a sixth time, said during an interview in Beijing with the Guardian that American officials said of his travel plans: “It’s not a good time right now.”
Tensions between the U.S. and North Korea have been fraught for months over Pyongyang's nuclear and missile program, and Trump and North Korean leader Kim Jong Un have waged a bitter war of words.

Russia will keep a naval and an air base in Syria capable of carrying out strikes against insurgents if required after a partial military pull-out announced by President Vladimir Putin, the Kremlin said on Tuesday.
Putin on Monday ordered “a significant part” of Moscow’s military contingent to start pulling out of Syria, declaring their work largely done.
Putin made the announcement during a surprise visit to the Russian Hmeymim air base, where he met President Bashar al-Assad and addressed Russian forces.

An explosion Tuesday at a major natural gas facility near Austria's border with Slovakia left one person dead and 21 injured, and caused some gas flow disruptions to other countries, authorities said.
One person was seriously injured and 20 others slightly hurt in the morning blast at the plant in Baumgarten an der March, east of Vienna, police said. No one was in a life-threatening condition. The facility's operator said all the victims were Austrian.
The explosion set off a fire, which operator Gas Connect said was quickly contained and completely extinguished by mid-afternoon. The facility was "shut down in a controlled state and is offline," the company said.
Police wrote on Twitter that the explosion was triggered by a "technical cause," but didn't elaborate and said that local authorities are investigating. Gas Connect said it also suspects an unspecified technical fault.

Drumroll, please...
Merriam-Webster's word of the year is "feminism." 
The online dictionary said the word of the year sheds light on topics that sparked the nation's interest and is chosen by measuring which words had a significant increase in lookups compared to years past. This year, the overwhelming winner was the word "feminism," which is defined as the “the theory of the political, economic, and social equality of the sexes” and “organized activity in support of women’s rights and interests," according to Merriam-Webster.
Searches on Merriam-Webster.com for "feminism" spiked in January, 2017, during the Women's Marches held around the world, and again, when Kellyanne Conway said she didn’t consider herself a feminist in the "classic sense."  And the lookups for feminism didn't stop there. Many looked up the term amid the #Metoo movement and as increasing allegations of sexual harassment and misconduct have taken over the news cycle. 

Flames as tall as a high-rise galloping up and down mountainsides. Coastal communities shrouded in smoke. Armies of firefighters on the defensive with little hope of corralling a wildfire that refuses to quit. The scene from this month’s Thomas fire could just as easily be taken from the 2007 Zaca fire and decades before that, the 1932 Matilija fire. In a sculpted land of jagged ridges and steep canyons, where hikers can find remoteness an hour’s drive from some of California’s priciest real estate, many of the state’s biggest wildfires have burned. In the course of a week, the Thomas exploded into the fifth-biggest wildfire in the state’s modern record. At more than 230,000 acres Monday, it ranked just behind the No. 4 Zaca and above the No. 6 Matilija. The very qualities that make the Los Padres wilderness a dramatic backdrop to Santa Barbara also make it a firefighters’ nightmare.

Doug Jones’s defeat of Roy S. Moore in Tuesday’s bitterly fought special Senate election was one of the most unlikely upsets in recent campaign history. But the Democrats’ victory in Alabama carries some more immediate political implications.
Voters in Alabama’s cities and most affluent suburbs overwhelmingly rejected Mr. Moore’s candidacy, an ominous sign for Republicans on the ballot next year in upscale districts. In Jefferson County, which includes Birmingham and some of the state’s wealthiest enclaves, Mr. Jones, the Democratic candidate, captured more than 68 percent of the vote. And in Madison County, home to Huntsville and a large NASA facility, Mr. Jones won 57 percent of the vote.
While these Alabamians, many of them women, may have been appalled by the claims of sexual misconduct against Mr. Moore, results like these were not isolated to this race. They mirrored returns in last month’s statewide and legislative races in Virginia, a state filled with well-heeled suburbanites.

Senior White House aide Omarosa Manigault Newman, the former star of the initial season of "The Apprentice" and a longtime supporter of President Trump, is leaving the White House next month.
Her resignation is effective Jan. 20, according to White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders.
Manigault Newman serves as director of communications for the White House Office of Public Liaison.
The White House aide was better known as a reality television star, beginning with the first season of "The Apprentice." She was famous enough to go by one name: Omarosa.
Manigault Newman had served as Trump's chief adviser on African-American issues in the White House. In June, she attacked the Congressional Black Caucus for "showboating" and refusing to meet with President Trump.

U.S. Secretary of State Rex Tillerson offered to begin direct talks with North Korea without pre-conditions, backing away from a key U.S. demand that Pyongyang must first accept that giving up its nuclear arsenal would be part of any negotiations.
Tillerson’s new diplomatic overture comes nearly two weeks after North Korea said it had successfully tested a breakthrough intercontinental ballistic missile (ICBM) that put the entire United States mainland within range of its nuclear weapons.
“Let’s just meet,” Tillerson said in a speech to Washington’s Atlantic Council think tank on Tuesday.
The White House later issued an ambiguous statement that left unclear whether President Donald Trump - who has said Tillerson was wasting his time pursuing dialogue with North Korea - had given his approval for the speech.

Sen. Chuck Schumer’s office says the Senate Democratic Leader was the target of an attempted smear campaign in which someone forged a sexual harassment claim against him and shopped phony court documents to major media outlets.
Schumer’s office told ABC News that it has filed a report with the Capitol Police.
The 13-page document, which ABC had obtained from sources, resembles a legal complaint filed by a former Schumer staffer in U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia. It appears to detail alleged incidents of sexual harassment directed at one of his female staffers on Capitol Hill.
During a phone conversation, the former staffer said flatly that she never experienced any misconduct during her time on Schumer’s staff and never filed a complaint with the Hill’s Office of Compliance.
“The claims in this document are completely false, my signature is forged and even basic facts about me are wrong,” the former staffer listed as the plaintiff in the document told ABC News in a statement.

A day after President Trump called her out in a tweet, Sen. Kirsten Gillibrand (D-N.Y.) hit back in an appearance on the “Today” show, calling Trump a “bully” and the tweet a “sexist smear.”
The senator also repeatedly returned the conversation back to the multiple sexual misconduct allegations against Trump, which she believed was the reason the president lashed out at her on Twitter in the first place.
In Trump’s Tuesday-morning tweet, he said Gillibrand used to go to his New York office “ ‘begging’ for campaign contributions” and “would do anything for them.” 

Three Florida men seen in a viral video laughing and smiling as a shark gets dragged behind a high-speed boat have been charged with animal cruelty.
Michael Wenzel, 25; Robert Lee Benac, 28; and Spencer Heintz, 23, were all charged with two felony counts of aggravated animal cruelty, according to the Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission and the Hillsborough County State Attorney's Office. Wenzel and Benac were also charged with one count each of illegal method of take, a misdemeanor.
Florida wildlife officials began investigating after the video surfaced on social media in July. It showed a shark being dragged behind a high-speed boat.
Three men in the video, excluding the individual who shot the footage, are seen laughing and smiling as the animal visibly struggles in the boat's wake. One of the men says the shark looks "almost dead."

Hoping a thaw in relations with China will reopen opportunities after a diplomatic spat earlier this year cost many of them business, some 300 South Korean executives joined President Moon Jae-in for the start of his four-day trip to China on Wednesday.
The delegation was the largest to accompany a South Korean leader abroad, and reflected the value the firms placed on mending ties with their country’s biggest trading partner.
Trade and business exchanges between the two countries froze earlier this year after South Korea deployed U.S.-made Terminal High Altitude Area Defence (THAAD) anti-missile system regardless of vehement objections from Beijing.
Among those who travelled were executives from some of the firms hit hardest by the backlash, including Lotte Group and cosmetics and entertainment firms such as Amorepacific and S.M. Entertainment.

Palestinian President Mahmoud Abbas told Arab and Islamic leaders on Wednesday that the United States is no longer fit to broker an Israeli-Palestinian peace deal and should be replaced as mediator by the United Nations, outlining a significant policy shift in response to President Donald Trump’s recognition of Jerusalem as Israel’s capital.
In an impassionate speech, Abbas said his people will no longer accept the United States as a peace broker but added that they remain committed to international resolutions which have formed the basis of the process.

Arctic temperatures are continuing to rise while sea ice declines, a new report has found, with the region showing no sign of returning to its "reliably frozen" state.
The report, sponsored by the US National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), shows that in 2017 a warming trend in the Arctic continued, resulting in higher surface and water temperatures and melting sea ice.
Some 85 researchers from a dozen countries contributed to the Arctic Report Card, now in its 12th year.
"While 2017 saw fewer records shattered than in 2016, the Arctic shows no sign of returning to the reliably frozen region it was decades ago. Arctic temperatures continue to increase at double the rate of the global temperature increase," a NOAA news release on the report said.
The report card indicates that this may be the "new normal" for the region.

A 10-year-old boy at a school in Okinawa was slightly injured when a transport helicopter from a nearby U.S. Marine Corps base lost a windshield as it flew overhead.
A statement from U.S. Forces, Japan, confirmed that a window from a CH-53E helicopter "fell onto the sports field of Daini Futenma Elementary School outside of Marine Corps Air Station Futenma. The aircraft immediately returned to MCAS Futenma and reported the incident."
Japan's Kyodo news agency says the 17-pound helicopter window and frame landed about 15 feet from the nearest child on what the news agency described as a "playground" and that the boy was hurt when gravel was thrown up by the impact.
"The safety of children should come first. It is unforgivable that it dropped in the middle of the playground," Okinawa Gov. Takeshi Onaga told reporters as he visited the site of Tuesday's crash, according to Kyodo.

A large swath of Michigan, including all of Metro Detroit, is under a winter storm warning, according to the National Weather Service. 
The warning stretches from Muskegon through Detroit and through most lower-central communities through the state. 
Snow had already started to fall before 9 a.m. in many communities. Five to 8 inches of snow is expected throughout the day, according to the latest advisory. The heaviest is expected Wednesday afternoon when snow could fall at a rate greater than an inch per hour.
"If you must travel," a note on the weather warning says, "keep an extra flashlight, food and water in your vehicle in case of an emergency." 
For those who don't have the choice but to commute, county and local road commissions and public works departments will be working to clear the roads.

A New York appeals court Tuesday tossed out a Republican consultant’s attempt to revive her $4 million defamation case against President Donald Trump, accusing him of hurting her career after he called her a “real dummy” on Twitter.
Cheryl Jacobus filed a million-dollar lawsuit against Trump after her appearance on CNN last year in February where she criticized the campaign for lack of transparency.
The appearance prompted Trump to attack Jacobus on social media, calling her a “real dummy” who “begged” for a job with his campaign.
In another tweet, Trump said Jacobus “went hostile” after not getting a job with his campaign, adding “Major lose, zero credibility!”
The consultant claims then-candidate Trump’s comments cost her TV appearances and inspired a bullying campaign from his supporters.

A former top adviser to Donald J. Trump’s presidential campaign has agreed to cooperate with the special counsel inquiry into Russia’s interference in the 2016 election after pleading guilty on Friday to financial fraud and lying to investigators.
The adviser, Rick Gates, is a longtime political consultant who once served as Mr. Trump’s deputy campaign chairman. The plea deal could be a significant development in the investigation — a sign that Mr. Gates plans to offer incriminating information against his longtime associate and the former Trump campaign chairman, Paul Manafort, and possibly other members of the campaign in exchange for a lighter punishment. He faces up to nearly six years in prison.

The Broward County Sheriff’s Office received a call in November with an ominous warning: Nikolas Cruz, a troubled 19-year-old, was collecting guns and knives and “could be a school shooter in the making.”
It was one of at least four times local or federal authorities were contacted about such a threat linked to Cruz, including a tip the FBI received in January warning that he would “get into a school and just shoot the place up,” according to a transcript of the call obtained by The Post on Friday. Another tip to the sheriff’s office the previous year warned that Cruz “planned to shoot up the school.”
In the era of “see something, say something,” members of the public did just that. But what happened after the November call fit a disturbing pattern in the lead-up to the Parkland, Fla., massacre: No report was filed, and there is no evidence the threat was ever investigated.
Less than three months later, police say, Cruz walked into Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School and gunned down 17 students and faculty members. 

The heaviest, the largest, the most impactful — those were the superlatives the Trump administration used to describe its latest sanctions against North Korea.
But were the Treasury Department designations of more than 50 companies and ships accused of illicit trading with the pariah nation really the toughest action yet by the U.S. and the wider world?
Probably not.
Here's a look at how President Donald Trump and a top lieutenant described Friday's sanctions to punish the North for its development of nuclear weapons and ballistic missiles — and how they stack up against past economic restrictions that have been piled on Kim Jong Un's government in response to its illegal weapons tests.

The Justice Department informed the White House this month that there were substantial issues related to Jared Kushner that still needed to be investigated and would significantly delay a recommendation on whether he should receive a permanent security clearance, according to two people briefed on the matter.
The White House was not told what the issues were involving Mr. Kushner, President Trump’s son-in-law and senior adviser. But the notification led White House lawyers and aides to believe that they were more problematic than the complexity of his finances and his initial failure to disclose contacts with foreign leaders — the reasons Mr. Kushner’s lawyers have said are holding up the process, the two people said.
An interim clearance has given him access to closely guarded information, including the presidential daily brief, the intelligence summary Mr. Trump receives every day. 

Some of the 13 siblings allegedly held captive by their parents in their California home are "starting to make plans for their future," Corona Mayor Karen Spiegel told ABC News today.
"Their minds are just being opened," she said, to "having a choice and not being so controlled."
The young adult victims are now "getting up and making the day happen for themselves, getting out of bed and deciding what they want to eat."
"They're starting from very elementary stuff," she said, but have "progressed very, very well."
David and Louise Turpin are accused of abusing their children, including in some cases allegedly forcing them to shower only once a year, shackling them and beating them routinely, prosecutors said. The victims weren't released from their chains even to go to the bathroom, according to prosecutors.

During a meandering speech Friday morning at the Conservative Political Action Conference, President Trump doubled down on arming some teachers and school personnel after last week's shooting at a Parkland, Fla., high school that killed 17 people.
His comments were nearly identical to what National Rifle Association leaders proposed during the three-day annual CPAC conference on Thursday, hammering home that the fight to protect the Second Amendment could be in danger if Democrats are successful in the 2018 elections this fall.
"People get complacent. You're happy and you just won. Don't be complacent," Trump warned attendees about the usual voter drop-off for the party in power in a president's first midterms.
Trump then asked the crowd which they'd rather have — their Second Amendment rights or the tax cuts that Republicans recently passed. The deafening applause overwhelmingly came down on the side of gun rights.

Sheldon G. Adelson, one of the most hawkish supporters of Israel among American Jews, has offered to help fund the construction of a new American Embassy in Jerusalem, according to the State Department, which on Friday said it was reviewing whether it could legally accept the donation.
The total price tag to build the new embassy to replace the current one in Tel Aviv is estimated at around $500 million, according to one former State Department official. While private donors have previously paid for renovations to American ambassadors’ overseas residences, Mr. Adelson’s contribution would be likely to far surpass those gifts — and could further strain American diplomacy in the Middle East.
Before the embassy is built, the Trump administration plans to open a temporary one in Jerusalem. On Friday, it said that it was accelerating the projected opening in time to mark the 70th anniversary of the creation of the State of Israel on May 14.

Syrian government warplanes carried out a sixth day of airstrikes Friday in the rebel-held suburbs east of Damascus, killing 32 people, activists said, as the death toll from a week of bombardment soared over 400.
At the United Nations, a vote on a Security Council resolution demanding a 30-day humanitarian cease-fire across Syria was delayed until Saturday to try to close a gap over the timing of a halt to fighting.
The new bombings came a day after Syrian army helicopters dropped leaflets over the rebel-controlled areas of eastern Ghouta, urging residents of those suburbs to leave for their own safety and calling on opposition fighters to surrender because they were surrounded by government troops.
Opposition activists reported airstrikes and artillery shelling on a string of towns on the edge of Damascus or eastern Ghouta.

The truth is starting to emerge about a recent Russian attack on U.S. forces in eastern Syria, and it deserves more public attention. The assault looks increasingly like a botched attempt to bloody the U.S. and intimidate President Trump into withdrawing from Syria once Islamic State is defeated. The U.S. military won this round, but Vladimir Putin’s forces will surely look for a chance at revenge.
Here’s what we know. Several hundred men and materiel advanced on a U.S. Special Forces base near Deir al-Zour on the night of Feb. 7-8. Pentagon spokeswoman Dana White confirmed soon afterward that the “battalion-sized unit formation” was “supported by artillery, tanks, multiple-launch rocket systems and mortars.” U.S. forces responded in self-defense “with a combination of air and artillery strikes.”
Ms. White wouldn’t confirm how many attackers were killed or who was fighting, though the U.S. had “observed” the military buildup for a week. Defense Secretary James Mattis called the confrontation “perplexing,” adding that “I have no idea why they would attack there, the forces were known to be there, obviously the Russians knew.” He’s referring to the U.S.-Russia “deconfliction” agreement in which the Russians agreed to stay west of the Euphrates River.

Flashy silk and gold-embroidered outfits, adorned with pointy red shoes fit for royalty, are acceptable garb for Bollywood performers.
But apparently not if you are the telegenic prime minister of Canada on a trade trip to India.
Justin Trudeau and his family have attracted some praise but no little ridicule during their eight day visit for wearing elaborate traditional clothing that some insist is more appropriate for a Maharajah and his court than a visiting leader.
While admirers in the sprawling multicultural country lauded him for dressing “truly in the spirit of India,” the tut-tutting disapproval was far louder.
Some critics mocked the 46-year-old Canadian for cultural condescension, while others accused him of sartorial excess and political correctness gone too far.

Since the shooting massacre at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School last week, a student there named Sarah Chadwick has amassed a Twitter following of more than 150,000 people. On Thursday night, Chadwick decided to share a thought with them.
Was it time for a message calling for thoughts, prayers and privacy?
Hardly. It was time to dunk on one of Florida's U.S. senators for taking donations from the National Rifle Assn.
"We should change the names of AR-15s to 'Marco Rubio' because they are so easy to buy," Chadwick wrote, earning 45,000 retweets.
This is what politicizing a tragedy looks like, and the kids are more than happy to keep doing it.
With 17 of their classmates and faculty shot to death, the students of the school have become celebrity activists, whom many left-leaning Americans have embraced as the new leaders of the nation's gun control movement.

Several major companies — Enterprise Holdings, First National Bank of Omaha, Symantec, Hertz and Avis — have ended co-branding partnerships with the National Rifle Association as a #BoycottNRA social media movement picks up steam.
Enterprise — the parent company of car-rental brands Enterprise, Alamo and National — cut ties on Thursday, when it discontinued an arrangement that offered discounts to NRA members. Hertz, Avis Budget Group and TrueCar later followed suit.
First National Bank of Omaha, one of the country’s largest privately held banks, also announced Thursday the end of a credit-card co-branding deal with the NRA. The bank had issued what its ads described as the “Official Credit Card of the NRA,” according to the Omaha World-Herald; the Visa card offered 5 percent back on gas and sporting goods store purchases and a $40 bonus card.
On Friday, Symantec announced in a terse statement on Twitter that it had also ended its discount program with the gun-rights organization. The company, which provides cybersecurity solutions worldwide, had been offering discounts on Norton anti-virus and malware protection, cutting prices on its premium package from $110 to $48 for NRA members.

The House Intelligence Committee released a redacted Democratic memorandum on Saturday that counters Republican claims that top F.B.I. and Justice Department officials had abused their powers in spying on a former Trump campaign aide.
The document, which underwent weeks of review by President Trump and his national security team, was intended by Democrats to offer a point-by-point refutation of what it called the “transparent” attempt by President Trump’s allies on the committee to undermine the investigations into Russia’s election meddling and what role, if any, Trump associates played in it.
The dueling accounts reflected an extraordinary struggle on the committee to try to shape public perceptions of the credibility of the nation’s top law enforcement agencies. For weeks, instead of focusing its full energy on investigating an attack on the American democratic system, the committee has been pulled into a furious effort by Mr. Trump and his allies to sow doubts about the inquiries and the agencies conducting them.

As the U.N. Security Council voted unanimously Saturday on a 30-day cease-fire to stem spiraling bloodshed in Syria, medics in hospitals across a besieged Damascus enclave said they were treating fresh wounds and waiting for a miracle. 
More than 500 people have been killed and 2,500 wounded in a ferocious six-day blitz by Syrian and Russian warplanes on the opposition-held suburb of Eastern Ghouta, according to relief groups and rescue workers. World powers have scrambled to stem the violence, one of the bloodiest periods of Syria’s six year war, behind closed doors and in charged public meetings at the U.N. Security Council. 
Jaded after successive failed cease-fires, doctors reached by phone Saturday said they were wary of raising patients’ hopes and that shelling continued. 
“The last explosion I heard was five minutes ago. I hope this vote will succeed, but we do not trust Russia,” said Hamza Hassan, a doctor supported by the Syrian-American Medical Society, a nonprofit group. “We are so exhausted. So exhausted.”

The only armed sheriff’s deputy at a Florida high school where 17 people were killed took cover outside rather than charging into the building when the massacre began, the Broward County sheriff said on Thursday. The sheriff also acknowledged that his office received 23 calls related to the suspect going back a decade, including one last year that said he was collecting knives and guns, but may not have adequately followed up.
The deputy, Scot Peterson, resigned on Thursday after being suspended without pay after Sheriff Scott Israel reviewed surveillance video.
“He never went in,” Sheriff Israel said in a news conference. He said the video showed Deputy Peterson doing “nothing.”
“There are no words,” said Sheriff Israel, who described himself as “devastated, sick to my stomach.”
Two other deputies were placed on restricted duty on Thursday because they may have mishandled tips called in to the sheriff’s office over the past two years warning that the suspect, Nikolas Cruz, appeared intent on becoming a school shooter, Sheriff Israel said.

The National Rifle Association lashed out at corporations rushing to abandon it, as companies from United Airlines to Best Western have cut ties with the gun lobby group under pressure from a boycott movement following a Feb. 14 high school shooting.
Without context, twin announcements from Delta and United airlines on Saturday morning might look trivial: The end of flight discounts to the NRA’s annual convention, which few outside the gun rights organization likely knew existed before they became boycott targets.
But in abandoning the NRA, the airlines followed car rental giants Avis, Hertz and Enterprise, the Best Western hotel chain, the global insurance company MetLife, and more than a dozen other corporations that have severed affiliations with the gun group in the last two days.

A former top adviser to Donald J. Trump’s presidential campaign has agreed to cooperate with the special counsel inquiry into Russia’s interference in the 2016 election after pleading guilty on Friday to financial fraud and lying to investigators.
The adviser, Rick Gates, is a longtime political consultant who once served as Mr. Trump’s deputy campaign chairman. The plea deal could be a significant development in the investigation — a sign that Mr. Gates plans to offer incriminating information against his longtime associate and the former Trump campaign chairman, Paul Manafort, and possibly other members of the campaign in exchange for a lighter punishment. He faces up to nearly six years in prison.
The deal came as the special counsel, Robert S. Mueller III, has been raising pressure on Mr. Gates and Mr. Manafort with dozens of new charges of money laundering and bank fraud unsealed on Thursday. Both men were first indicted in October and pleaded not guilty. The plea agreement was part of a flurry of recent activity by the special counsel’s team. Last week, 13 Russians were indicted on charges relating to a carefully planned scheme to incite political discord in the United States in the months before the 2016 election.

Michael Steele, the former chairman of the Republican National Committee, has spoken out to defend himself after the communications director of the Conservative Political Action Conference claimed that Steele was the token black guy of the RNC. 
RNC Communications director Ian Walters told hundreds of conservatives gathered at the event that Steele was elected as RNC chairman 'because he was a black guy.' The comment reportedly drew gasps across the room.
But it didn't stop there - Walters continued with his cringe-worthy remarks stating that electing Steele as chairman was 'the wrong thing to do.' 
Steele was near the back of the room at the time. He said Walters' remarks show 'a lack of maturity and a lack of understanding of the work we did and the work we continue to do

The Trump administration and key Asian allies are preparing to expand interceptions of ships suspected of violating sanctions on North Korea, a plan that could include deploying U.S. Coast Guard forces to stop and search vessels in Asia-Pacific waters, senior U.S. officials said.
The Coast Guard Cutter Midgett, a 378-foot high-endurance cutter homeported in Seattle, transits the Strait of Juan de Fuca enroute to Seattle, Washington, U.S. in this October 13, 2015. Petty Officer 1st Class Levi Read/U.S. Coast Guard/Handout via REUTERS
Washington has been talking to regional partners, including Japan, South Korea, Australia and Singapore, about coordinating a stepped-up crackdown that would go further than ever before in an attempt to squeeze Pyongyang’s use of seagoing trade to feed its nuclear missile program, several officials told Reuters.
While suspect ships have been intercepted before, the emerging strategy would expand the scope of such operations but stop short of imposing a naval blockade on North Korea. Pyongyang has warned it would consider a blockade an act of war.
The strategy calls for closer tracking and possible seizure of ships suspected of carrying banned weapons components and other prohibited cargo to or from North Korea, according to the officials, who spoke on condition of anonymity. Depending on the scale of the campaign, the United States could consider beefing up the naval and air power of its Pacific Command, they said.

Sheldon G. Adelson, one of the most hawkish supporters of Israel among American Jews, has offered to help fund the construction of a new American Embassy in Jerusalem, according to the State Department, which on Friday said it was reviewing whether it could legally accept the donation.
The total price tag to build the new embassy to replace the current one in Tel Aviv is estimated at around $500 million, according to one former State Department official. While private donors have previously paid for renovations to American ambassadors’ overseas residences, Mr. Adelson’s contribution would be likely to far surpass those gifts — and could further strain American diplomacy in the Middle East.
Before the embassy is built, the Trump administration plans to open a temporary one in Jerusalem. On Friday, it said that it was accelerating the projected opening in time to mark the 70th anniversary of the creation of the State of Israel on May 14.

Russian military spies hacked several hundred computers used by authorities at the 2018 Winter Olympic Games in South Korea, according to U.S. intelligence.
They did so while trying to make it appear as though the intrusion was conducted by North Korea, what is known as a “false-flag” operation, said two U.S. officials who spoke on the condition of anonymity to discuss a sensitive matter.
Officials in PyeongChang acknowledged that the Games were hit by a cyberattack during the Feb. 9 Opening Ceremonies but had refused to confirm whether Russia was responsible. That evening there were disruptions to the Internet, broadcast systems and the Olympics website. Many attendees were unable to print their tickets for the ceremony, resulting in empty seats.
Analysts surmise the disruption was retaliation against the International Olympic Committee for banning the Russian team from the Winter Games due to doping violations. No officials from Russia’s Olympic federation were allowed to attend, and while some athletes were permitted to compete under the designation “Olympic Athletes from Russia,” they were unable to display the Russian flag on their uniforms and, if they won medals, their country’s anthem was not played.

After several months of excavation work, Egypt's antiquities ministry said on Saturday that an ancient cemetery had been discovered near the city of Minya, south of Cairo.
The large necropolis is located 2.5 miles north of the Tuna al-Gabal area, a vast archaeological site on the edge of the western desert. The area is known to house ancient catacombs from the Pharaonic Late Period and the Ptolemaic dynasty.
Antiquities Minister Khaled al-Enany said the large necropolis, which is more than 2,000 years old, contains a gold mask, 40 sarcophagi (ornate stone-carved coffins) and about 1,000 statues — several of them depicting ancient priests, pottery, jewelry and other artifacts.
The minister told reporters the uncovering was the beginning of what he thought would be a much bigger discovery.
He hailed the initial find as "important, as it explains several aspects of the life of the ancient Egyptians," adding that excavators would need at least five years to complete the project.
Mostafa Waziri, head of the archaeological mission, said eight tombs have been uncovered so far and he expects more will be discovered soon.

It was near the end of the Conservative Political Action Conference, at the end of four adulatory days on the Maryland shore, that President Trump received a rare dose of criticism from one of the conservative speakers on the main stage. The criticism, from writer Mona Charen, came during a panel titled “#UsToo: Left out by the Left.” Charen was one of four women on the panel, which focused on how conservatives should approach and grapple with the #MeToo movement.
“I’m disappointed about our side about being silent about serial harassers and abusers, including the one sitting in the White House,” Charen said, “because they happen to have an R beside their name.” This was an obvious reference to President Trump, who has been accused of sexual harassment and misconduct by more than a dozen women. He has denied all those allegations.
The hall erupted in booing and some shouting, a stark break from the cheering and applause that have marked the four-day conservative conclave. Charen is a National Review writer who worked in the White House of Ronald Reagan. But although Reagan was—and always is—repeatedly invoked during CPAC, this is now the party of Trump, and to question his conduct towards women amounted to an act of treason.

A 22-year-old woman is dead following a double stabbing at Winchester Public Library on Saturday morning, authorities said.
The second victim, a 77-year-old man, sustained nonlife-threatening injuries while attempting to intervene, and the suspect, 23-year-old Jeffrey Yao, of Winchester, was arrested at the scene and has been charged with murder, Middlesex District Attorney Marian Ryan said at a press conference Saturday afternoon.
Ryan said more details will come out at Yao’s arraignment on Monday. Here’s what we know as of Saturday afternoon:
Winchester police received “several” 911 calls at about 10:38 a.m. Saturday reporting a stabbing at the library, according to Ryan. With the police station located nearby, officers “almost immediately” responded to the scene, where they discovered two people suffering from stab wounds, she said.
The 22-year-old woman had been seated at a table in a reading room off the library’s main lobby “apparently studying or doing work,” according to Ryan, when Yao allegedly approached her from behind.
“Mr. Yao began striking her with what we now know to be a — what appears to be a — hunting knife with approximately a 10-inch blade,” Ryan said. “She suffered a number of slash and stab wounds to the head and upper torso.”
The woman then left the table, apparently attempting to get to the library’s front lobby and door, according to the district attorney.

An application to wiretap a former associate of President Trump’s campaign in fall 2016 “made only narrow use” of information provided by a former British spy who compiled a notorious dossier about Mr. Trump and Russia, according to a memo released by Democrats on the House Intelligence Committee on Saturday.
Democrats on the committee wrote the document to counter a Republican memo that portrayed as scandalous the application to wiretap Carter Page, the former Trump campaign associate.
The Republican memo accused law enforcement officials of abusing their surveillance powers because they relied on information provided by the former spy, Christopher Steele, without saying his research into purported links between Mr. Trump and Russia was financed by the Hillary Clinton campaign and the Democratic National Committee.
The Democrats, calling the Republican memo deeply misleading, produced the rebuttal to detail what they said were inaccurate claims and material omissions.

U.S. Sen. Dianne Feinstein failed to win the official endorsement of the California Democratic Party as she seeks her fifth term, another sign that the party is divided over how best to battle Republicans in Washington.
Democratic activists were more eager to back her primary challenger, state Senate leader Kevin de Leon, who is touting himself as a fresh face with stronger progressive credentials, particularly on immigration.
However, he too failed to earn the 60 percent support needed to win the endorsement Saturday at Democrats' annual convention. That means neither candidate will get the party's seal of approval or extra campaign cash leading into the June primary.
With Democrats still licking their wounds from the 2016 election, some of the party's biggest stars, including U.S. Sen. Kamala Harris and U.S. Rep. Maxine Waters, urged unity ahead of the midterm elections. They reminded more than 3,000 activists gathered this weekend that President Donald Trump is their common enemy.

That’s how a biographer described Xi Jinping after China’s Communist Party floated a momentous proposal to lift the two-term limit on the presidency. It’s almost certain to pass during the annual session of China’s congress, which begins next Monday.
Mr. Xi has been increasingly wielding his power. The government’s takeover of the debt-ridden Anbang Insurance Group sent a blunt warning against corporate debt, and he is sending his top economic policymaker to Washington this week to address trade frictions.

The 23rd Winter Olympics wrapped up in Pyeongchang, South Korea, with a rousing closing ceremony that included K-pop and a conga line. (Here’s the medal count: Norway claimed the most, South Korea was first among Asian nations, and Australia came away with three.)
These Games are likely to be most remembered for the scandal over Russian doping and for the brief unity of the Koreas — an extraordinary diplomatic moment that raised the possibility of renewed international talks with the North.
Our correspondents look at whether South Korea’s president, Moon Jae-in, can turn the Olympic truce into a lasting peace, a challenge made tougher by new U.S. sanctions targeting the North’s clandestine shipping fleet.

Thousands of students at Florida's Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School are preparing to return to classes this week amid an intensifying controversy over law enforcement efforts to halt the slaughter Feb. 14.
A "variety of support services" were available at a campus orientation Sunday for staff, students and families less than two weeks after the rampage left 17 people dead and more than a dozen wounded.
Cameron Kasky, 17-year-old survivor-turned activist, urged others to be kind to one another, "Even if it's not easy. We all mess up; there’s nothing wrong with that."
Fellow student Jaclyn Corin tweeted, "Going back to school for the first time ... this movement is for the 17."
Monday and Tuesday will be staff planning days, and classes resume Wednesday on a modified schedule. The full class schedule is set to resume March 5. The freshman building, where the carnage took place, will remain closed, and tentative plans call for its demolition.

Samsung just announced the Galaxy S9, and now we’re getting details on how much retailers and wireless carriers are going to charge for it. The cheapest way to get the phone (without a trade-in) is through Samsung itself. But pricing gets surprisingly more complicated when you bring in wireless carriers: AT&T and Verizon are charging extra, but they’re also offering trade-in discounts that can more than offset the price increase.
Here are the details we have so far — we’ll be updating with more info as it comes out. In all cases, preorders start March 2nd and sales start March 16th.

South Korea’s president, Moon Jae-in, has worked hard to be a matchmaker in this month’s Winter Olympics, getting North and South Korea to march together in the opening ceremony and tirelessly urging visiting dignitaries from the North and the United States to talk.
But as the 16-day Games end on Sunday and the Olympic euphoria wears off, Mr. Moon may find the hard part of managing these relationships is just beginning.
On Sunday, Mr. Moon scored a potential diplomatic breakthrough when Kim Yong-chol, a senior North Korean official attending the closing ceremony, said the North was willing to open dialogue with the United States.
It was unclear whether Mr. Kim attached any preconditions. After Vice President Mike Pence met with the South’s leader this month, American officials said they were open to holding preliminary talks with North Korea — but only to reassert their position that sanctions and pressure will not let up until the North starts denuclearizing.

A new United Nations resolution demanding a cease-fire across Syria appeared to have little effect on Sunday, as Syrian government forces began new ground attacks against a rebel-held enclave east of Damascus, the capital, and continued aerial bombings that have killed more than 500 people there in the past week.
There were reports Sunday evening of a suspected chlorine attack, with one child killed in eastern Ghouta and 11 people suffering symptoms like labored breathing, according to medical staff supported by the Syrian American Medical Society.
The unabated violence was disappointing after days of haggling over the wording of the Security Council resolution, which passed Saturday with the approval of both Russia, which backs the Syrian government, and the United States, which opposes it.
“Actually there is no cease-fire at all,” Firas Abdullah, an anti-government activist in eastern Ghouta, said via internet chat. “Assad airplanes and Russian airplanes are still hitting the cities of eastern Ghouta. Now while I am talking, there is a helicopter from the Assad army, just flying above us.”

Six people have been taken to hospital after reports of an explosion and a fire in the Hinckley Road area of Leicester.
Police declared a "major incident" after reports of a blast just after 19:00 GMT.
A police spokesman said: "At this stage there is no indication this is terrorist related."
Carlisle Street and part of Hinckley Road have been closed and people are being asked to avoid the area.
Two of the six people taken to hospital are in a critical condition and the other four are "walking wounded", according to the University Hospitals of Leicester NHS Trust.
Angel Namaala lives opposite the scene and told the BBC she had heard "this big thud, like an earthquake".
She added: "The building had gone down and people were trying to help where they could by taking the bricks off. But the fire was getting bigger and bigger so people were told to leave the scene."
Six fire engines have been at the scene, Leicestershire Police said. Flames could be seen rising from a building in the middle of a parade of shops.

Jerusalem church leaders on Sunday closed the Church of the Holy Sepulchre to protest announced plans by the city’s municipality earlier this month to collect property tax (arnona) from church-owned properties on which there are no houses of worship.
The legislation initiated by MK Rachel Azaria (Kulanu) would expropriate the ownership of lands that were sold by the church to private buyers.
Adeeb Jawad, the custodian of the keys of the Church of the Holy Sepulchre (MARC ISRAEL SELLEM/THE JERUSALEM POST)Adeeb Jawad, the custodian of the keys of the Church of the Holy Sepulchre (MARC ISRAEL SELLEM/THE JERUSALEM POST)
Two weeks ago, the municipality notified the Finance, Interior and Foreign ministries and the Prime Minister’s Office that it will start collecting a total of NIS 650 million in tax from 887 properties on which there are no houses of prayer. It said it has refrained from such tax collections thus far because the state did not allow it.
Azaria’s bill was set to be voted upon in the Ministerial Committee for Legislation but was postponed a week.
The church leaders dubbed the moves by Israeli authorities as a “systematic campaign of abuse against churches and Christians.”

Garba Sule was preparing for evening prayers when heavily armed Boko Haram jihadists rode into town last week in pickup trucks, firing hundreds of rounds into the air and demanding directions to the local girls’ school.
The camouflage-clad militants loaded up dozens of students from the Dapchi Government Girls Science and Technical College and drove them into the surrounding scrubland, according to eyewitnesses, schoolteachers and local officials. Among them: Mr. Sule’s 13-year-old daughter, Zara.
A week after the Feb. 19 attack, 110 schoolgirls from this remote town in northeastern Nigeria remain unaccounted for, stunning Africa’s most populous nation and rekindling memories of Boko Haram’s seizure of 276 girls from Chibok Government Secondary School in 2014.
That earlier attack, initially ignored by Nigeria’s government, ultimately prompted a global activist movement—#BringBackOurGirls. About half of the kidnapped Chibok schoolgirls either escaped or were ransomed; 112 remain missing. At least 13 are presumed dead. Boko Haram continues to hold thousands of abducted boys and girls.

A 22-year-old woman was fatally stabbed and an elderly man injured while coming to her aid in a stabbing at a public library in Massachusetts on Saturday.
The suspect, identified as 23-year-old Jeffrey Yao of Winchester, was arrested and charged with one count of armed assault with intent to murder and one count of murder, after the attack at the Winchester Public Library in a Boston suburb, Middlesex District Attorney Marian Ryan and Winchester Chief of Police Peter MacDonnell said in a press release.
Yao is being held without bail and will be arraigned on Monday.
“The preliminary investigation suggests that the female victim was seated at a table in the library when the suspect approached her, unprovoked, stabbing her multiple times,” according to authorities. They added that a 77-year-old man was stabbed in the arm while rushing to her aide.
Both victims, whose identities are not yet being released, were brought to local hospitals, where the female died. The man was still hospitaas of Saturday.

When Coral Springs police officers arrived at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland, Florida, on February 14 in the midst of the school shooting crisis, many officers were surprised to find not only that Broward County Sheriff's Deputy Scot Peterson, the armed school resource officer, had not entered the building, but that three other Broward County Sheriff's deputies were also outside the school and had not entered, Coral Springs sources tell CNN. The deputies had their pistols drawn and were behind their vehicles, the sources said, and not one of them had gone into the school.
With direction from the Broward deputies who were outside, Coral Springs police soon entered the building where the shooter was. New Broward County Sheriff's deputies arrived on the scene, and two of those deputies and an officer from Sunrise, Florida, joined the Coral Springs police as they went into the building.
Some Coral Springs police were stunned and upset that the four original Broward County Sheriff's deputies who were first on the scene did not appear to join them as they entered the school, Coral Springs sources tell CNN. It's unclear whether the shoote

The Supreme Court on Monday declined to clear the way for the Trump administration to end the Obama-era program that protects about 700,000 young immigrants from deportation, meaning that the so-called “Dreamers” could remain in legal limbo for months unless Congress acts to make their status permanent.
President Trump ended the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals, or DACA, program last September, calling it an unconstitutional use of executive power by his predecessor and reviving the threat of deportation for immigrants who had been brought to the United States illegally as young children.
But two federal judges have ordered the administration to maintain major pieces of the program while legal challenges move forward, notably by requiring the administration to allow people enrolled in it to renew their protected status. The Supreme Court’s decision on Monday not to hear the government’s appeal will keep the program alive for months.

While urging governors to work with him on new school safety measures, President Trump again attacked officers Monday for not entering a Florida high school building and somehow engaging a gunman who killed 17 people dead with a military-style rifle.
"I really believe I'd run in there even if I didn't have a weapon, and I think most of the people in this room would have done that, too," Trump told a group of state governors gathered at the White House for talks on multiple issues.
Trump singled out a sheriff's deputy assigned to Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland, Fla., calling his lack of action during the Feb. 14 shooting "disgusting." But he also added: "You never know until you’re tested.”
Noting that local law enforcement officials had received warnings about the shooter's behavior, Trump said, "the only worse job is they didn’t nab this guy earlier.”

The Supreme Court heard fiery arguments Monday in a case that could remove a key revenue stream for public-sector unions.
A sharply divided court could be poised to overturn a 40-year-old Supreme Court decision that would further undermine an already shrinking union movement.
Attorneys for Mark Janus, a child support specialist for the state of Illinois, argue that people like Janus, who choose not to join a union shouldn't be compelled to pay partial union fees. The union argues that he should because he benefits from collective bargaining negotiations. The Supreme Court agreed in 1977, but that could change with the new conservative tilt of the court.
When a decision is reached, expected in June, all eyes will be on Trump-appointed justice, Neil Gorsuch, who was uncharacteristically quiet in Monday's proceedings. He asked no questions and will likely be the deciding vote, given that the other justices split 4-to-4 in a similar case last year. The case last year was decided just after the death of the late Justice Antonin Scalia, and the balance didn't seem to change Monday.

A federal appeals court in New York City ruled Monday that gay employees are allowed to sue their employers under federal civil-rights law for discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, an issue that has split courts across the country.
The decision by the 2nd U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals follows a similar ruling last April by appeals judges in Chicago. After a federal appeals court in Atlanta ruled the opposite way last year, the plaintiffs in that case appealed to the Supreme Court, but the court declined the petition.
Legal experts said Monday’s ruling increases the likelihood the Supreme Court will take up the issue.
The case in New York focuses on a 2010 lawsuit brought by Donald Zarda, a gay skydiving instructor who alleged he was fired by his employer after a customer complained about Mr. Zarda’s disclosure of his sexual orientation during a jump with a female skydiver. Mr. Zarda died in 2015.
One of Mr. Zarda’s claims was that his employer had violated Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, which prohibits employment discrimination based on “race, color, religion, sex, or national origin.”

How do I know him? Where have I seen him? The Man in the Hat looked familiar, I thought, as I peered over at him a second time.
It was Christmas Eve 2017. My family and I were about to be seated at a quaint restaurant in Manhattan’s West Village. We had just come from Gramercy Park—on the one night each year when the exclusive park (accessible only to nearby residents with special keys) opens its gates to outsiders. There had been carols. People had sung with abandon. In short, it was a magical night. I was happy.
Amid the glow of candles and soft lighting, I strained to look again at the Man in the Hat. He was part of a small group that had just exited the main dining room. They were now gathering their belongings, likely vacating what was to be our table. And then it clicked. He looks just like . . . no, couldn’t be. Could it?
A student of Karma, I found myself seizing the moment. Whereas a decade ago I would have turned and fled the restaurant at the prospect of being in the same place as this man, many years of personal-counseling work (both trauma-specific and spiritual) had led me to a place where I now embrace opportunities to move into spaces that allow me to break out of old patterns of retreat or denial.

Actress Heather Locklear was arrested at her Thousand Oaks home on Sunday night on suspicion of domestic battery and assault of a peace officer, according to the Ventura County Sheriff's Office.
Deputies were called to Locklear's house at 9:42 p.m. in response to a domestic incident involving the 56-year-old actress' boyfriend, said sheriff's Sgt. Eric Buschow.
"She was extremely hostile and uncooperative and at one point became combative with the deputies" and impeded their investigation, Buschow said.
Additional deputies were called to the scene after Locklear started trying to fight with the law enforcement officers, he said. She physically resisted arrest, and deputies struggled to get her into a patrol car.
Locklear was arrested at 10:27 p.m. on suspicion of one felony count of domestic battery. For a felony charge to arise, there must be physical evidence of an altercation or a complaint of pain, Buschow said.
She also was booked on suspicion of three misdemeanor counts of battery of a peace officer.

Just days after the U.N. Security Council demanded a 30-day ceasefire across Syria, heavy shelling has resumed in the Damascus suburb of Eastern Ghouta.
Meanwhile, according to Russian state media, Russian President Vladimir Putin has ordered a "humanitarian corridor" to allow civilians to leave the besieged region.
The area, held by rebels and under attack by the Syrian regime, has been targeted in a series of strikes over the past week — resulting in the deaths of more than 500 people, including many women and children, according to observer estimates.
The airstrikes briefly eased up in the hours after the Security Council's unanimous vote on Saturday, NPR's Ruth Sherlock reports from Beirut. But they've returned — and heavy shelling has also began, as the air campaign has been replaced by a ground war.
"There's even reports of chlorine gas attacks ... in one of the towns that's near the frontline where rebels fighting the Syrian regime," Ruth says. "There's videos posted online, really distressing images of people, including children, coughing and choking in a makeshift hospital. We spoke to doctors who said that this had happened. I can't independently confirm this but what is clear is that civilians are desperate."
There are some 350,000 people trapped under siege in Eastern Ghouta, Ruth says; the U.N. estimates as many as 400,000 people live in the region.

There was a time, not so long ago, when a Chinese leader setting himself up as ruler for life would have stirred international condemnation for bucking the global trend toward greater democracy. Now, such an action seems fully in keeping with moves by many countries in the other direction.
The surprise disclosure on Sunday that the Communist Party was abolishing constitutional limits on presidential terms — effectively allowing President Xi Jinping to lead China indefinitely — was the latest and arguably most significant sign of the world’s decisive tilt toward authoritarian governance, often built on the highly personalized exercise of power.
The list includes Vladimir V. Putin of Russia, Abdel Fattah el-Sisi of Egypt and Recep Tayyip Erdogan of Turkey, all of whom have abandoned most pretenses that they rule according to the people’s will. Authoritarianism is also reappearing in places like Hungary and Poland that barely a quarter century ago shook loose the shackles of Soviet oppression.
There are many reasons for such moves by Mr. Xi and others — including protecting their power and perks in an age of unrest, terrorism and war amplified by new technologies — but a significant one is that few countries have the standing or authority, morally or otherwise, to speak out — least of all, critics say, the United States.

Five people have died in an explosion at a shop in Leicester.
Residents said they heard "a big thud, like an earthquake" at the time of the blast in Hinckley Road at about 19:00 GMT on Sunday.
Five other people remain in hospital, one in a critical condition, Leicestershire Police said.
Supt Shane O'Neill said police believe there may be more people unaccounted for and rescue efforts were continuing on Monday.
At this stage the explosion is not being linked to terrorism, he added.
The building consisted of a shop premises on the ground level and a two-storey flat above.
aftermath of the explosion in LeicesterImage copyrightAFP
The shop had gone through many owners but recently became a Polish supermarket called Zabka. It is believed to have only been trading since the new year.
Store owner Aram Kurd, who was on duty with another member of staff, said he had gone to the storeroom when the explosion happened.

South Korea’s president, Moon Jae-in, urged the United States and North Korea on Monday to soften their uncompromising stances so that talks could start on defusing the crisis prompted by the North’s nuclear program and Washington’s threats to stop it with military force.
During a meeting with China’s vice premier, Liu Yandong, Mr. Moon said both North Korea and the United States had begun showing a willingness for talks. But Mr. Moon said both sides still needed to step back from their uncompromising stances to make talks possible, according to a statement from his office.
“The United States needs to lower the threshold for dialogue, and North Korea should express a willingness to denuclearize,” Mr. Moon was quoted as saying, summarizing the obstacles he faced in trying to get the two countries to sit down for talks.
Mr. Moon’s remarks came a day after he met Kim Yong-chol, a senior North Korean official who attended the closing ceremony of the Winter Olympics in Pyeongchang, South Korea, on Sunday. During the meeting, Mr. Kim expressed the North’s willingness to talk to American officials, according to Mr. Moon’s office. Given the deep mistrust between both sides, though, that is far from an assurance that negotiations will occur.South Korea’s president, Moon Jae-in, urged the United States and North Korea on Monday to soften their uncompromising stances so that talks could start on defusing the crisis prompted by the North’s nuclear program and Washington’s threats to stop it with military force.

President Trump and the Kremlin have denied allegations that Russia and the Trump campaign colluded in the 2016 presidential election – but the probe into Russia’s meddling is forging ahead.
A special counsel was appointed to investigate potential wrongdoing, and the team has already brought multiple charges against people associated with the presidential campaign. 
Multiple investigators are looking into just how wide the scope of Russia’s involvement in the 2016 presidential election is and if the foreign nation had any interaction with the Trump campaign.
Investigators are also looking at the financial ties between some Trump associates and the Kremlin.
Multiple congressional committees have launched probes into Russia’s attempts to influence the election.
And the Department of Justice appointed Robert Mueller as its special counsel overseeing its investigation in May.
Mueller was appointed after Attorney General Jeff Sessions, who was the first Republican senator to endorse Trump, recused himself from the investigation. His appointment also followed a growing Democratic outcry for someone outside the Justice Department to handle the probe.
Mueller’s investigation has led to multiple charges – although none are directly related to misconduct from the campaign.
Paul Manafort and his associate, Richard Gates, turned themselves over to federal authorities in October and were hit with a 12-count indictment – with charges ranging from conspiracy against the U.S. to conspiracy to launder money.  

A Pennsylvania school district says it's canceling classes at an elementary school on Wednesday because a church down the street is hosting a ceremony featuring AR-15 rifles.
World Peace and Unification Sanctuary in Newfoundland is encouraging couples to bring their AR-15 rifles to a commitment ceremony. The church believes the AR-15 symbolizes the "rod of iron" in the biblical book of Revelation.
The ceremony, to be held about a half-mile from Wallenpaupack South Elementary School, is expected to draw hundreds of couples.
On Friday, the superintendent of the Wallenpaupack Area School District wrote in a letter to parents that while "there is no direct threat to our school or community," given concerns about parking, traffic and the "nature of the event," students will be bused to schools about 15 miles (24 kilometers) away.
Superintendent Michael Silsby added there will be an increased security presence at the school all week.
The church, a breakaway faction of the Unification Church, has said it planned Wednesday's event months ago, well before the Feb. 14 massacre at a Florida high school. Authorities say the alleged gunman used an AR-15 in the attack that killed 17.

President Trump plans to name Brad Parscale, the digital director of his 2016 campaign, to run his re-election bid, according to the Drudge Report. The Associated Press has since corroborated the report.
Parscale, who started off the campaign by building its website, became known for commanding an ambitious data project, as laid out in a Businessweek profile from the time. He was also known for his use of social media during the campaign. Businessweek described him as one of the few people trusted with ghost-writing Trump’s tweets.
The campaign’s — and Parscale’s — Facebook strategy has drawn particular scrutiny. As The Verge has reported, Facebook’s system rewards more polarizing ads — a boon to the Trump campaign, which ended up paying a better rate for ads compared to the Clinton campaign. “Facebook and Twitter were the reason we won this thing,” Parscale told Wired just after the election. “Twitter for Mr. Trump. And Facebook for fundraising.”
This week, Parscale again popped up in the news. After Wired published an article further detailing Facebook’s ad economics, Parscale endorsed the piece on Twitter. In a follow-up, he estimated the Trump campaign was paying far less than Clinton for ads. “This is why @realDonaldTrump was a perfect candidate for FaceBook,” Parscale wrote. The decision to let him run the campaign likely means Trump believes that, too.

Melania Trump has severed ties with a longtime pal-turned-adviser whose firm was paid almost $26 million to help plan President Trump’s inauguration, according to a new report.
The first lady’s office last week ended the contract with Stephanie Winston Wolkoff, who has been friends with Melania for years and had been an unpaid senior adviser, the New York Times reported.
Melania spokeswoman Stephanie Grisham told the Times that the office had “severed the gratuitous services contract with Ms. Wolkoff,” who Grisham said worked as “a special government employee” on specific projects.
“We thank her for her hard work and wish her all the best,” she said.
Two sources told the Times that the move was the result of the Trumps’ displeasure at its report that the president’s inaugural committee shelled out almost $26 million and that Winston Wolkoff personally received $1.62 million.
The president also was steamed that Winston Wolkoff used a close friend, David Monn, to assist in planning inaugural events, according to the report.

Nine months in, special counsel Robert Mueller's probe into Russia’s involvement in the 2016 presidential election has produced multiple indictments and guilty pleas.
But Mueller's investigation—which, according to experts, is likely still far from over—has yet to directly implicate President Donald Trump.
Still, that doesn't mean that there isn't already evidence that the commander in chief and his campaign team benefited from the confusion and distrust the Kremlin sowed in the American polity last year.
And, according to one former intelligence chief, that's as concerning as anything that Mueller could dig up.
In an interview with Politico published Tuesday, retired general and former head of the National Security Agency (NSA) and the CIA Michael Hayden says that, in his view, there is enough publicly available evidence to conclude that there is a "convergence" of interest between Trump and the Kremlin.

Police in North Carolina say a man was fatally shot as he was broadcasting himself on Facebook Live.
Prentis Robinson, 55, had just left a police station where he had reported one of his phones as stolen, and was filming himself with a selfie stick.
A man is then seen in the short video exchanging words with the victim. "You're on live," Mr Robinson tells him before four gunshots are fired.
A man, named by police as Douglas Colson, has been arrested.
The gunman, who police say was armed with a long-barelled gun, is seen quickly walking over the camera as he flees the scene.
The Wingate Police Department said Mr Colson was questioned on Monday but was not arrested at the time.
On Tuesday morning he turned himself in to police after they issued a warrant for his arrest.
The shooting, which occurred at about 10:00 local time (15:00GMT) on Monday, triggered a lockdown of nearby Wingate University, about 30 miles (48km) south-east of Charlotte, North Carolina.

The lieutenant governor in Georgia threatened on Monday to kill a proposed lucrative tax cut for Delta Air Lines after the company eliminated a discount fare program for the National Rifle Association over the weekend.
The move by Lt. Gov. Casey Cagle, who presides over the State Senate, immediately put the legislation in jeopardy and put him at loggerheads with other top state officials, including the governor, who had championed the tax deal. The showdown between one of Georgia’s most powerful politicians and one of the state’s largest employers was the latest clash in a national debate around guns after the deadly school shooting in Florida this month.
Mr. Cagle, a Republican, fired the salvo at Delta on Twitter on Monday afternoon, saying that the Atlanta-based company must restore its program with the N.R.A. “Corporations cannot attack conservatives and expect us not to fight back,” Mr. Cagle, who had expressed his support for the bill earlier this month, said on Twitter.

The United Nations said Tuesday it had reports of continued fighting in the rebel-held eastern Ghouta area near the Syrian capital Damascus, which was due to see the first daily "humanitarian pause," put in place by Russia to allow civilians to escape the fighting.
But the move is seen as limited in scope.
"Clearly, the situation on the ground is not such that convoys can go in or medical evacuations can go out," said U.N. humanitarian spokesman Jens Laerke.
Russia and Syria blamed opposition fighters for shelling that they said hit an evacuation route as well as areas in Damascus, which rebels denied.
The Britain-based Syrian Observatory for Human Rights, which monitors the seven-year-old conflict, said airstrikes hit the eastern Ghouta area where a recent spike in violence has killed hundreds of people. Syria's military denied carrying out such strikes.
Russian Defense Minister Sergei Shoigu said Monday the Russian stand-down would run daily from 9 a.m. to 2 p.m. local time.
The order comes days after the United Nations Security Council demanded a 30-day cease-fire across Syria. That plan got off to a shaky start with activists reporting continued airstrikes and fighting in the rebel-held eastern Ghouta suburb of Damascus that killed more than 30 people Monday.

in Kahramanmaras, Turkey. Erdogan has come under criticism for telling a small girl dressed in a military uniform that she would be honored if she were "martyred" for Turkey. Erdogan spotted the weeping-and-saluting 6-year-old Amine Tiras while delivering a speech at his ruling party's congress in the city of Kahramanmaras, and had her brought on stage.(Murat Cetinmuhurdar/Pool Photo via AP, File)
Erdogan spotted the weeping-and-saluting 6-year-old Amine Tiras while delivering a speech at his ruling party's congress in the city of Kahramanmaras on Saturday, and had her brought on stage.
After trying to comfort the girl by kissing her on both cheeks, Erdogan told the crowd: "She has the Turkish flag in her pocket. If she becomes a martyr, God willing, this flag will be draped on her."
Some people were appalled and took to Twitter to criticize the president.
One user said it was the state's duty to protect children, not to "kill" them. Another said: "you don't wish death for a child, you never say: 'God willing.'"

President Donald Trump is naming former digital adviser Brad Parscale as campaign manager of his 2020 re-election campaign.
A person familiar with the announcement confirms Parscale's selection on the condition of anonymity because the person was unauthorized to publicly discuss the news. The conservative Drudge Report website first reported his selection.
Trump has left little doubt about his intentions to seek re-election. He filed the paperwork to organize his re-election committee on the same day as his inauguration, held his first campaign rally on Feb. 18, 2017, in Florida, and has mused publicly about would-be Democratic challengers.
Parscale, an Austin-based digital consultant and ally of Trump son-in-law and senior adviser Jared Kushner, ran the Trump campaign's sophisticated digital operations in 2016. He previously worked for the Trump Organization.

In December, a team of U.S. government scientists released a “report card” on the Arctic. Their top conclusion was pithy, comprehensive, and bleak. The Arctic, they said, “shows no sign of returning to [the] reliably frozen region of recent past decades.”
Now, it’s almost like the environment is trying to prove them right.
Though the sun hasn’t shone on the central Arctic for more than four months, the region is currently gripped by historic, record-breaking warmth. On Sunday, the temperature at the North Pole rose to about the melting point, and parts of the Arctic were more than 50 degrees Fahrenheit warmer than normal.

Allowing Chinese President Xi Jinping to rule indefinitely will be seen by historians as a farce, a government critic has told the BBC.
In a rare show of public dissent, ex-state newspaper editor Li Datong sent an open letter opposing the proposal.
He says in the letter that scrapping term limits for the president and vice-president would sow the seeds of chaos.
China's internet censors have been deleting critical comments across Chinese social media platforms.
There had been widespread speculation that Mr Xi would seek to extend his presidency beyond 2023. The party congress last year saw him cement his status as the most powerful leader since the late Mao Zedong.
State media have been defending the amendment and praising the country's leadership.
China Daily said lifting the term limit was needed "to perfect the party and the state leadership system". The PLA Daily said the move was "very necessary and timely".

President Trump has struck an “informal” deal with Boeing for new Air Force One planes, according to the White House -- resulting from negotiations that started before he took office. 
“President Trump has reached an informal deal with Boeing on a fixed price contract for the new Air Force One Program. Thanks to the president’s negotiations, the contract will save the taxpayers more than $1.4 billion,” Deputy Press Secretary Hogan Gidley said Tuesday.
The deal is worth $3.9 billion. Officials say it represents $1.4 billion in savings from estimates of over $5 billion for two airplanes and related costs.
A Boeing official said the agreement covers two aircraft, “including things unique to Air Force One such as a communications suite, internal and external stairs, large galleys and other equipment.”
Singapore's prime minister cautioned by the president over North Korea and China, as Trump looks forward to the House vote on the budget; John Roberts has the roundup for 'Special Report.'
The company said in a statement: “Boeing is proud to build the next generation of Air Force One, providing American Presidents with a flying White House at outstanding value to taxpayers. President Trump negotiated a good deal on behalf of the American people.”

Nearly two weeks after a shooting at a high school killed 17 people, the Florida Legislature is debating a school safety bill.
On Tuesday, House Republicans rejected Democratic-filed amendments that would ban assault weapons, strip language that would allow some teachers to carry guns in schools and require a mental health examination before someone could buy a gun.
The House appropriations committee is considering a bill that would raise the minimum age to buy rifles from 18 to 21 and creates a three-day waiting period for all gun purchase. The bill would also create a program that allows teachers who receive law enforcement training and are deputized by the local sheriff's office to carry concealed weapons in the classroom if also approved by the school district.
Unlike Monday, when hundreds of sometimes rowdy protesters jammed a Senate meeting to consider a similar bill, Tuesday's proceedings were more orderly. But still, several speakers spoke in favor of the assault weapons ban, including Parkland resident Amber Hersh.
"Our children lost a friend. Our friend lost a daughter. This is your opportunity. The world is watching," she told the committee.
The amendment to ban assault weapons was rejected on an 18-11 vote.

At least two people were shot dead in what authorities said was a domestic issue at a dormitory at Central Michigan University on Friday morning and police were searching for the gunman.
The two victims who were not students were found inside the residence hall at the university, located about 125 miles (200 km) northwest of Detroit, according to university Police Lieutenant Larry Klaus. He identified the suspect as 19-year-old James Eric Davis Jr.
“Our campus is safe,” Klaus said at a news conference on Friday.“We’re calling it a family-type domestic issue at this point.” The university said no one was injured by the gunfire.
The incident came about two weeks after 17 students and educators were killed by a 19-year-old gunman with an assault-style rifle at a Florida high school.
The identities of the two Michigan victims as well as details on whether the suspect was a student and the type of weapon used were not immediately released.

Europe will hit back at the heart of the United States, slapping tariffs on products like Harley-Davidsons, Kentucky bourbon and bluejeans, if President Trump goes ahead with a plan to place tariffs on steel and aluminum imports, the president of the European Union’s executive arm vowed on Friday.
Jean-Claude Juncker, president of the European Commission, made the remarks to the German news media in reaction to the proposed tariffs. Mr. Junker said the plans to tax the American goods, produced in the home states of key Republic leaders, had not yet been finalized, but amounted to treating them “the same way” that European products would be handled if the metals tariffs go through.
“None of this is reasonable, but reason is a sentiment that is very unevenly distributed in this world,” Mr. Juncker declared. He said any measures taken by the bloc would conform with rules set by the World Trade Organization, Mr. Juncker said.
His was not the only denunciation to flowed in after Mr. Trump told industry executives on Thursday that he planned to impose penalties of 25 percent on steel imports and 10 percent on aluminum imports from all countries. Criticism came from governments, lawmakers, metals makers and labor unions around the world.
Steffen Seibert, a spokesman for the German chancellor, Angela Merkel, said on Friday that the government “rejects” the tariffs, adding that such measures could lead to a global trade war, which “can’t be in anyone’s interest.”

A sprawling coastal storm began to batter the East Coast with snow, heavy wind and rain on Friday morning, as officials warned of moderate to major flooding along parts of the coast, with storm surge expected to amplify the high tide.
The effects of the nor’easter, which could linger through Saturday or beyond, were being felt as far south as Georgia and South Carolina, and were expected to stretch all the way north to Maine.
“Take this storm seriously,” the National Weather Service in Boston tweeted. “This is a LIFE & DEATH situation for those living along the coast, esp those ocean-exposed shorelines.”

Early last year, a private equity billionaire started paying regular visits to the White House.
Joshua Harris, a founder of Apollo Global Management, was advising Trump administration officials on infrastructure policy. During that period, he met on multiple occasions with Jared Kushner, President Trump’s son-in-law and senior adviser, said three people familiar with the meetings. Among other things, the two men discussed a possible White House job for Mr. Harris.
The job never materialized, but in November, Apollo lent $184 million to Mr. Kushner’s family real estate firm, Kushner Companies. The loan was to refinance the mortgage on a Chicago skyscraper.
Even by the standards of Apollo, one of the world’s largest private equity firms, the previously unreported transaction with the Kushners was a big deal: It was triple the size of the average property loan made by Apollo’s real estate lending arm, securities filings show.
It was one of the largest loans Kushner Companies received last year. An even larger loan came from Citigroup, which lent the firm and one of its partners $325 million to help finance a group of office buildings in Brooklyn.

As companies across America take a stand on guns after the Florida school massacre, Delta Air Lines withstood swift political retribution in its home state of Georgia for cutting ties with the National Rifle Assn.
Ignoring warnings that the state's business-friendly image could be tarnished, Republicans in the Legislature voted Thursday to kill a tax break that would have saved Delta millions of dollars in sales tax on jet fuel, and on Friday, the governor signed it. The proposal wasn't controversial until Delta announced last weekend that it would no longer offer discounted fares to NRA members.
"I hope they are better at flying airplanes than timing PR announcements," Georgia House Speaker David Ralston, a Republican, said after his chamber gave final approval to a larger tax-cut bill that was stripped of the jet fuel tax exemption.
The Feb. 14 slayings of 17 students and educators in Parkland, Fla., by a gunman armed with an AR-15 assault-style rifle has prompted retailers including Walmart, Kroger and Dick's Sporting Goods to tighten their gun sales policies. Meanwhile, Delta and other companies including MetLife and Hertz have ended business ties with the NRA.

Only one living U.S. president will be attending the Rev. Billy Graham's funeral this week.
While President Donald Trump will be in attendance Friday at the Charlotte service, his predecessors will not. A spokesperson confirmed with the Citizen Times that former President Barack Obama is unable to attend the funeral, while two former presidents George W. Bush and Bill Clinton traveled to Charlotte this week ahead of the service to pay their respects while Graham's body lay in repose.
A spokesman for former President George H.W. Bush told the Citizen Times that he and his wife, Barbara, are unable to travel to Charlotte, and a representative for former President Jimmy Carter said Tuesday that "he regrets he cannot attend."
First Lady Melania Trump, Vice President Mike Pence and Second Lady Karen Pence will attend the funeral, the White House said Wednesday.
Graham died in his sleep the morning of Feb. 21 at his home in Montreat. He was 99 and in his lifetime had become perhaps the most well-known evangelist in the world. The Billy Graham Evangelistic Association estimates that he preached to a total of 215 million people through his crusades and other events.

Prime Minister Theresa May on Friday made her opening bid for talks on British withdrawal from the European Union, outlining a plan that seemed designed more to unite warring lawmakers at home, than to win over her continental critics.
Striking a note of realism for her domestic audience, Mrs. May accepted that Britain’s departure, known as Brexit, would reduce trade with the European Union’s giant single market, which she intends her country to quit.
“In certain ways, our access to each other’s markets will be less than it is now,” Mrs. May told an invited audience in London, accepting that the European Union would never agree to a deal that allowed Britain “to enjoy all the benefits without all of the obligations.”
“The reality is that we all need to face up to some hard facts,” she added.
However, Mrs. May said she hoped to gain some favorable treatment on trade by offering “binding commitments” to stick to some European rules and regulations, while staying under the remit of European agencies that supervise sectors like pharmaceuticals — proposals that the hard Brexit faction might find difficult to swallow.

Islamic extremists opened fire on the French Embassy and army headquarters in separate attacks in Burkina Faso's capital Friday, killing at least seven soldiers, while eight of the militants were slain, a government official said.
More than 90 people were wounded in the violence in the former French colony in West Africa, and officials called it a terrorist attack. There was no claim of responsibility.
Five emergency centers were set up in hospitals, a military barracks and at a stadium in Ouagadougou to treat the casualties, said Col. Amade Kafando, director general of Burkina Faso's army health department. There were fears that the death toll could rise.
Gunfire and explosions resounded for hours but subsided by midday. Workers fled offices near the site of the violence, and helicopters were seen above the embassy.
Witnesses at state TV offices that face the embassy told The Associated Press that five attackers arrived in a pickup truck, shouted, "Allahu Akhbar," and began shooting. They also set fire to the truck, the witnesses added.

Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel was questioned by the police on Friday as a possible suspect in a third bribery case, the weightiest so far in a string of corruption investigations that are jeopardizing his political future.
Officers questioned Mr. Netanyahu about a case involving Shaul Elovitch, an Israeli telecommunications tycoon accused of using his popular Hebrew news site to provide positive coverage of Mr. Netanyahu and his wife in return for regulatory and financial benefits worth tens of millions of dollars.
A large black screen was drawn on Friday morning across leafy Balfour Street in Jerusalem, concealing the prime minister’s official residence and the comings and goings of investigators. Outside, a small but noisy group of demonstrators beat drums and held placards with slogans against corruption.
Mr. Netanyahu, who has now been questioned by the police eight times in the past 14 months, is fighting for his political life as the allegations against him mount. Last month, the police recommended that Mr. Netanyahu be charged with bribery, fraud and breach of trust in two other graft cases involving allegations of illicit gifts for favors and another attempt to obtain more favorable coverage.
Those cases are now being examined by state prosecutors and the attorney general, who will ultimately decide whether to file charges pending a hearing with Mr. Netanyahu’s lawyers. The process could take months.

Russian President Vladimir Putin used an annual speech this week to make bold claims about “invincible” new Russian weapons that could easily overcome U.S. missile defenses. Among the weapons Putin said had been successfully tested was a cruise missile with a nuclear-propulsion engine — a weapon that would fly at a low altitude and follow an unpredictable flight path to avoid U.S. missile defense systems.
Speaking to Megyn Kelly of NBC News after the speech, Putin said that “every single weapons system discussed today easily surpasses and avoids an antimissile defense system.”
But how worried should Americans be about Russia's new missiles?
It's certainly true that, if Putin's claims are accurate, they represent a step forward in missile technology that existing U.S. missile systems would be unable to match. There's another important detail here, however: U.S. missile defense systems are almost certainly no match for existing Russian missiles, either.

High winds and driving rain are causing thousands of flight cancellations at East Coast airports. But what about the planes that did manage to take off?
One pilot who landed at Dulles Airport reported it was not a pretty scene.
"Very bumpy on descent," the pilot said, according to a transcript on aviationweather.gov. "Pretty much every one on the plane threw up. Pilots were on the verge of throwing up."
The Washington Metropolitan Airport Authority on Friday said that a brief half-hour ground stop took place at Dulles when wind gusts reached a critical point. 
The Washington Post reported that winds in the D.C. area reached 70-mph gusts.  
Flightaware.com was reporting more than 2,000 cancellations late Friday morning.
An American Airlines spokesman says the company has canceled about 18 percent of its flights in the Northeast, with Boston's Logan Airport and Reagan Washington National Airport the hardest hit.
Delta, Southwest, JetBlue and American were allowing travelers to change their Friday and Saturday flights to avoid delays and cancellations.

Change happens notoriously slow in Nashville, a town known to prize convention and tradition. But yesterday, it occurred at lightning speed: In less than 24 hours, presidential candidate, conservative radio host and former Arkansas Governor Mike Huckabee was announced as a new board member of the Country Music Association Foundation, the organization's philanthropic arm, before being swiftly forced to resign after a chorus of dissent over the appointment erupted in Music City and beyond.
"I genuinely regret that some in the industry were so outraged by my appointment that they bullied the CMA and the Foundation with economic threats and vowed to withhold support for the programs for students if I remained," Huckabee's letter of resignation read, which was accepted in a statement by the CMA. The organization, which produces a huge festival in Nashville each summer as well as the televised CMA Awards, has yet to offer further comment on its motivation for appointing him.

Fox News host Tucker Carlson doesn’t criticize Donald Trump very often, but he did so on Thursday night after the president suggested taking guns away from potentially dangerous people before due process. 
“Imagine if Barack Obama had said that,” Carlson said. “Just ignore due process and start confiscating guns.”
Carlson said Obama would’ve been “denounced as a dictator” for making such a comment.
“We would have denounced him first, trust me,” Carlson said. “Congress would be talking impeachment right now. Some would be muttering about secession.”
Carlson also had a warning for Trump about Constitutional rights:
“Those rights are what makes us citizens and not mere subjects of the powerful, and the president needs to be reminded of that. Maybe we all do once in a while. If voters wanted that kind of government, they could have voted Democrat, and actually they still have a chance to vote Democrat in the midterms, which he should keep in mind.”

President Trump’s announcement that he planned to impose steep tariffs on imported steel and aluminum delighted some blue-collar industries he had championed. “Enthusiastic and gratified are probably understatements,” said Michael A. Bless, the president of Century Aluminum.
Behemoth steel buyers like Boeing and General Motors weren’t as pleased. Their shares fell on the news, and the most obvious aluminum dependents — the brewing giants Anheuser-Busch and MillerCoors — warned about the risk of job losses.
But it is people like H. O. Woltz III who feel most vulnerable.
Mr. Woltz is the chairman and chief executive of Insteel Industries, which operates 10 plants from Arizona to Pennsylvania producing steel wire products for concrete reinforcing. He has about 1,000 workers, most without college degrees.
“The jobs that we have are good jobs,” Mr. Woltz said. “Our guys make a lot of money.”
Now his business calculus is being upended. A tariff on imports also allows domestic steel and aluminum producers to charge higher prices, 

Shortly before noon Saturday, a man approached the north fence around the White House, removed a concealed handgun and fired several rounds, according to a Secret Service statement. None of those rounds appeared to have been aimed at the White House, the agency said.
The man then fatally shot himself in the head, the Secret Service said.
Nobody else was injured during the incident, according to authorities.
It happened in an area between the Lafayette Square park and the White House that is popular among pedestrians who use it as a cut-through or as a place to take pictures or protest.
Witnesses told The Washington Post that a crowd of more than 100 was in the area at the time and that people fled after the shots were fired.
The White House was placed on lockdown, and the surrounding area was cordoned off.
President Trump was at his Mar-a-Lago resort in Palm Beach, Fla., at the time of the incident.
"We're aware of the incident," said White House deputy press secretary Hogan Gidley from Mar-a-Lago. "The president has been briefed."

A 19-year-old student suspected of fatally shooting his parents at a Central Michigan University dormitory had been acting so strangely the day before the killings that campus police talked to his mother and then took him to a hospital for suspected drug abuse, authorities said Saturday.
University police Chief Bill Yeagley told reporters that James Eric Davis Jr.'s parents had just picked him up from that hospital and brought him to his dorm to pack up for spring break when Friday's shooting happened. He said the gun used in the shooting belonged to Davis' father, James Davis Sr., a part-time police officer in the Chicago suburb of Bellwood.
Yeagley would not say whether the father had brought the gun to the university's campus in Mount Pleasant, Michigan, when picking up his son, but he noted that Davis Jr. can be seen on video in the dorm's parking lot with the gun before he entered the residence hall where his parents were shot around 8:30 a.m.
"We can make a lot of assumptions, but I'm not going to make those assumptions. But I can tell you for sure that the gun came from outside, in the parking lot, with (Davis Jr.) through the building," Yeagley said.
He declined to say whether drugs were found in Davis Jr.'s system. He also would not say what type of gun was used or whether it was Davis Sr.'s service revolver. But he did say that it would have been a violation of campus policy for Davis Sr. to bring a gun on campus because only law enforcement on active duty or those with special permission can do so.

An avalanche at Mammoth Mountain early Saturday forced the closure of the mountain and area ski resorts, officials said.
There were no immediate reports of injuries or missing people, but search and rescue units were activated, officials said.
The ski patrol was conducting avalanche hazard mitigation work when the avalanche occurred about 10:15 a.m. on the upper part of the mountain near the High Five Express chairlift area, Lauren Burke, public relations manager for Mammoth Mountain, said in a statement.
Rescue operations, which included the use of search dogs, were immediately activated.
"Three people were partially buried [in the avalanche], including one Mammoth Mountain employee," Burke said. "The three individuals were able to free themselves without injury."
The area where the ski patrol had been working was closed to skiers at the time of the incident, she said. Falling avalanche debris reached the bottom of the lift and ultimately an area open to the public, Burke said.

Embattled former Senate candidate Roy Moore is making a public plea for help paying the legal fees he faces defending himself from a lawsuit brought by the Alabama woman who says he touched her sexually when she was 14 years old.
In a statement posted on his Senate campaign’s Facebook page, the Republican former judge made the ask in a grievance-filled note, saying that he faced a “vicious attack from lawyers in Washington D.C. and San Francisco who have hired one of the biggest firms in Birmingham Alabama to bring another legal action against me.”
“My resources have been depleted and I have struggled to make ends meet,” Moore wrote, saying that his legal fees could exceed $100,000. “I have had to establish a legal-defense fund, anything you give will be appreciated.”
Leigh Corfman filed a defamation lawsuit against Moore in January, part of an emerging legal strategy of litigating sexual misconduct claims through civil lawsuits when the statute of limitations has expired for criminal charges.

Thousands of people were without power and at least eight were dead Saturday after a Nor'easter blanketed the East Coast with rain and snow on Friday.
Powerful winds and rain from Georgia to New England caused heavy flooding and flight cancellations Friday, but the forecast for Saturday showed a clearer outlook for the weekend. The National Weather Service reported improving conditions "across the Northeast and northern Mid-Atlantic states" as the Nor'east er pulled away from the coast.
More than 387,000 people were still without power in Massachusetts, according to the state's Emergency Management Agency, after initial reports of 450,000 without electricity. Public Service Electric and Gas Company worked to get the lights back on for 14,700 still without power in New Jersey as of 11:30 a.m. ET.
Just hours earlier, heavy winds led to the deaths of eight people in Virginia, Maryland, New York, Pennsylvania, Massachusetts and Rhode Island, authorities said.
Early Friday morning, a tree fell onto a Virginia home and killed 6-year-old Anthony Hamilton while he was sleeping, Chesterfield County Police reported. Later in the day, Putnam County Sheriff Robert L. Langley Jr. in New York said that an unidentified 11-year-old boy died when a tree fell onto his home and trapped him underneath. His mother, who was at home with the child, was hospitalized.

A day after unveiling dramatic new weapons — including a nuclear-powered cruise missile — that sparked talk of a return to Cold War tensions, Russian President Vladimir Putin suggested that he'd reverse the collapse of the Soviet Union if he could.
Putin's comments on the 1991 collapse of the U.S.S.R. — which bound Russia and many of its neighbors while exerting influence in Eastern Europe and abroad for almost seven decades — came at a question-and-answer forum held Friday in Kaliningrad. Taking questions from the audience, the Russian leader was asked what event in his nation's history he would have liked to change.
"The collapse of the Soviet Union," Putin responded, according to the Russian news agency Tass.
Though a fringe idea in the West, regret about the collapse of the Soviet Union is not unusual in Russia — in fact, it is widespread. And with Russian elections just a week away, it's a factor still worth watching.
Russians were asked if they regretted the collapse of the Soviet Union.
The polling agency Levada Center has been asking Russians about their views on the collapse of the Soviet Union since 1992. The most recent numbers, from a survey conducted in November 2017, show that 58 percent of Russians regret the U.S.S.R.'s collapse, while just over a quarter do not.

On an island in the Suez Canal, a towering AK-47 rifle, its muzzle and bayonet pointed skyward, symbolizes one of Egypt’s most enduring alliances. Decades ago, North Korea presented it to Egypt to commemorate the 1973 war against Israel, when North Korean pilots fought and died on the Egyptian side.
But now the statue has come to signify another aspect of Egypt’s ties to North Korea: a furtive trade in illegal weapons that has upset President Abdel Fattah el-Sisi’s otherwise cozy relationship with the United States, set off a painful cut in military aid and drawn unremitting scrutiny from United Nations inspectors.
Egypt has purchased North Korean weapons and allowed North Korean diplomats to use their Cairo embassy as a base for military sales across the region, American and United Nations officials say. Those transactions earned vital hard cash for North Korea, but they violated international sanctions and drew the ire of Egypt’s main military patron, the United States, which cut or suspended $291 million in military aid in August.
Tensions may bubble up again in the coming weeks with the publication of a United Nations report that contains new information about the cargo of a rusty North Korean freighter intercepted off the coast of Egypt in 2016. The ship was carrying 30,000 rocket-propelled grenades worth an estimated $26 million.

Italians who elected a bombastic billionaire businessman and media figure to lead their country are still dealing with the chaotic consequences more than two decades later.
Those across the peninsula who watched the American election in 2016 saw President Trump as a reflection of Silvio Berlusconi, the conservative 81-year-old who has been prime minister four times since 1994.
While Berlusconi reportedly hates comparisons to his American counterpart, the media mogul who once controlled a large chunk of Italy's TV programming has a "bromance" with Vladimir Putin, been accused of authoritarian tendencies, continually finds new scandals to be part of and even jokes about receiving hair transplants.
He is probably best known internationally for the investigation into his "bunga bunga" sex parties, though the case that is currently stopping Berlusconi from running for office is a tax fraud conviction that he says is politically motivated.
His shadow has hung over the country's politics even when he is not in power and his Forza Italia party is expected to garner 17% of the vote in a general election on Sunday where the outcome is uncertain.

A tiger and a sloth bear tangled in a violent struggle in India's Tadoba National Park, and a video recording of the fight is spreading across social media. It was recorded Wednesday (Feb. 28) by Akshay Kumar, the chief naturalist at Bamboo Forest Safari Lodge, who was leading a safari when he came upon the tussle.
Kumar said the tiger is 7-year-old Matkasur, a dominant male that has marked the body of water called Jamun Bodi as its territory, NDTV reports. The female sloth bear was headed to the water with her cub when the tiger attacked. Both the tiger and sloth bear suffered injuries, and the young cub ran away during the fight.

It turns out you can put a price on values.
After Delta Air Lines announced it would end a travel discount for National Rifle Association members, Republican lawmakers in Georgia followed through on their threat to punish the company by repealing a budget provision on Thursday that included a $50 million airline fuel tax exemption, from which the Atlanta-based airline would have saved an estimated $40 million.
But only 13 NRA members actually used the one-time group travel discount for the gun group’s annual meeting in Dallas this May, Delta spokesman Michael Thomas told The Washington Post on Saturday.
That amounts to costing Delta just over $3 million per passenger for the apparently rarely used services, a consequence from public pressure on businesses to cut ties with the NRA following the school shooting in Parkland, Fla. that left 17 people dead on Valentine’s Day.
Police say the gunman used a legally acquired AR-15 — a rifle touted as being American as apple pie by the NRA, the country’s chief gun lobby.

The pending departures of former Hollywood publicists Hope Hicks and Josh Raffel from President Trump’s communications team were the latest signs of upheaval coming from the White House.
They may be seeking an exit from the crises of Washington to calmer experiences in the private sector — but could they return to the cutthroat world of entertainment publicity?
Friends and former associates say that people have reached out to each of them to inquire about their plans. Their tenure in a chaotic atmosphere in DC could prove to be advantageous — proof of being battle tested in the highest-profile environment, not to mention a connection to the White House. However, the polarizing nature of Trump and their close association with him could be a detriment in some circles.

Post-White House gigs haven’t always panned out: Former Press Secretary Sean Spicer is currently writing a book, “The Briefing,” but he did not land a spot as a TV pundit despite meeting with the major news networks.
President Trump on Saturday took part in the Gridiron Club dinner's tradition of presidential speeches filled with self-deprecating humor and casting barbs at his own White House and his usual targets. 
You can read Trump's comments below: 
"Well, thank you very much. It's an honor to be here and, I must tell you, that Melania and I are really thrilled. We really looked forward to this. ... I didn't know what to expect, but it's really quality people ... quality people. So, thank you very much.
It’s been really another calm week at the White House. We finally have it running like a fine-tuned machine. It’s fine-tuned. It’s a beautiful piece of work. ... But before I get started, I wanted to apologize for arriving a little bit late. You know, we were late tonight because Jared could not get through security. ... Ivanka, you’ve got to do something, ... Jared—but I will tell you, he’s a good guy. He has—he has suffered. He is a great guy he really is.
I know the Gridiron is really an old tradition in Washington, been around a long time, and one that’s important to many of you in the media. So, I was very excited to receive this invitation and come here and ruin your evening in person. ... My staff was concerned heading into this dinner that I couldn’t do self-deprecating humor. They were worried about it. They said, ‘Can you do this?’ And I told them not to worry. Nobody does self-deprecating humor better than I do. ...  In fact, Orrin Hatch, Orrin said that ‘Donald Trump is the best at self-deprecating in the history of America, better than Washington and better than Lincoln.’ ... Thank you, Orrin.

President Donald Trump’s threatened trade war has opened a rift within the Republican Party that some lawmakers and strategists believe could undermine their effort to keep their majorities in Congress.
Republicans plan to brag about the economy in midterm campaigns in hopes of countering Trump’s unpopularity, touting a strong stock market, low unemployment rate and — most importantly — their increasingly popular tax legislation. But Trump’s suggestion Saturday that he might slap penalties on European cars, in addition to the tariffs on aluminum and steel he already promised, could upend that strategy completely, Republicans say.
“Should the administration opt to move forward with tariffs on steel and aluminum, American manufacturers, businesses and consumers would be forced to bear the brunt, paying more for steel and steel products,” said Senate Finance Chairman Orrin Hatch (R-Utah), one of the primary authors of the tax overhaul that’s central to the GOP’s reelection effort. “Such action could very well undercut the benefits of the pro-growth tax reform we fought to get on the books.”

Gazing fondly at Hollywood’s onscreen history, while repudiating the film industry’s appalling treatment of women behind the scenes. Staging a big-tent spectacle to keep the TV ratings from hitting an all-time low, while celebrating films that have, for the most part, not been widely seen. Poking fun at last year’s envelope mix-up, while taking the recognition of cinematic achievements supremely seriously.
This is going to be one hard-working Oscars ceremony.
When planning started over the summer for the 90th Academy Awards, producers envisioned a buoyant ceremony that would use its anniversary as a guiding theme. Jimmy Kimmel would return as host, the first time since the 1990s that the ceremony would have the same M.C. two years in a row.
The red carpet at the Golden Globes, where attendees wore black to draw attention to sexual harassment in the entertainment world. 
But then The New York Times and The New Yorker disclosed allegations of decades of sexual harassment and assault against Harvey Weinstein — the powerful producer and Academy Awards tour de force — roiling the entertainment business and setting off the #MeToo and Time’s Up movements. (Mr. Weinstein has denied ever having had “nonconsensual sex.”) Now the Oscars, designed as a big commercial for Hollywood glamour, will have to address the systemic problem of sexual harassment in show business.

George Nader, a Lebanese-American businessman, has hovered on the fringes of international diplomacy for three decades. He was a back-channel negotiator with Syria during the Clinton administration, reinvented himself as an adviser to the de facto ruler of the United Arab Emirates, and last year was a frequent visitor to President Trump’s White House.
Mr. Nader is now a focus of the investigation by Robert S. Mueller III, the special counsel. In recent weeks, Mr. Mueller’s investigators have questioned Mr. Nader and have pressed witnesses for information about any possible attempts by the Emiratis to buy political influence by directing money to support Mr. Trump during the presidential campaign, according to people with knowledge of the discussions.
The investigators have also asked about Mr. Nader’s role in White House policymaking, those people said, suggesting that the special counsel investigation has broadened beyond Russian election meddling to include Emirati influence on the Trump administration. The focus on Mr. Nader could also prompt an examination of how money from multiple countries has flowed through and influenced Washington during the Trump era.

“Saturday Night Live” usually responds to a national tragedy by eschewing comedy. Usually, it has no choice.
Three weeks after the terrorist attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, “SNL” premiered its season with a speech by the stone-faced mayor of a bloodied city. After the massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary in 2012, the show’s opening sketch was simply children singing “Silent Night.” Because how would you joke about that?
But when “SNL” returned to the air this weekend after a month-long hiatus during which the country’s worst high school shooting occurred, the show used President Trump to bridge the gap between the tragic and the ridiculous.
It had been less than three weeks since 17 students and staffers were fatally shot in Parkland, Fla. — but in those weeks Trump had: a) met with teenage survivors of the attack while holding a crib note that read “I hear you”; b) said that if the high school’s teachers had been armed, one of them would have “shot the hell” out of the gunman; c) broke with the National Rifle Association and proposed confiscating guns (“Take the guns first, go through due process second”); d) backtracked hours later; e) said he would have run into the school unarmed to confront a man with a high-powered rifle.

The union representing W. Va. teachers says their strike — begun Feb. 22 — will extend at least through Monday, if not longer, after the state Senate failed to pass the raise teachers are holding out for.
Senators voted for a 4 percent raise for teachers, service personnel and state troopers.
Republican Gov. Jim Justice and the Republican-led House of Delegates have already agreed to the 5 percent raise teachers are demanding.
Saturday night's Senate vote ran into a snafu after the Finance Committee was prepared to pass the 4 percent raise.
The Charleston Gazette-Mail reports:
"But the Senate then, mistakenly, passed the House version of the bill with the 5 percent raise, rather than the 4 percent version. After Senate leaders announced the mistake, senators walked back their passage vote and certain procedural votes, and passed the bill with a 4 percent raise after 9:30 p.m. Saturday.
House members wouldn't agree to that change, and both sides appointed three members to a conference committee, which will try to hash out the differences on the bill."

German Chancellor Angela Merkel proved to be a lucky duck instead of a lame duck on Sunday when the country's second-largest political party, the Social Democrats, agreed reluctantly and after nearly six months of bitter wrangling to join forces with her conservative Christian Democrats for another four years.
Grassroots members of the center-left Social Democrats voted by a surprisingly large two-thirds majority in a postal vote to swallow their pride and join another loveless right-left "grand coalition" with the Christian Democrats. The vote will keep Merkel in power even though Social Democratic leaders had first vowed they would do no such thing after an inconclusive election in September.
In that vote, both parties slumped to their worst post-World War II results after ruling four years together as a new far-right party, Alternative for Germany, siphoned away considerable support from both. Feeding off frustration over the arrival of more than a million refugees from Syria and elsewhere, it become the third-largest bloc in the six-party parliament.
Weaker at home than any other time during her 12 years at the helm of Europe's leading nation, the 63-year-old Merkel could have been forced out of power and Germany plunged into a political crisis with new elections likely if the 463,000 grassroots members had voted against the coalition agreement. It was a detailed 179-page pact that the Christian Democrats and Social Democrats had hammered out a month ago in which Merkel turned over considerable power and important ministries to the Social Democrats to lure them into her government.

Voting has now closed in Italy, in one of the most uncertain elections in recent memory.
Early exit polls say a hung parliament is likely, with ex-PM Silvio Berlusconi's centre-right coalition set to win the most seats.
The anti-establishment 5-Star Movement is in second place according to exit polls, and could be the largest single party with about 30% of votes.
The country's ruling centre-left Democratic Party stands in third place.
The centre-right bloc includes Mr Berlusconi's Forza Italia (Go Italy!) party, the eurosceptic League, and Brothers of Italy. Exit polls suggest it could get between 225 and 265 seats - below the absolute majority of 316 required to govern.
Mr Berlusconi, 81, cannot hold public office himself until next year due to a tax fraud conviction.
The four-time prime minister - who has allied himself with the anti-immigrant League party - has backed European Parliament President Antonio Tajani as his choice to lead the country.

Syrian President Bashar al-Assad vowed to continue an offensive in eastern Ghouta near Damascus on Sunday as his forces advanced into the last major rebel enclave near the capital.
The offensive is one of the deadliest in the war and one local insurgent group called it a “scorched earth” campaign.
The government is pressing on despite Western calls for it to abide by a 30-day, countrywide ceasefire demanded by the U.N. Security Council.
“We will continue fighting terrorism ... and the Ghouta operation is a continuation of fighting terrorism,” Assad said in comments to journalists broadcast on state TV.
The advances have forced thousands of civilians to flee deeper into the rebel-held territory, where some 400,000 people live, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights and a resident said on Sunday.
Government forces need to advance just a few more kilometres (miles) further to split the enclave in two, said a commander in the military alliance that backs Assad. The Observatory said government forces had seized a quarter of the territory.

President Trump has expressed new openness to talks with North Korea over its nuclear weapons and ballistic missile programs, saying "we will be meeting" as he delivered what was supposed to be a comedic speech at a lighthearted annual gala dinner hosted by Washington journalists.
Officials said later that no meeting has been scheduled, but Trump's apparently unscripted aside seemed to indicate a willingness to negotiate with the government of Kim Jong Un, who Trump has taunted as "little Rocket Man" and threatened with "fire and fury like the world has never seen."
Trump delivered a self-deprecating punchline during a rambling speech Saturday night in front of more than 600 journalists and guests at the Gridiron Dinner at the Renaissance Washington Hotel saying: "I won't rule out direct talks with Kim Jong Un, I just won't. As far as the risk of dealing with a madman is concerned, that's his problem, not mine."
But then he appeared to depart from his written remarks to describe an overture that Pyongyang has extended to Washington, apparently through the government in South Korea.

After a beautiful early March weekend, winter weather will return packing a powerful punch featuring several inches of snow across Wisconsin on Monday into Tuesday, according to forecasters.
Wintry weather is expected to move into southwestern Wisconsin around daybreak on Monday, the Madison area around 10 a.m., and southeastern Wisconsin around mid-afternoon, the National Weather Service said.
As the snow moves slowly east, it may become mixed with rain for a time.
The main push of precipitation is expected during the afternoon and evening, with the mix of rain and snow likely changing to all snow with several inches of slushy accumulation possible.
The snow will diminish to periods of light snow Monday night into Tuesday, with some drizzle or freezing drizzle possible Monday night.
The Weather Service said southern Wisconsin could see 3 to 6 inches of snow, however there is uncertainty regarding the strength of the system and the possibility of mixed precipitation, which means snow totals could be lowers.

Cameron Ross Burgess, a 26-year-old from Alabama, has been identified by D.C. police as the man who died by suicide near the White House on Saturday.
Burgess was from Maylene, Alabama. That's a small community in Shelby County.
Burgess graduated at Auburn University in Spring 2013, a school spokesman confirmed to AL.com. He lived near campus in student housing and previously was registered to vote in Lee County, public records show.
He was a member of the Thompson High School Class of 2009.
Burgess also has lived in Birmingham. Searches of state and federal court records revealed no criminal history except a speeding ticket issued in Tallapoosa County in 2010.
The Secret Service said Burgess shot himself as he stood near the fence on the north side of the White House. President Donald Trump and first lady Melania Trump were in Florida at the time, the Associate Press reported. The president was briefed on the shooting, the White House said.

A former aide to Donald Trump says he will not co-operate with the inquiry into alleged Russian election meddling.
Sam Nunberg, who helped launch Mr Trump's campaign, said he would refuse to comply with a grand jury subpoena.
"I think it would be really, really funny if they wanted to arrest me because I don't want to spend 80 hours going over emails," he told MSNBC.
Mr Nunberg also said he thinks the investigators believe they have something on Mr Trump.
Department of Justice Special Counsel Robert Mueller is investigating if there were any links between the Trump campaign and Russia, or any effort by the White House to obstruct justice.
White House spokeswoman Sarah Sanders would not be drawn on Mr Nunberg's remarks on Monday, saying: "I'm not going to weigh in on somebody that doesn't work at the White House."
Refusing to comply with a grand jury summons could result in contempt of court and obstruction of justice charges - and, eventually, a prison sentence. It's a steep price to pay to make a point about the scope of Robert Mueller's inquiry.

House Speaker Paul Ryan broke with President Donald Trump over his decision to impose tariffs on imported aluminum and steel products, setting the stage for a high-profile policy fight between Republican leaders and the White House.
Mr. Ryan’s concerns match those of many Republican and Democratic lawmakers, who fear the proposed trade measures will short-circuit the U.S. economic expansion while also punishing allies.
“We are extremely worried about the consequences of a trade war and are urging the White House to not advance with this plan,” said AshLee Strong, a spokeswoman for the Republican from Wisconsin. “The new tax reform law has boosted the economy and we certainly don’t want to jeopardize those gains.”
Mr. Trump on Monday afternoon insisted that “we’re not backing down.” Earlier in the day, Mr. Trump linked the tariffs to negotiations with Mexico and Canada on revising the North American Free Trade Agreement. He said in a morning tweet: “Tariffs on Steel and Aluminum will only come off if new & fair Nafta agreement is signed.”
Congressional Republican leaders aren’t ruling out potential legislative action aimed at blocking such tariffs, according to a Republican familiar with the matter.

Sen. Thad Cochran, the first Republican in more than 100 years to win a statewide election in his home state of Mississipi, is the latest lawmaker to announce he will not seek re-election.
"It has been a great honor to serve the people of Mississippi and our country," Cochran said in a statement Monday. "I've done my best to make decisions in the best interests of our nation, and my beloved state."
Cochran said his resignation will be effective April 1. He's joining a long list of Congress members who have already announced plans to depart their posts.
On average, 22 House members retire each cycle, Roll Call reported. But this year has seen a record number of GOP lawmakers leaving Capitol Hill, according to NPR.

Jimmy Kimmel claimed he was keeping this year's Oscars positive, but the ratings were anything but.
The politically charged 2018 Academy Awards were down 20 percent compared to the 2017 numbers, averaging 26.5 million viewers. It's the first time that the Oscars averaged fewer than 30 million people since at least 1974 when Nielsen started keeping track. 
Host Jimmy Kimmel speaks at the Oscars on Sunday, March 4, 2018, at the Dolby Theatre in Los Angeles. (Photo by Chris Pizzello/Invision/AP)
“We don’t make films like ‘Call Me By Your Name’ for money,” Kimmel quipped at one point. “We make them to upset Mike Pence.”  (2018 Invision)
Last year’s event drew 33 million sets of eyeballs and the sharp decline resulted in roughly 6.5 million lost viewers. Host Jimmy Kimmel and the crowd of Hollywood elite focused on diversity, feminism and political issues as much as they focused on the films being honored.
The lack of high-wattage stars in the major categories, as well as a ho-hum slate of films when it came to box office receipts, may also have been a factor.
Media Research Center Vice President Dan Gainor told Fox News viewers shouldn’t be surprised that the show turned political and featured “divisive, left-wing politics” throughout the four-hour event.
“The Tinseltown elite genuinely hate the people they expect will pay to see their movies and watch their TV shows,” Gainor said. “Why do we support them?”

A $130,000 payment to a former adult film star by President Donald Trump's lawyer was flagged as suspicious and reported to the Treasury Department, The Wall Street Journal reported Monday, citing a source familiar with the matter.
Michael Cohen, Trump's longtime lawyer, sent the money through an account he created at First Republic Bank, the report says. Stephanie Clifford, known in her films as Stormy Daniels, received the money under the pseudonym Peggy Peterson, according to previous reports.
The payment, which Cohen said he paid out of his own pocket, was given to Clifford as part of an agreement not to discuss an alleged affair with Trump in 2006, people familiar with the matter told the Journal.
According to the Journal, people familiar with the matter in the report said that Cohen later complained to friends that he had not been reimbursed for the money he sent Clifford.
The source also told the newspaper that Cohen had missed two deadlines to pay Clifford earlier in October 2016, weeks before the presidential election, because he could not get in touch with Trump as the campaign raged toward its end.
Later Monday, when asked whether Cohen talked to Trump about the money paid to Clifford, White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders said: "Not that I'm aware of, and I'd refer you to Michael [Cohen]."

Gear up for another Nor'easter, South Jersey. Another bout of rain, wind and more importantly, snow will fall on Wednesday.
The afternoon computer model runs are in and with the storm only 24-30 hours away, we can now bring details of what this coastal system will look like. 
First, let us talk about the weather leading up to the event. A mainly clear sky will take us through our Tuesday night. It is early March and that still means that winter jackets are the norm. Thanks to a clear sky and (finally) calmer winds, temperatures will vary from the mid-20s in the Pine Barrens to around freezing at the Jersey Shore.
Unfortunately, another round of coastal flooding is expected Tuesday night. It will just be in minor flood stage. Most of us are fine, but susceptible roads will be flooded and you may have to move your car one more time. 
Minor flood stage is expected during the Tuesday night high tides. Another round of a few flooded streets and moving your cars will occur.
Tuesday will then see morning sun, but the sky darkens during the afternoon. Then, our storm system will begin. Here is what to expect during the storm.

Another European election, another scene of political carnage. The stunning showing by the Five Star Movement and other populist parties in Italy’s election on Sunday shattered the establishment and suggested that the country was at the cusp of a political revolution.
Except Italy is Italy. A complicated law passed last year — and aimed at Five Star — made it difficult for any single party to win the election. Now, in typical Italian fashion, there is a muddle: No party, or coalition, has won enough support in parliament to form a government, thrusting the country into protracted negotiations over who will govern.
Which is to say, things were going according to plan.
On a continent that has been torn apart more than once by cataclysmic wars, many countries have built in safeguards against political extremes. But the question for Italy — and all of Europe — is how much longer these protections will hold.
Germany has a highly decentralized, consensus-based system. France has a two-step election that allows its citizens first to vote their hearts, and then their heads.
And Italy has its mess.
In an era of increasingly autocratic leaders — with anti-Democratic sweeping up furious voters across Europe — some politicians have whispered privately that although the results of the election may be disastrous for the country’s efforts at modernization, they may be preferable for European leaders and investors afraid of a populist government.

A man identified by local news reports as a retired Russian military intelligence officer who once spied for Britain is critically ill at a British hospital, and the authorities were investigating his “exposure to an unknown substance.”
According to a several reports, the man, found unconscious on a bench in the city of Salisbury, is Sergei V. Skripal, 66. He was once jailed by Moscow, then settled in Britain after an exchange of spies between the United States and Russia in 2010.
The British police have not publicly identified the man in the hospital or a 33-year-old woman who fell sick with him at a shopping mall called the Maltings.
The authorities have, however, released enough detail about what they called a “major incident” to draw some comparisons, however premature, to the case of Alexander V. Litvinenko, a former Russian spy who was poisoned in London in 2006.
Mr. Litvinenko, 43, died in November 2006, after ingesting polonium 210, a rare radioactive isotope that investigators later found in high concentrations in a teapot at a central London hotel where the victim had met with Russian associates. That episode caused an international outcry and led to years of tension between the British and Russian governments.

Under twin clouds of legal investigation, President Donald Trump and Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu presented a united front on Monday, Trump announcing he might travel to Jerusalem to preside over the opening of the new U.S. Embassy Netanyahu had wanted, and the Israeli lavishing praise on the American leader.
In a show of strong support for Netanyahu, who faces corruption allegations at home, Trump dangled the possibility of his second visit to Israel as president. However, he said nothing about whether he would use the trip to unveil his much-vaunted but still mysterious peace plan for Israel and the Palestinians.
The president said his controversial decision to recognize Jerusalem as Israel’s capital and move the U.S. Embassy from Tel Aviv to the holy city had improved chances for ending the conflict, despite Palestinians’ insistence otherwise. The two steps enraged the Palestinians, who claim part of Jerusalem for the capital of an eventual state and accuse Trump of abandoning the U.S. role of honest broker.
Trump and his wife, Melania, welcomed Netanyahu and his wife, Sara, to the White House just hours after Israeli police announced that a third confidant of the prime minister had agreed to turn state’s witness in the burgeoning corruption case. Netanyahu and his wife were questioned separately by police for hours on Friday before their departure for Washington.

The Pentagon on Monday refused to verify the authenticity of a propaganda video posted by the Islamic State that includes footage allegedly shot through the helmet camera of one of the four US soldiers killed in a deadly ambush in Niger last fall.
A Pentagon spokesman warned reporters that they would be "complicit" with the terrorist group if they publicized it. The video ends with a chilling scene when ISIS fighters open fire from close range on the wounded soldier whose camera recorded the video.
“We ask the media and the public and all responsible entities not to aid these terrorists in recruiting efforts by viewing or bringing to attention these images, these videos,” Col. Rob Manning said on Monday.
“You are complicit in amplifying ISIS propaganda if you do that,” he told reporters at the Pentagon. He did not directly answer why the military can’t authenticate the video, asserting that it “can’t confirm something we didn’t produce.”
Staff Sgt. Bryan Black, Staff Sgt. Dustin Wright, Staff Sgt. Jeremiah Johnson and Sgt. La David Johnson of the 3rd Special Forces Group were killed Oct. 4 when their 12-man team and roughly 30 Nigerien soldiers were ambushed near the village of Tongo Tongo. La David Johnson’s body was not recovered until 48 hours after the firefight.

Thousands of undocumented immigrants brought to the U.S. as children could face disruptions in their ability to work, even though the Trump administration has for months been under a federal court order to renew protections under the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program.
The problem arises chiefly from the Department of Homeland Security's refusal to prioritize those DACA renewals due to expire soonest. Instead, the applications are being processed in the order in which they were filed. Consequently, many so-called Dreamers who've applied to renew will see their DACA protections expire before DHS acts, increasing their risk of being fired from their jobs or, possibly, being arrested and deported.
“You can’t just say, ‘Don’t show up to work and we’ll kind of keep paying you,’ or 'wink wink, nod nod,'” said Todd Schulte, president of the pro-immigration FWD.us. “I just think we should assume that a ton of these people are going to lose their jobs.”
DHS did not respond to a request to clarify its enforcement policy for people with recently expired DACA grants.

A Florida middle school teacher was "removed" from classroom duties on Sunday after she was accused of hosting a secret white-nationalist podcast in which she allegedly bragged about touting her beliefs in the classroom, authorities said.
The Citrus County School District in northern Florida said it is investigating a Huffington post report that claimed Dayanna Volitich, a 25-year-old social studies teacher at Crystal River Middle School, had hosted the podcast under the pseudonym "Tiana Dalichov."
The district did not mention Volitich by name, but it said it became aware of "a concerning podcast" on Friday when it was contacted by a Huffington Post reporter, according to a statement released Sunday. The district said it launched the investigation immediately.
"The reporter indicated they believed one of the persons participating in the podcast was a teacher at Crystal River Middle School," Superintendent Sandra Himmel said in the statement. "The teacher has been removed from the classroom and the investigation is ongoing."
"Pursuant to Florida Statute an open investigation and materials related to it are exempt from public record and cannot be discussed until the investigation is complete," Himmel added.

North Korea’s leader, Kim Jong-un, has told South Korean envoys he is willing to negotiate with the United States on abandoning his country’s nuclear weapons, officials from the South said Tuesday. Mr. Kim also said he would suspend all nuclear and missile tests while such talks were underway, they said.
President Trump reacted with guarded optimism to the news, which potentially represented a major defusing of one of the world’s tensest confrontations.
During the envoys’ two-day visit to Pyongyang, the North’s capital, which ended on Tuesday, the two Koreas also agreed to hold a summit meeting between Mr. Kim and President Moon Jae-in of South Korea on the countries’ border in late April, Mr. Moon’s office said in a statement.
“The North Korean side clearly stated its willingness to denuclearize,” the statement said. “It made it clear that it would have no reason to keep nuclear weapons if the military threat to the North was eliminated and its security guaranteed.”
If the statement is corroborated by North Korea, it would be the first time Mr. Kim has indicated that his government is willing to discuss relinquishing nuclear weapons in return for security guarantees from the United States. Until now, North Korea has said its nuclear weapons were not for bargaining away.

A federal ethics agency has ruled that one of President Trump's closest White House aides twice broke the law separating government from politics.
Kellyanne Conway, who was Trump's campaign manager in 2016, advocated for Republican Roy Moore in Alabama's recent Senate election during live television interviews broadcast from the White House lawn.
The Office of Special Counsel found Conway violated the Hatch Act, which bars federal employees from using their office for partisan politics.
OSC is an independent federal ethics agency that has no relationship with Department of Justice special counsel Robert Mueller's investigation into Russian interference with the 2016 election.
In two interviews on the Alabama race, one with Fox News and one with CNN, Conway spoke in front of the White House using her official title, counselor to the president, while repeatedly attacking the Democratic candidate, Doug Jones.
"Doug Jones in Alabama, folks, don't be fooled. He will be a vote against tax cuts. He is weak on crime. Weak on borders. He's strong on raising your taxes. He is terrible for property owners," said Conway in a Nov. 20 appearance on Fox & Friends.
Jones won the election and now represents Alabama in the Senate.

She lost her job as mayor of Nashville, had her rising reputation damaged by a messy two-year affair with her bodyguard and pleaded guilty to theft. But at least Megan Barry has a really good mug shot.
Nashville Mayor Megan Barry resigned from her post after admitting to a 2-year-long affair with her bodyguard. She pleaded guilty to misappropriating city funds. 
The telegenic former chief executive of country music’s hometown was booked Tuesday before she pleaded guilty to misappropriating more than $10,000 in city funds to carry on her scandalous affair with Robert Forrest, who supervised the mayor’s security detail. Barry, 54, announced her resignation soon after.
"While my time as your mayor concludes today, my unwavering love and sincere affection for this wonderful city and its great people shall never come to an end," an emotional Barry said as she resigned.
She concluded: “God bless this wonderful city. I love you Nashville.”
Earlier Tuesday, Barry agreed to reimburse the city $11,000 in restitution, and serve three years of probation after pleading guilty to criminal theft.

When I finally caught up with Sam Nunberg on Monday night, he was immediately upset with me.
"How did I do? Didn't I do great?" he asked.
I did not provide the positive feedback he was looking for, and so he promptly hung up. Having spent time on the fringes of Trump world, I wasn't surprised. It's a world very into instant gratification, attention, and constant validation.
If he'd stayed on the line though, I would've told Nunberg that he did something very important during his Monday media blitz, in which he gave his take on the special counsel Robert Mueller's investigation into the Trump campaign and reiterated his refusal to comply with it. (He has now backtracked and says he will cooperate.)
He offered a mirror into Trump's mind.
For those forced to interact with Trump world, Nunberg has always been seen as a Trump whisperer. He was Hope Hicks before Hope Hicks was Hope Hicks. He comes from a long line of tricksters who see politics as a game and do things the way Trump likes them done. He's a protege of Roger Stone.
Stone was a protege of Roy Cohn, who was a protege of Sen. Joe McCarthy, eventually was disbarred, and is the lawyer Trump cries out for— the one he wishes were at his side.

The investigation into the possible poisoning of the Russian spy Sergei Skripal gained new momentum on Tuesday, as Scotland Yard announced its counter-terrorism police would take charge, and the foreign secretary, Boris Johnson, promised a “robust” response if the Kremlin’s role in the case was proved.
Skripal was found slumped unconscious on a bench in Salisbury on Sunday afternoon. The woman discovered next to him has been identified as Skripal’s 33-year-old daughter, Yulia. Both remain critically ill and in intensive care after exposure to an “unknown substance”.
The Metropolitan police said that due to the “unusual circumstances” its counter-terrorism unit would now be heading the investigation. The police presence in Salisbury was stepped up on Tuesday, as specialist officers appeared around a police cordon.
Sources close to British intelligence said toxicology tests would be key in the days ahead. They cautioned that other factors or triggers may have been involved. Samples from the scene are being tested at the military research laboratory at Porton Down. Experts have yet to identify the substance.

For the second time in a week, a powerful nor'easter is forecast to slam into the Mid-Atlantic and Northeast, promising more power outages and travel headaches.
Though the winds aren't expected to be as strong as last week's storm, snow should be heavier and fall over a larger, more populated area.
"The storm will still pack a punch from New Jersey to Maine,"  AccuWeather meteorologist Alex Sosnowski said. 
Utilities are racing to restore power to tens of thousands of customers in the Northeast still without electricity after last week’s storm, the Associated Press said.
The National Weather Service issued a winter storm warning from eastern Pennsylvania and across most of New England from late Tuesday night into Thursday morning. More than 36 million people live where a warning, watch or advisory has been issued.
The combination of heavy snow and strong winds may lead to additional tree damage and power outages, the Weather Channel warned. 
Accumulating snow is forecast to reach Baltimore, Philadelphia, New York City and even Boston, AccuWeather said. Heavy snow, enough to shovel and plow, is projected in a swath from northern Delaware and southeastern Pennsylvania to metro New York City, central Connecticut and central Massachusetts.

Russian President Vladimir Putin, soaring in popularity as he boasts of the country's international power, is all but assured to win re-election in this month's vote.
The Kremlin already barred opposition leader Alexey Navalny from the presidential election, a move that gives Putin an added boost at the polls. Navalny called the election a farce in January. He said, "It will feature only Putin and the candidates which he has personally selected.”
Yet people dare to run against Putin — some serious, some not.
One candidate is a journalist who named her campaign "No Fear" and has criticized Putin. Another candidate, a career politician, once ran a presidential platform that called for cheaper vodka for Russian men and better lingerie for Russian women. And a third candidate received death threats after he criticized Russia's aggressive foreign policy. 

A Perth family has found the world's oldest known message in a bottle, almost 132 years after it was thrown into the sea, Australian experts say.
Tonya Illman picked up the bottle while going for a walk around sand dunes on a remote beach in West Australia.
Her husband Kym Illman told the BBC they found some paper in the bottle but had "no idea" what it was until they took it home and dried it in the oven.
Experts have confirmed it is an authentic message from a German ship.
The note in the bottle, which was dated 12 June 1886, was jettisoned from the German ship Paula, as part of an experiment into ocean and shipping routes by the German Naval Observatory.
Previously, the Guinness world record for the oldest message in a bottle was 108 years, between it being sent and found.

It's been about a week and a half since President Trump took questions from reporters in a formal setting, and in that time the news deluge has been nonstop. Trump will share the stage with Swedish Prime Minister Stefan Löfven and as is traditional, each leader is expected to call on two journalists.
One of the topics Trump is likely to be asked about is his seemingly improvised announcement late last week that he would impose tariffs on steel and aluminum imports. It is a move that is publicly opposed by leaders in Trump's own party. And, ironically, the Löfven may have more to say about these potential tariffs than most European leaders. Löfven spent most of his career working with, and ultimately leading, trade unions that represent metal workers in Sweden.
In a brief handshake photo opportunity with the prime minister in the Oval Office, Trump was asked about a potential breakthrough with North Korea. He expressed optimism but also added his favorite dodge.
"We have come certainly a long way, at least rhetorically, with North Korea. It would be a great thing for the world. It would be a great thing for the peninsula, but we'll see what happens," he said.

Russian military cargo plane crashed near an air base in Syria on Tuesday, killing all 39 Russian servicemen on board in a blow to Russian operations in Syria. The Russian military quickly insisted the plane was not shot down and blamed the crash on a technical error.
Meanwhile, shelling near the rebel-held eastern suburbs of Damascus killed dozens of people over the past 24 hours as President Bashar Assad's government, supported by the Russian military, pushed its assault on the capital's rebel-held suburbs. International aid workers on a rare humanitarian mission inside the besieged area described dramatic scenes of rescuers trying to pull corpses from the rubble of buildings and children who hadn't seen daylight in 15 days.
The mission on Monday to the area known as eastern Ghouta was cut short after the government shelling escalated while the aid workers were still inside, calling into question future aid shipments to the encircled region, the last major opposition stronghold near the capital.
Opposition activists and a war monitor said 80 people were killed Monday — the deadliest day since the U.N. Security Council demanded a 30-day cease-fire for Syria — and at least nine were killed Tuesday.

There's more bad news about the nation's devastating opioid epidemic.
In just one year, overdoses from opioids jumped by about 30 percent, according to a report released Tuesday by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
The overall increase in opioid overdoses seen in hospital emergency rooms between the third quarter of 2016 and 2017 occurred across the nation. Some parts of the country experienced far greater increases than others while a few reported declines, the analysis shows.
"We have an emergency on our hands," says CDC Acting Director Anne Schuchat. "The fast-moving opioid overdose epidemic continues and is accelerating."
The largest regional increase occurred in the Midwest, which saw a 69.7 percent jump in opioid overdoses, according to the report. The jump was driven in part by a 109 percent increase in Wisconsin. Overdoses increased 40.3 percent in the West, 21.3 percent in the Northeast, 20.2 percent in the Southwest, and 14 percent in the Southeast.
"We saw, sadly, that in every region, in every age group of adults, in both men and women, overdoses from opioids are increasing," Schuchat says.

Two years ago, just one Texas Democrat volunteered to run against Republican Rep. John Culberson in a metro Houston congressional district. This year, not even that failed challenger's double-digit loss could scare seven Democrats away from jumping in the race.
As primary season opens on Tuesday with the Texas vote, Democrats across the country are enjoying a bumper crop of candidates. It's the latest sign of enthusiasm — like massive women's marches and victories in state races around the country — heading into midterm elections that look increasingly hopeful for the opposition party.
But the abundance of volunteers also comes with a reality check: The crowded primaries are giving the party's ideological divide a full public airing and could give party leaders less control over who carries the mantle in November.
Conversations with more than a dozen Democratic candidates, party officials and strategists found confidence that a glut of crowded primaries won't damage the party's overall prospects for a big November. Yet Democrats acknowledged the lively nomination fights could result in victories for candidates with little experience, scant scrutiny or political views that are out of step with general electorate.

The Trump administration on Thursday announced sanctions against 19 Russian individuals and five organizations for meddling in the 2016 elections and for other "destructive cyber-attacks" targeting the U.S. electrical grid and water systems.
President Trump himself did not criticize Russia directly or address the sanctions, which are the strongest such actions by his administration since he took office, when he made comments to reporters after the Treasury Department's announcement.
He simply acknowledged, only when asked by reporters, that he agreed with British Prime Minister Theresa May that Russia was culpable for a separate nerve-agent attack in a British city March 4 that targeted a Russian-born double agent and his daughter and injured other British citizens.
"It certainly looks like the Russians were behind it – something that should never, ever happen," Trump said. He said his administration was taking it "seriously."
The poisoning in Salisbury, England, was "a very sad situation," Trump said, as he sat down to meet with Irish Prime Minister Leo Varadkar.

The Broward Sheriff's Office today released some surveillance video of Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School shortly after a gunman opened fire last month, and the sheriff's office says the video "speaks for itself" regarding the actions of the school's embattled former deputy.
The video, which starts at 2:22 p.m. -- one minute after authorities said the shooting started -- shows some students walking in an outdoor passage between buildings at the Parkland, Florida, campus.
An official is seen banging on the door of Building 1, located away from where the shooting was happening. An officer then approaches and talks into his radio, and the official and the officer start to run. They jump into a golf cart which then speeds away.
School resource deputy Scot Peterson’s response to the shooting "speaks for itself," the Broward Sheriff's Office said in a press release today. It was not immediately clear if the officer seen in the video is Peterson.

President Donald Trump repeated his controversial claim on Thursday that the U.S. has a trade deficit with Canada to swipe at Canadian Prime Minister Justin Trudeau, a day after boasting about attempting to bluff the Canadian leader on the subject.
"We do have a Trade Deficit with Canada, as we do with almost all countries (some of them massive),” Trump said on Twitter on Thursday morning. “P.M. Justin Trudeau of Canada, a very good guy, doesn’t like saying that Canada has a Surplus vs. the U.S. (negotiating), but they do...they almost all do...and that’s how I know!”
The Office of the U.S. Trade Representative says the U.S. in 2016 had a goods and services trade surplus with Canada of $12.5 billion. And Trump’s own 2018 economic report, which was released last month and signed by the president, also notes that the U.S. runs “a net bilateral surplus only with Canada and the United Kingdom.”
But Trump and his top trade official, USTR Robert Lighthizer, argue that official statistics understate the size of the U.S. trade deficit with Canada as well as with Mexico, because the data doesn't reflect the value of imports from China and other suppliers that first enter the U.S. and are then re-exported to one of the North American neighbors.

In the 2017 series The Disappearance of Natalee Holloway, John Christopher Ludwick made headlines when claiming he helped Joran van der Sloot dispose of the missing teen's body.
Now he, too, is dead.
Ludwick, 32, of Port Charlotte, Fla., a community northwest of Fort Myers, Fla., was stabbed to death Tuesday after he attempted to kidnap a woman from her vehicle in nearby North Port, police said.
Ludwick was roommates with the woman at one point and wanted a romantic relationship with her, but she didn't, North Port police spokesman Joshua Taylor said.
"He essentially ambushed her getting out of her car, going into her home," said Taylor.
The woman was able to wrestle a knife from Ludwick, then stabbed him in the abdomen, police said.
 “It appears that the male subject who has passed was attempting to kidnap a young woman as she exited her vehicle in her driveway. They are familiar with each other,” police said in a statement on Facebook. “A struggle ensued, and he is the one who ended up stabbed. He then fled the area on foot. He was found nearby suffering from the stab wounds.”

The younger sister of convicted mass murderer Dylann Roof — who gunned down nine parishioners at a Charleston, S.C., church in 2015 — was arrested Wednesday on drug and weapons charges after she posted a disturbing message on social media.
Morgan Roof, 18, a student at AC Flora High School in Columbia, was charged with one count of marijuana possession and two counts of carrying a weapon on school grounds, the Richland County Sheriff's Department said, describing the weapons as a knife and pepper spray, according to The State newspaper.
WACH-TV in Columbia reports:
"No students were harmed and [Morgan Roof] has been transported to the Alvin S. Glenn Detention Center.
She [appeared] in bond court Wednesday night, where her bond was set at $5,000, and was charged with carrying weapons on school property. She was also ordered not to [return] to the incident location."
Roof's arrest came after she reportedly posted a message to Snapchat saying that she hoped students participating in Wednesday's walkout of classes to protest gun violence would "get shot" and suggested that only "black people" would be participating in the nationwide protests.

Because irony is dead under President Trump, the first lady will welcome representatives from the leading tech companies to the White House next week to discuss cyberbullying and online harassment—despite her husband’s long, long history of lobbing insults on social media.
“Melania Trump has emerged from hiding,” announced Jimmy Kimmel.
“You know, she hasn’t been seen much since Winter Stormy Daniels has hit D.C., but Melania’s back and planning to meet with representatives from Twitter, Facebook, Google and others to lead the fight against online bullying,” he added. “Apparently the word ‘irony’ doesn’t translate from Slovenian. All she has to do to fight cyberbullying is take a hammer to her husband’s thumbs and phone!”
Last month during a White House luncheon, the first lady remarked, “It is important that, as adults, we take the lead and the responsibility in helping our children manage the many issues they are facing today. This means encouraging positive habits with social media and technology, even limiting time online and understanding the content they are exposed to on a daily basis.”

In a rare joint statement, the United States, France and Germany joined Britain on Thursday in blaming Russia for poisoning a former spy and his daughter, calling the attack “the first offensive use of a nerve agent in Europe" since World War II.
President Trump, French President Emmanuel Macron, German Chancellor Angela Merkel and British Prime Minister Theresa May said “there is no plausible alternative explanation” to Russian responsibility.
"It is an assault on U.K. sovereignty and any such use by a state party is a clear violation of the Chemical Weapons Convention and a breach of international law. It threatens the security of us all," the statement said. 
The leaders called on Russia "to address all questions related to the attack," and provide a complete disclosure of the Novichok (nerve agent) program to the world chemical weapons watchdog." the statement said.
The statement comes as Britain seeks international support to hold Russia accountable for the March 4 attack on former Russian double agent Sergei Skripal, 66, and his daughter Yulia, 33. Both remain hospitalized in serious condition after they were found slumped on a bench in the city of Salisbury in southern England.
British authorities said they were poisoned with Novichok, a military-grade nerve agent developed in Russia.

He's the new international man of mystery — and even uses a code name.
Saudi Arabian Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman has garnered international intrigue in the months since maneuvering to become next in line for the throne.
Part of that plane was seemingly to hide his mother away — fearing she'd block his power grab last June.
The crown prince has kept his mother's whereabouts a secret from his father, King Salman, for more than two years, NBC News reported Thursday.
The Saudi embassy in Washington denied the report, which added the king was told his third wife was often away for medical treatment.
The crown prince has carved out a unique reputation over the last year, as a reformer with questionable methods — who also loves art.
MBS came to power last June at 31, after serving as deputy crown prince and defense minister.
But he convinced his father, now 82, to drop his cousin, Prince Muhammad bin Nayef, as crown prince in favor of him.
MBS has been credited with reforms such as allowing women the right to drive, and branching out to Silicon Valley.

This year's happiest place on Earth is Finland, according to an annual UN report - toppling Norway from the top spot.
The World Happiness Report measures "subjective well-being" - how happy people feel they are, and why.
Nordic countries regularly appear in the top five, while war-hit countries and a number in sub-Saharan Africa regularly appear in the bottom five.
Burundi was the least happy, taking over from the Central African Republic.
It was thrown into crisis when President Pierre Nkurunziza's bid for re-election to a third term in 2015 sparked protests by opposition supporters who said the move was unconstitutional.
This year's report by the UN Sustainable Development Solutions Network also features data about the happiness of immigrants in their host countries, with Finland also coming top as home to the happiest immigrants.
The country's most famous exports include the cartoon characters called Moomins and the mobile gaming app Angry Birds
"I think everything in this society is set up for people to be successful, starting with university and transportation that works really well," American teacher Brianna Owens, who lives in Finland's second biggest city Espoo, told Reuters news agency.
The survey ranks some 156 countries by their happiness levels, and 117 by the happiness of their immigrants.

A Russian AN-12 transport plane carrying approximately 9 tons of gold blocks, worth hundreds of millions of dollars, lost a third of its cargo as it was taking off from the Yakutsk Airport in eastern Siberia on Thursday.
According to local reports, the plane’s hatch door snapped during liftoff. The bars of doré, a semi-pure alloy of gold and silver, dropped out of the aircraft and onto the runway.
The airport’s press service told Russian news agency Tass the technicians may have failed to properly secure the cargo. After the incident, various pieces of the plane’s fuselage were reportedly found on the ground near the runway—along with dozens of gold and silver bars. 
A police spokesperson said five crewmembers were on the plane and none were hurt in the incident. He confirmed that a "total of 172 gold bars weighing 3.4 tons" dropped out of the plane, reported Tass.
In an official statement, Yakutsk Airport said the plane belonged to Nimbus Airlines and confirmed an investigation is underway to determine the cause of the incident. After the bars fell, the crew members immediately landed the aircraft in nearby Magan Airport and returned to Yakutsk to gather the lost gold.
The cargo belonged to Chukotka Mining and Geological Co., a private company based in Anadyr in Russia and mostly owned by Kinross Gold Corp., a Canadian-based gold and silver mining company.

The devices used in a string of deadly package bombings rocking Austin, Texas are likely "simple" contraptions, the components of which will be key in tracking down the mysterious person behind the porch bombs, experts say.
Since March 2, a trio of package bombs have been detonated, killing Anthony Stephen House, 39, and Draylen Mason, 17, and injuring Mason's mom and a 75-year-old Hispanic woman who has yet to be identified by authorities. In the days since the second and third parcels exploded Monday, authorities have responded to nearly 500 calls reporting suspicious packages in Texas' capital city. So far, however, no new nefarious device has been uncovered.
Austin Police Chief Brian Manley told "FOX & Friends" on Tuesday that whoever is responsible for the blasts likely has a "certain level of skill" to be able to construct the bombs and deliver them without setting off an explosion prematurely.
For weapons experts, the devices probably hold significant clues about the bombmaker.
"As a bomb technician the first thing through my mind is 'How was this made?' And 'Are there any components in the post-blast analysis that allow us to track the person purchasing them,'" Johnny “Joey” Jones, a retired Marine Corps staff sergeant who served in Iraq and Afghanistan as a bomb technician, told "FOX & Friends."
Jones, who lost both of his legs during his final deployment, said it seems likely the devices are either blowing up when they are opened, or blowing up when they are moved.

President Donald Trump's namesake company was reportedly tied to and the $130,000 hush payment made to a porn star prior to the 2016 presidential election to keep her quiet about an affair she claims she had with Trump, according to The Wall Street Journal.
The Journal reported that documents marked "HIGHLY CONFIDENTIAL PROCEEDING" tied the Trump Organization to the payment, which was facilitated by Trump's longtime lawyer Michael Cohen.
Trump Organization lawyer Jill A. Martin is listed as counsel in an arbitration filing for the Delaware company that Cohen used to make the payment to porn star Stormy Daniels, whose real name is Stephanie Clifford. Cohen, whom NBC News reported last week used his Trump Organization email address in the episode, obtained a temporary restraining order against Clifford to prevent her from speaking about the alleged affair with Trump.
Clifford asked a judge to declare the non-disclosure agreement invalid.
Cohen has said the payment was a private transaction, adding that he acted alone in making it. The White House has sought to distance itself from the scandal. Trump's direct involvement in the agreement is unknown.

A pedestrian bridge under construction collapsed Thursday, just days after crews had dropped an elevated 950-ton span in place on a signature project that was intended to give Florida International University students a safe route across the busy roadway.
The massive span — in a sudden, catastrophic failure — crashed down across eight lanes of heavily traveled Tamiami Trail, flattening eight cars. The death toll remained uncertain as rescue crews continued to work into the night to reach vehicles but late Thursday Miami-Dade fire chief Dave Downey confirmed at least four people had been killed, including a student from FIU, police sources said.
Nine people had been pulled from the rubble by evening and rushed to Kendall Regional Medical Center’s trauma unit, including two who required immediate surgery. The others sustained injuries ranging from scrapes and bruises to broken bones, which were not considered life threatening. On campus, some families waited for word on missing loved ones.
Even before the dust from the disaster settled, motorists scrambled from their cars to help. At least one woman, Katrina Collazo, was pulled from her half-crushed car, miraculously unscathed.

Stormy Daniels' lawyer claims she was physically threatened by someone. The adult film actress' lawyer, Michael Avenatti, said on MSNBC's "Morning Joe" Friday that someone physically threatened his client — but he declined to reveal any names. 
Daniels, whose real name is Stephanie Clifford, is suing Mr. Trump and Mr. Trump's lawyer Michael Cohen in an attempt to dissolve their non-disclosure agreement. Clifford claims the pact is invalid because Mr. Trump didn't provide his signature in a 2016 hush agreement. 
A hearing for the lawsuit has been set for July 12 in Los Angeles. 
The Stormy Daniels saga continues to plague a White House that would much rather not take questions about the story during daily White House briefings. The White House has denied the alleged 2006 affair. 
In February, Cohen admitted to paying $130,000 of his own funds to Clifford in 2016, claiming the Trump Organization had nothing to do with it. But Cohen using a Trump Organization email to arrange the negotiations for the NDA.

It’s Friday. The president hasn’t tweeted yet. But there are three people in Washington who are going to be particularly interested in what he has to say today: John Kelly, H.R. McMaster and Jeff Sessions.
All day, Washington will once again be on pink slip watch, waiting to see if any of the numerous administration officials rumored to be on the chopping block meet the same fate as ousted Secretary of State Rex Tillerson.
In the latest round of speculation, two weeks after NBC reported that the administration was preparing for the departure of National Security Adviser H.R. McMaster, the Washington Post and the New York Times both report that Trump has definitely decided to oust him and is actively talking about potential replacements.
The White House denies an imminent change, with Sarah Huckabee Sanders tweeting last night “Contrary to reports they have a good working relationship and there are no changes at the NSC.” Also mentioned in both stories as being on thin ice with the president are Kelly (who CBS also reports may be on the way out), Sessions, Ben Carson, David Shulkin, and pretty much any other Cabinet official who’s been facing embarrassing headlines in the last few weeks.

Thursday afternoon, The New York Times broke the news that Special Counsel Robert Mueller, who is investigating whether the Trump campaign assisted Russian operation to swing the 2016 election to the president, had issued a subpoena for the Trump Organization’s records. The subpoena reportedly “ordered the Trump Organization to hand over all records related to Russia and other topics [Mueller] is investigating.”
The president has previously implied that he could fire Mueller if the special counsel began investigating Trump’s businesses. As the Times reports, “the subpoena comes as Mr. Mueller appears to be broadening his investigation to examine the role foreign money may have played in funding Mr. Trump’s political activities,” in particular from the United Arab Emirates.  
Former prosecutors and defense attorneys stressed to me that Mueller issuing a subpoena was standard for a white-collar investigation. Although the scope of the subpoena is unknown, given the breadth of Mueller’s inquiry, it was inevitable that he would look for Trump Organization records, given the possibility that doing so might provide evidence that the Trump campaign aided the Russian effort.

Russian president Vladimir Putin is testing Britain a time of isolation and weakness owing to Brexit, according to Lithuania's foreign minister.
Speaking after a meeting with Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson, Linas Linkevičius said the poisoning of Sergei Skripal — which has been blamed on Russia — was a test of the UK's strength and diplomatic links as it prepares to leave the European Union.
"Russia is always looking for weak points, and may feel the UK does not feel very strong," he told the Guardian.
"The Russian assumption may be that in the process of Brexit, the UK is weaker in terms of its isolation, and due to Brexit the EU will not be very enthusiastic in backing the UK up.
"Fortunately that is not the case, and we will support the UK, but Russia acts by testing for reactions."
Whatever Russia's intentions, the poisoning of Skripal — a Russian national who worked as a double agent for MI6 — has underlined the strength of Britain's alliances in both Europe and the United States.

All seven service members aboard an American military helicopter that crashed in western Iraq late Thursday were killed, according to two U.S. military officials.
The crash of the U.S. HH-60 Pave Hawk helicopter does not appear to be a result of enemy activity and the incident is under investigation, U.S. Central Command and military officials said.
"All personnel aboard were killed in the crash," said U.S. Army Brig. Gen. Jonathan P. Braga, the director of operations for the U.S.-led anti-Islamic State coalition in Iraq and Syria.
The helicopter was used by the Air Force for combat search and rescue, and was in transit from one location to another when it went down Thursday afternoon near the town of Qaim, where where the anti-ISIS coalition has an outpost near the Syrian border.
An accompanying U.S. helicopter immediately reported the crash and a quick reaction force comprised of Iraqi Security Forces and Coalition members secured the scene, according to a statement from CENTCOM.

The Trump administration imposed sanctions on a series of Russian organizations and individuals on Thursday in retaliation for interference in the 2016 presidential election and other “malicious cyberattacks,” its most significant action against Moscow since President Trump took office.
The sanctions came as the United States joined with Britain, France and Germany in denouncing Russia for its apparent role in a nerve-gas attack on a former Russian spy and his daughter on British soil, calling it a “clear violation” of international law. But the joint statement said nothing about any collective action in response.
In his first comment on the poison attack, Mr. Trump agreed that, despite its denials, Russia was likely behind it. “It looks like it,” he told reporters in the Oval Office, adding that he had spoken with Prime Minister Theresa May of Britain.
“We are in deep discussions,” Mr. Trump continued. “A very sad situation. It certainly looks like the Russians were behind it. Something that should never, ever happen. And we’re taking it very seriously, as I think are many others.”

Saudi Arabia's future king has hidden the whereabouts of his mother from his father and the public, according to U.S. officials.
Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman has given his father, King Salman, a number of different explanations for her absence, say 14 current and former U.S. officials who spoke to NBC on condition of anonymity. Among the fabrications he is said to have created is that she is receiving medical treatment abroad.
Years of intelligence have led U.S. officials to believe that the Saudi heir, who is now 32, is concealing his mother's location. The officials say that the crown prince was motivated by a belief that she opposed his ascendancy to the throne and that she would use her position as King Salman's third wife to prevent it.
One source close to the royal family told NBC that the prince was concerned that his mother was trying to "empower her siblings." That allegedly caused a rift between the prince and his mother years ago.

As many as 50,000 people have fled separate offensives against rebel forces in northern and southern Syria in recent days, activists say.
Russian air strikes reportedly killed 31 people in the Eastern Ghouta outside Damascus on Friday, after 20,000 people left the region.
In the northern town of Afrin, where 30,000 people have fled, Turkish shelling killed at least 18 people.
Seven years of war have driven nearly 12 million Syrians from their homes.
At least 6.1 million are internally displaced while another 5.6 million have fled abroad.
More than 400,000 are believed to have been killed or are missing, presumed dead, since the uprising against President Bashar al-Assad began in March 2011.
The foreign ministers of Turkey, Russia and Iran - three countries closely involved in the conflict - have met in the Kazakh capital Astana to prepare for a summit on Syria in Istanbul next month.

President Emmanuel Macron and German Chancellor Angela Merkel meet in Paris to discuss euro zone reform on Friday, their first encounter since her new coalition took office, but they may struggle to find common ground on further change in Europe.
Merkel, narrowly re-elected to a fourth term as chancellor, wants to fulfill her incoming government’s pledge to deliver a “new start” for Europe, while Macron, too, has made euro zone overhaul a key goal since taking power last May.
There is already detailed reform under way in the euro zone, including the creation of a banking union among its 19 member states and plans for a single deposit insurance scheme that would protect individuals’ savings.
However, the appetite for deeper changes, such as Macron’s grand ideas for a separate euro zone budget, a single euro zone finance minister and a dedicated fund that would help countries facing external shocks and imbalances, is limited.
Members of Merkel’s conservative bloc are wary of more comprehensive European integration and shudder at the idea of Germany, Europe’s economic powerhouse, pooling risks and debts with other, less financially fit countries.

As a clandestine officer at the Central Intelligence Agency in 2002, Gina Haspel oversaw the torture of two terrorism suspects and later took part in an order to destroy videotapes documenting their brutal interrogations at a secret prison in Thailand.
On Thursday, Ms. Haspel was named the deputy director of the C.I.A.
The elevation of Ms. Haspel, a veteran widely respected among her colleagues, to the No. 2 job at the C.I.A. was a rare public signal of how, under the Trump administration, the agency is being led by officials who appear to take a far kinder view of one of its darker chapters than their immediate predecessors.
Over the past eight years, C.I.A. leaders defended dozens of agency personnel who had taken part in the now-banned torture program, even as they vowed never to resume the same harsh interrogation methods. But President Trump has said repeatedly that he thinks torture works. And the new C.I.A. chief, Mike Pompeo, has said that waterboarding and other techniques do not even constitute torture, and praised as “patriots” those who used such methods in the early days of the fight against Al Qaeda.

Jeff Flake has a direct message for the Republicans of New Hampshire: Someone needs to stop Donald Trump. And Flake, a Republican senator from Arizona, may stand up against the Republican president in 2020 — either as a Republican or an independent — if no one else does.
"It's not in my plan to run for president, but I am not ruling it out. Somebody needs to stand up for traditional Republicanism," Flake told The Associated Press in an interview. "Somebody needs to raise that, for nothing else than to give people hope that that decent party will be back. We'll get through this."
Flake's comments came on the eve of his first solo political appearance in New Hampshire, the state expected to host the nation's first presidential primary election in less than two years. The 55-year-old Republican will deliver a speech Friday morning entitled "Country Over Party," as part of the esteemed "Politics and Eggs" speaker series at Saint Anselm College.
Flake is among a very small group of Republican elected officials speaking out against the Trump presidency with increasing alarm.

Andrew G. McCabe, the former F.B.I. deputy director and a frequent target of President Trump’s scorn, was fired Friday after Attorney General Jeff Sessions rejected an appeal that would have let him retire this weekend.
Mr. McCabe promptly declared that his firing, and Mr. Trump’s persistent needling, were intended to undermine the special counsel’s investigation in which he is a potential witness.
Mr. McCabe is accused in a yet-to-be-released internal report of failing to be forthcoming about a conversation he authorized between F.B.I. officials and a journalist.
In a statement released late Friday, Mr. Sessions said that Mr. McCabe had shown a lack of candor under oath on multiple occasions.
“The F.B.I. expects every employee to adhere to the highest standards of honesty, integrity and accountability,” he said. “I have terminated the employment of Andrew McCabe effective immediately.”
Early Saturday morning, the president weighed in with another shot at Mr. McCabe, posting on Twitter that it was “a great day for the hard working men and women of the FBI.”

The data analytics firm that used voter-targeting tactics to help President Donald Trump clinch the White House improperly collected information on more than 50 million Facebook users, The New York Times alleged Saturday in a report that raises further questions about both companies' conduct during and after the 2016 election.
The Times article, and a companion piece published by the Observer in London, landed hours after Facebook announced that it had suspended the firm, Cambridge Analytica, while investigating whether it had improperly kept data on as many as 270,000 users.
But the newest reports raise the prospect that the breach was far broader than what Facebook copped to Friday night — while tying the privacy violations directly to Cambridge's work for the Trump campaign and its alleged entanglements with Russia.
The Times quoted an anonymous Cambridge employee as saying that hundreds of gigabytes of unencrypted Facebook data still exist on Cambridge's servers, contradicting assurances given to congressional investigators. Until Friday, the newspaper added, "Facebook downplayed the scope of the leak and questioned whether any of the data still remained out of its control."

Florida International University, long known as a commuter school and an engine of mobility for Greater Miami’s Cuban-Americans, has in the past two decades transformed itself into one of the largest public universities in the country.
Its rapid expansion and enhanced reputation helped its selection in 2013 as an official federal research center for an engineering method called accelerated bridge construction.
On Thursday, a pedestrian bridge on campus using that very method collapsed just days after it was installed, dealing the center — and the university’s larger efforts to improve its stature — a grave blow.
“Do I worry about the image of the university? Every breathing moment,” F.I.U.’s president, Mark B. Rosenberg, said in an interview. “But the response that we’ve gotten from around the country has been overwhelmingly positive. It’s not the time now to be worried about our image.”
Historically, many F.I.U. students have been commuters who began their studies at Miami Dade College, then transferred, taking advantage of low tuition to get their degrees with little debt. Many of them have become pillars of Miami business and political circles.

Russia expelled 23 British diplomats on Saturday in a carefully calibrated retaliatory move against London, which has accused the Kremlin of orchestrating a nerve toxin attack on a former Russian double agent and his daughter in southern England.
Escalating a crisis in relations, Russia said it was also shutting down the activities of the British Council, which fosters cultural links between the two countries, and Britain’s consulate-general in St. Petersburg.
The Russian Foreign Ministry said it was giving the 23 British diplomats one week to leave the country.
The move, which was tougher than expected, followed Britain’s decision on Wednesday to expel 23 Russian diplomats over the attack in the English city of Salisbury which left former Russian spy Sergei Skripal, 66, and his daughter Yulia Skripal, 33, critically ill in hospital.
Moscow announced the measures on the eve of a presidential election which incumbent Vladimir Putin should comfortably win. Putin has cast his country as a fortress besieged by hostile Western powers with him as its defender, and state media is likely to portray the anti-British move in that context.

If the University of Maryland Baltimore County’s stunning upset of No. 1 seed Virginia in the NCAA basketball tournament was the first time you ever heard of UMBC, you could be excused for wondering: Is that a community college? No, it’s not. Actually, it’s something of a nerd factory (and proud of it) that churns out future research scientists, computer scientists, engineers and Md-PhDs at an astonishing rate.
It’s a bit of a joke in Maryland that UMBC was repeatedly ranked by U.S. News and World Report as the top up-and-coming university in the nation. The truth is, it up and came quite a while ago. The magazine also ranks it as one of the top 20 schools for undergraduate teaching and one of the five most innovative national universities. Kiplinger’s Personal Finance has called it a best value university for eight years in a row.
UMBC President Freeman Hrabowski is something of a living legend among college presidents. He grew up in segregated Alabama — he knew one of the girls killed in the Birmingham church bombing and was part of the Rev. Martin Luther King Jr.’s Children’s Crusade — and grew up to become a mathematician. He’s led UMBC since 1992, where his research has focused on expanding opportunities for minorities in science. It’s a good fit for a school founded as an integrated institution in the 1960s as Maryland’s other universities were just desegregating. Today, UMBC produces more African-American Md-PhD students than any other university in the country.

Hacker Adrian Lamo died at the age of 37, according a Facebook post from his father. “With great sadness and a broken heart I have to let know all of Adrian’s friends and acquaintances that he is dead. A bright mind and compassionate soul is gone, he was my beloved son,” Mario Lamo wrote in a post to the 2600: The Hacker Quarterly Facebook Group. The cause of death is not yet known, but a coroner in Sedgwick County, Kansas confirmed the news to ZDNet.
Lamo was born in Boston, Massachusetts in 1981. In the mid 1990s, he volunteered for PlanetOut, a public media company that catered to the LGBTQ community. In 1998, he was appointed to the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, Queer and Questioning Youth Task Force by the San Francisco Board of Supervisors.
Lamo first gained notoriety online in the early 2000s for hacking companies like Yahoo! and AOL, as well as The New York Times. In 2004, after accepting a plea bargain, Lamo was sentenced for hacking the newspaper, where he had added his name to an internal list of op-ed writers and racked up $300,000 in charges using the organization's subscription to Lexis-Nexis, a pay-per-use search tool.
He was also known for tipping US government authorities about the actions of whistleblower Chelsea Manning, who was later sentenced to 35 years in prison for providing Wikileaks with 750,000 classified military cables. (President Barack Obama commuted Manning’s sentence in 2017.) In a 2013 interview with the Guardian, Lamo explained his decision to report Manning.

China's parliament has endorsed Xi Jinping for a second term and appointed Wang Qishan as his vice-president.
The ballot at the National People's Congress unanimously approved Mr Xi while Mr Wang received 2,969 votes in favour and only one against.
Wang Qishan was previously in charge of corruption investigations in China.
He is a longstanding ally of President Xi and his elevation is being seen as a further consolidation of the Chinese leader's power.
The recent abolition of term limits for the Chinese presidency extends to the vice-presidency, giving the position greater significance than before.
China's constitution allows the vice-president to "assist" in his superior's work and to carry out presidential duties on his behalf - meaning Wang Qishan, possibly in his role for life, could be far more than the figurehead his predecessors were.

Thousands of civilians streamed out of their towns to escape battles at opposite ends of Syria on Saturday, where two different offensives have prompted an exodus in recent days.
Air strikes pounded a rebel pocket in eastern Ghouta near the capital Damascus, rescuers and a war monitor said, with a new wave of at least 10,000 people fleeing to army lines since the morning.
In the northern Afrin region, people fled other frontlines closing in on their homes as Turkish troops and allied rebels struck the main town, Syrian Kurdish forces and the monitor said.
More than 150,000 people have left the town in the last few days, a senior Kurdish official and the monitor said.
The two offensives, one backed by Russia and the other led by Turkey, have shown how Syrian factions and their foreign allies are aggressively reshaping the map after the defeat of Islamic State's self-proclaimed caliphate last year.

China’s Foreign Ministry on Saturday expressed its “resolute opposition” after U.S. President Donald Trump signed legislation that encourages the United States to send senior officials to Taiwan to meet Taiwanese counterparts and vice versa.
The bill, which is non-binding, would have gone into effect on Saturday morning, even if Trump had not signed it.
The move adds to strains between the two countries over trade, as Trump has enacted tariffs and called for China to reduce its huge trade imbalance with the United States, even while Washington has leaned on Beijing to help resolve tensions with North Korea.
In a statement, China’s Foreign Ministry said it had lodged “stern representations” with the United States, saying the law sent a “seriously wrong signal” to the forces of Taiwan independence.

A small passenger plane carrying five people crashed into a house shortly after takeoff north of Manila on Saturday, killing all those onboard and five people on the ground, officials said. The Piper-23 Apache plane took off from the airport in Plaridel town in Bulacan province then crash-landed and smashed into the house, Civil Aviation Authority of the Philippines spokesman Eric Apolonio and police said.
All five Filipinos on board the six-seat plane were killed, and the crash killed five people on the ground, Plaridel police chief Supt. Julio Lizardo said by phone. The crash ignited a fire in a house that was hit by the aircraft, he said.
Two other people on the ground were injured by burning debris, Lizardo said.
The cause of the crash was not immediately known.
Witnesses said the plane hit a tree and electric post before slamming into the house.
TV footage showed parts of the plane wreckage and the shattered walls of the house at the still-smoldering crash site.
Apolonio said the aircraft, which was operated by Lite Air Express, was bound for northern Laoag city. All the aircraft operated by the transport and courier company were grounded while investigators tried to determine the cause of the crash, he said.

Some House Democrats wanted Nancy Pelosi out as their leader after they failed to win a string of 2017 special elections. And now some want the House minority leader out because they appear to have won a special election.
What gives with the paradox? It doesn’t make sense, except that some House Democrats are prepared to move on from Pelosi -- and some aren’t.
“The watch” is on again on Capitol Hill when it comes to Pelosi, how has been the House’s top Democrat for more than a decade.  
Democrat Conor Lamb is on track to vanquish Republican Rick Saccone in a historically GOP district in southwest Pennsylvania that President Trump won by nearly 20 points.
Lamb distanced himself from Pelosi and ran as a moderate Democrat. And now Democrats are eager to replicate Lamb’s prototype in their quest to capture the House in November.
Republicans contend Pelosi is radioactive, considering how critics have branded her as a West Coast liberal losing touch with the party base.  And the plan to use the leader to put other moderate Democratic candidates on the spot this year. In other words, will you support Pelosi for House speaker should Democrats win the House? And it’s moderate to conservative Democrats who must win -- in districts Trump carried -- if Democrats are going to have a shot at winning the House.

The two young, blond women in figure-flattering ball gowns hoisted whiskey and shotguns.
An auctioneer rattled off bids. Above the stage in the banquet hall hung a green flag for the 51st state of Jefferson, with its pair of Xs called a “double-cross” representing a sense of rural abandonment.
Hundreds of people packed into the Veterans of Foreign Wars Post 9650 hall on this chilly Saturday night, ready to crack open wallets to help fund their dream of carving — out of California’s northernmost reaches — a brand new state.
Someone offered $350 for a state of Jefferson belt buckle. Someone else won a lamb, still in its mother’s womb, that should be born in time to be butchered for Easter. Outside, vehicles bore bumper stickers supporting President Trump and the 2nd Amendment.

The president took to Twitter Sunday morning to criticize the special counsel's investigation into Russian meddling in the 2016 U.S. presidential election and potential Trump campaign collusion.
"Why does the Mueller team have 13 hardened Democrats, some big Crooked Hillary supporters, and Zero Republicans?" Mr. Trump tweeted at 8:35 a.m. ET. "Another Dem recently added...does anyone think this is fair? And yet, there is NO COLLUSION!"
Mueller is a Republican, and was named director of the FBI by Republican President George W. Bush. Mueller's investigation is overseen by Rod Rosenstein, the deputy attorney general Mr. Trump nominated himself.
The president has long believed that Mueller's Russia investigation is a partisan effort from Democrats to tarnish his presidency. He's called the probe both a "witch hunt" and a "hoax." Fueling Mr. Trump's aggravation now is the special counsel's latest inquiry: a subpoena to the Trump Organization.

Facebook critics are questioning the social media giant's commitment to transparency and digital ethics after a political intelligence firm under scrutiny from federal investigators allegedly exploited access to up to 50 million personal profiles.
The episode marks another blow to Facebook's reputation during a period of growing scrutiny over Russian use of the platform to interfere in American politics.
"Facebook has been on trial in the past 12 months in the court of public opinion," said Stephen Hahn-Griffiths, chief research officer at the Reputation Institute, which assesses public attitudes. "'Can I still trust Facebook?' is the question the general public is asking themselves."
Massachusetts Attorney General Maura Healey said she would launch an investigation because "residents deserve answers immediately."
British politician Damian Collins said Facebook had been "misleading" and "deliberately avoided answering straight questions" during an ongoing investigation. He said he's asking Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg or another leading executive to testify to provide answers.
Facebook confirmed Friday that Strategic Communication Laboratories-owned Cambridge Analytica had obtained profiles accessed by another developer, which had properly gotten them when users signed up for a personality prediction app called "thisisyourdigitallife."

Russian President Vladimir Putin is dismissing British accusations of Russia's involvement in an ex-spy's poisoning as "nonsense," adding that Moscow is ready to cooperate with London in the probe.
Putin on Sunday referred to the attack on ex-spy Sergei Skripal and his daughter as a "tragedy," but added that if the British claim that they were poisoned by the Soviet-designed nerve agent were true, the victims would have died instantly.
He said that it's "nonsense" to think that anyone in Russia could have staged such an attack shortly before Sunday's presidential vote and before the World Cup that Russia is set to host this summer.
In his first comments about the poisoning, the Russian leader said that Moscow was ready to cooperate with Britain in the investigation.

School officials had previously recommended accused Florida gunman Nikolas Cruz should be institutionalized but never acted upon it before the massacre that killed 17 people last month, documents say.
Ex-Broward County Sheriff’s Deputy Scot Peterson and two school counselors recommended in September 2016 that the 19-year-old Cruz should forcibly undergo a mental health evaluation under Florida’s Baker Act, documents obtained by the Associated Press show.
Peterson, a resource officer, resigned from the sheriff’s department after it was revealed he stood outside Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School and did nothing to stop when Cruz killed 17 people on Feb. 14.
If Cruz had been committed under the Baker Act, it would have made it difficult for him to buy a gun legally. Individuals are subjected to involuntary commitment under the law.
The documents, provided by Henderson Behavioral Health, do not show why Cruz was never committed. The Baker Act gave Peterson the authority to give such recommendation.
Ex-Broward County Sheriff’s Deputy Scot Peterson and two school counselors recommended in September 2016 that the 19-year-old Cruz should forcibly undergo a mental health evaluation under Florida’s Baker Act, documents obtained by the Associated Press show.

When the Kushner Cos. bought three apartment buildings in a gentrifying neighborhood of Queens in 2015, most of the tenants were protected by special rules that prevent developers from pushing them out, raising rents and turning a tidy profit.
But that's exactly what the company then run by Jared Kushner did, and with remarkable speed. Two years later, it sold all three buildings for $60 million, nearly 50 percent more than it paid.
Now a clue has emerged as to how President Donald Trump's son-in-law's firm was able to move so fast: The Kushner Cos. routinely filed false paperwork with the city declaring it had zero rent-regulated tenants in dozens of buildings it owned across the city when, in fact, it had hundreds.
While none of the documents during a three-year period when Kushner was CEO bore his personal signature, they provide a window into the ethics of the business empire he ran before he went on to become one of the most trusted advisers to the president of the United States.

The record-shattering jackpot was split three ways by Mae and Marvin Acosta from Chino Hills, California; John and Lisa Robinson of Munford, Tennessee; and Maureen Smith, a 70-year-old from Melbourne Beach, Florida.
The Robinsons appeared on NBC's "Today" show before cashing in their ticket. They opted to take their $528.8 million share of the prize in one lump-sum payment of $327.8 million. (Jackpot prize amounts are the annuity jackpots paid out over 30 payments, even though almost all winners chose to take a lesser lump sum of cash).
Smith told the Florida Lottery that she had played the lottery -- and bought tickets with the same six numbers -- for years before winning the jackpot.
The Acostas refused to speak to the media. They assembled a team of advisers and waited six months before claiming the prize.

A Russian ex-spy and his daughter may have been exposed to the deadly nerve agent that nearly killed them through his car’s ventilation system, according to a report Sunday.
Former double agent Sergei Skripal and his daughter, Yulia, are still struggling to live after being poisoned with Russian-produced Novichok in Salisbury two weeks ago.
ABC News reported that U.K. officials believe that the toxin was used in a dust-like powdered form and that it circulated through the vents of Skripal’s BMW.
Three intelligence officials said that the Russian military origin and the nature of the “dusty” substance are clear to them, according to the station.
“It is a Cold War substance, something they claimed never to have,” one senior intelligence official told ABC News, referring to Russia.

Turkish-backed Syrian rebels seized control on Sunday morning of the city of Afrin, the target of a two-month military operation against Kurdish militias in the enclave in Syria. The takeover dealt a blow to Kurdish aspirations for self-administration there and added to Turkey’s growing footprint in the country.
The Syrian rebel forces, which have served as advance troops for the Turkish operation, seemed to have entered the city without a fight, after the Kurdish People’s Protection Units, or Y.P.G., withdrew to the surrounding hills. But residents described chaos as fleeing civilians were trapped by artillery and by Turkish airstrikes.
The seizure of Afrin, a mainly Kurdish city near the Turkish border, came as other Syrian rebel groups appeared close to collapse in the besieged enclave of eastern Ghouta, in the suburbs of Damascus. Syrian forces have split the enclave into three parts under a blistering barrage of artillery and airstrikes.

A man approximately 30-year-old was seriously wounded in Jerusalem's Old City on Sunday afternoon after being stabbed multiple times in what security forces confirmed was a terror attack.
The victim was evacuated to Shaare Zedek Medical Center in Jerusalem where he was said to be in life-threatening danger.
The 28-year-old terrorist, Abd al-Rahman Bani Fadel, who was later confirmed to be a Palestinian from the village of Aqraba near Nablus, was promptly neutralized by a police officer at the scene and pronounced dead.
Fadel, a father of two, had a temporary permit for a week that allowed him to enter Israel to search for employment. He had already received such permits in the past, as there was no indication of his terrorist intentions.
A report on Channel 10 television said Turkish identity papers were found on the body of the terrorist. who carried out his attack on HaGai Street.
“He was fully conscious and didn’t answer any questions when we got to him. He had suffered from serious wounds to his chest and stomach,” said one MDA 

A senior North Korean diplomat left for Finland on Sunday for talks with former U.S. and South Korean officials, Yonhap News Agency reported, amid a series of diplomatic encounters ahead of a possible U.S.-North Korean summit.
North Korea is pursuing its nuclear and missile programmes in defiance of U.N. Security Council sanctions and has made no secret of its plans to develop a missile capable of hitting the U.S. mainland.
It defends the programmes as a necessary deterrent against a possible U.S. invasion. The United States stations 28,500 troops in South Korea but denies any invasion plans.
Tensions have eased in recent weeks, coinciding with North Korea’s participation in the Winter Olympics held in the South last month.
Choe Kang Il, a deputy director general for North American affairs at North Korea’s foreign ministry, plans to attend the “track 1.5 talks”, according to Yonhap, reflecting planned contact between former U.S. officials and current North Korean ones in a broader bid to end the standoff over North Korea’s weapons programmes.

President Trump made clear early Saturday that he viewed Attorney General Jeff Sessions' decision to fire former FBI Deputy Director Andrew McCabe as a “great day for Democracy.”
“Andrew McCabe FIRED, a great day for the hardworking men and women of the FBI — a great day for Democracy!” Trump wrote on Twitter, before deriding former FBI Director James Comey, who Trump fired in May 2017.
Trump's ire did not stop there. After reports on Saturday night revealed that McCabe kept notes of his meetings with Trump, the president dismissed the claim on Twitter and took another shot at Comey.
Comey responded to Trump's earlier allegations via a tweet on Saturday night, saying he would soon share his story and the public "can judge for themselves who is honorable and who is not."
The former FBI director has a forthcoming book called "A Higher Loyalty: Truth, Lies, and Leadership." Set for release on April 17, the book on Sunday had was No. 1 on Amazon's best sellers list based on pre-orders.

A Pennsylvania teenager who was missing for almost two weeks along with the 45-year-old man who frequently signed her out of school without her parents' permission was returned home and the man was in custody after the two were found in Mexico, authorities said.
Federal agents and Mexican authorities found 16-year-old Amy Yu and Kevin Esterly in Playa del Carmen on Saturday and they were flown to Miami, authorities said. Police said the girl, who was in good health, arrived on Sunday in Philadelphia and was taken home to Allentown, 60 miles (97 kilometers) northwest of the city. Esterly was awaiting processing in Miami. The married father of four will face a charge of child custody interference when he arrives in Pennsylvania.
The girl's mother, Miu Luu, told The (Allentown) Morning Call that she cried from relief after being told that the pair had been located.
"For two weeks, I've had trouble sleeping and eating," Luu told the paper. "I'm very happy."
They had been missing since March 5, when local police said they bought one-way tickets from Philadelphia to Dallas and then headed to Cancun. Police said they believed the teen went willingly with Esterly, who signed her out of school 10 times in the last few months. The girl had altered her student records to list Esterly as her stepfather, said Gary Hammer, of the Colonial Regional Police Department. Mexican authorities issued an Amber Alert in the case on Thursday.

Another explosion rocked Austin overnight, injuring two people and heightening concerns for investigators who believe the latest blast may have been triggered by a tripwire.
Last night's detonation came hours after Austin Police Chief Brian Manley urged the suspect or suspects in the string of bombings to turn themselves in and more than doubled the reward for information leading to an arrest to $115,000.
In an interview this morning on ABC's "Good Morning America," Manley said Sunday night's bombing "has a little bit of a different characteristic" from the three previous detonations that killed two people and injured two others.
"There was a description that we may be dealing with a tripwire on this explosive and so out of an abundance of caution we've locked the neighborhood down to keep everybody safe and we're going to go in at sun up this morning and begin processing the post-blast scene," Manley told "ABC World News Tonight" anchor David Muir.
"We do believe, based on what we've seen, that this was a bomb," Manley said at a news conference overnight.
According to St. David’s South Austin Medical Center, the two victims were taken there for treatment and are in good condition.

James B. Comey’s memoir surged to the top of Amazon’s bestseller list over the weekend after President Trump attacked the former FBI director in a string of angry tweets — and the book isn’t even published yet.
“A Higher Loyalty: Truth, Lies, and Leadership,” due for release on April 17, had already been hovering in the top 20 in the months since going up for preorder. But it got an unexpected bump when Trump lashed out at Comey, jumping from No. 15 on Saturday morning to No. 1 by Sunday evening.
Trump’s decision to fire Comey last May reemerged in the news after Attorney General Jeff Sessions fired FBI Deputy Director Andrew McCabe Friday night shortly before McCabe’s planned retirement.
Trump tweeted his satisfaction with the move, accusing “Sanctimonious James Comey” of covering up “lies and corruption” in the FBI and leaking information to the media. He also blasted special counsel Robert S. Mueller III’s probe of Russian interference in the 2016 election, which was triggered by Comey’s ouster, saying there should never have been an investigation. (The Washington Post’s Glenn Kessler has given a detailed breakdown of inaccuracies and misleading statements in Trump’s weekend tweetstorm, which also targeted other officials.)

Britain agreed to a potentially unpalatable deal to avoid a “hard border” for Northern Ireland on Monday to win agreement from the European Union that it would retain most EU benefits for nearly two years after Brexit.
Britain's Secretary of State for Exiting the European Union David Davis and European Union's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier address a joint news conference in Brussels, Belgium March 19, 2018.
After a weekend of intensive talks under the shadow of Irish fears of “backsliding” by London on a “backstop” accord that Prime Minister Theresa May had rejected, the two sides issued a new, 129-page draft treaty that was awash with green highlighter denoting final agreement on large areas of the legal text.
Michel Barnier, the EU’s chief negotiator, told a news conference with Brexit Secretary David Davis that none of this is legally binding until a whole treaty is ratified before Brexit a year from now. However, he described the agreements as a “decisive” moment for efforts to avoid Britain crashing out without a deal.
“A decisive step remains a step; we are not at the end of the road and there still remains a lot of work to be done, including on Ireland and Northern Ireland,” Barnier cautioned.

A large storm system is moving through the Great Plains on Monday morning bringing unsettled weather from the Dakotas all the way to the southeastern United States.
Yesterday, more than three dozen damaging storm reports were made, most of them in east-central Texas where hail was larger than a baseball. There were also two reported tornadoes in the Texas panhandle and winds of 60 mph or greater in eastern Texas.
On the northern side of the storm, heavy snow fell around Denver, with anywhere from 5 to 10 inches overnight in the metro area.
The storm system is moving east Monday, and is now stretching from the Northern Plains to the Gulf Coast. To the north, snow is falling in the Dakotas while tornado warnings have been issued for part of the Florida panhandle.
The storm system will move further east Monday afternoon, and will pick up moisture from the Gulf of Mexico. Severe storms will break out from Jacksonville, Florida, to Atlanta; Birmingham, Alabama; and into Nashville, Tennessee.
The biggest threat will be huge damaging hail, tornadoes and wind. Flash flooding is also possible.
The biggest threat for tornadoes will be from Nashville to Birmingham and just west of Atlanta this afternoon and evening.

Lawmakers in the U.S. and Britain want Mark Zuckerberg to explain how Cambridge Analytica, the political data firm founded by Steve Bannon and Robert Mercer, harvested private information from over 50 million user profiles.
“It’s clear these platforms can’t police themselves,” tweeted Senator Amy Klobuchar, a Democratic member of the Senate Judiciary Committee.
Shares of Facebook are down 5.4 percent Monday morning. The slide wiped more than $28 billion off of Facebook’s market value.
“We think this episode is another indication of systemic problems at Facebook,” said Brian Wieser, an analyst at New York-based brokerage Pivotal Research Group.
What happened: The NYT and The Observer of London reported how Cambridge had collected data from an outside researcher to better target Facebook users. Christopher Wylie, who oversaw Cambridge’s data collection until 2014, told the NYT of his former company, “For them, this is a war, and it’s all fair.”

A Washington, D.C. councilman—and now failed meteorologist—has apologized for pushing a wild conspiracy theory that the recent snowfall in the capital was caused by the Rothschild banking dynasty. As snow began to fall in the city on Friday, Trayon White Sr., a member of the district’s legislative branch, posted a Facebook video in which he insisted the family of Jewish billionaires—and magnet for anti-Semitic conspiracy theories—was intentionally controlling the climate to gain greater control of U.S. cities. “Man, it just started snowing out of nowhere this morning, man. Y’all better pay attention to this climate control, man, this climate manipulation,” White narrated on the video. “And D.C. keep talking about, ‘We a resilient city.’ And that’s a model based off the Rothschilds controlling the climate to create natural disasters they can pay for to own the cities, man. Be careful.” After initially defending his commentary, White later apologized, telling The Washington Post: “I work hard every day to combat racism and prejudices of all kinds. I want to apologize to the Jewish community and anyone I have offended,” he said. “The Jewish community have been allies with me in my journey to help people. I did not intend to be anti-Semitic, and I see I should not have said that after learning from my colleagues.”

President Vladimir Putin says Russia has spent enough on new weapons to avoid any excessive pressure on the economy in the future.
Speaking to his rivals in Sunday's presidential election that he won by a landslide, Putin promised to focus on domestic issues and raise living standards during his next six-year term.
He vowed Monday not to engage in an arms race, saying that Russia has already spent the bulk of what is needed to create new weapons in previous years. He added that while "we need to finalize some things" it will not involve massive spending and the nation's defense budget will actually decrease this year and in 2019.
Earlier this month, Putin unveiled an array of new nuclear weapons that he said are impossible to intercept.

Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan says that after victory in Syria’s Afrin region, his country will expand its military operations into other Kurdish-held areas in Syria as well as to Iraq’s Sinjar region.
Speaking at a ceremony for judicial appointments in Ankara, Erdogan said troops would target the Syrian city of Manbij, as well as Ayn al-Arab, also known as Kobani, and other towns along the border to the east of the Euphrates River. Those areas are controlled by U.S.-backed Syrian Kurdish forces and U.S. troops are stationed there.
Erdogan said Turkish troops could also cross into Iraq to drive out Kurdish militants from the region of Sinjar, if the Iraqi government is reluctant to oust militants from the area. Turkey says the region is becoming a headquarters for outlawed Kurdish rebels who have been fighting an insurgency in Turkey’s southeast since 1984.
Erdogan said “one night, we could suddenly enter Sinjar.”
He insisted Turkey had no intention of “invading” Syria, saying it was merely clearing the border area of terrorists.

Britain has evidence that Russia has been stockpiling and creating a deadly nerve agent used in the poisoning of a former Russian spy for the last 10 years, the foreign secretary Boris Johnson has said.
Speaking on The Andrew Marr Show on Sunday, he said: "We actually have evidence within the last 10 years, Russia has not only been investigating the delivery of nerve agents for the purposes of assassinations but has also been creating and stockpiling Novichok."
A statement from the Foreign Office released after Johnson's television appearance said that if the evidence was correct, it amounted to "a violation of the Chemical Weapons Convention".
Speaking on Monday, Johnson went on to say Russian denials of involvement in the attack were growing "increasingly absurd".
However, shortly after winning a new term in a presidential election, Russian president Vladimir Putin denied Moscow's involvement.

China should and will take military action if the U.S. decides to press ahead with legislation designed to encourage high-level contact with Taiwanese officials, according to a report by state media outlet The Global Times.
The legislation, known as the Taiwan Travel Act, came into effect Friday after President Donald Trump signed the bill. China was reportedly angered by the move, as it has long-viewed the self-ruled island as a wayward province.
President Donald Trump and Chinese President Xi Jinping (R) arrive prior to a meeting on the sidelines of the G20 Summit in Hamburg, Germany, July 8, 2017.
The Global Times, considered a provocative but widely-read mouthpiece for Beijing, quoted Chinese observers who said the country would have no choice but to respond with "counter moves" if the U.S. were to make any moves to elevate its relations with the island. Liu Weidong, a research fellow at the Institute of American Studies of Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, said the Chinese army would resume its military probes circling the island and send more military vessels and airplanes if any "Taiwan independence" secessionist forces perceive the U.S bill as a pro-independence signal.
The U.S. legislation comes at a time when Trump has recently imposed trade tariffs, has urged China to reduce its massive trade imbalance with the U.S. and has frequently called on Beijing to help resolve tensions with North Korea.

It's now clear that the pedestrian bridge at Florida International University collapsed and killed six people after engineers put it through some kind of "stress testing" earlier in the day. According to Sen. Marco Rubio, the bridge's internal support cables were being "tightened" just as the bridge crumbled onto traffic below, crushing eight cars under 950 tons of concrete and steel.
But no one has yet explained why cars were allowed to drive freely under an incomplete bridge while workers were testing to see if it might fall apart. Now, some local officials are demanding answers.
Miami-Dade County Commissioner Xavier Suarez, who has a background in civil engineering, said he was flabbergasted that SW Eighth Street was not shut down to traffic before or during any stress tests or cable adjustments on the unfinished project.
"Never in my life have I heard of that," Suarez said. "That makes no sense. That makes no sense."

A real-estate venture formerly run by Jared Kushner falsified construction permits for dozens of apartment buildings it owned in New York City, allowing the company to push out rent-controlled tenants and boost profits when it later sold the properties, according to a report by The Associated Press.
In the AP exclusive, the news agency, working with Housing Rights Initiative, uncovered at least 80 such applications for construction in 34 buildings across New York City from 2013 to 2016.
According to the news agency, "the Kushner Cos. checked a box on construction permit applications in 2015 that indicated the buildings had zero rent-regulated tenants." However, "Tax records filed a few months later showed the company inherited as many as 94 rent-regulated units from the previous owner," AP said.
Properties with rent-controlled apartments are subject to greater oversight for construction permits and "possibly unscheduled 'sweeps' on site by inspectors to keep the company from harassing tenants and getting them to leave," the news agency reports.
Bloomberg reports that while Kushner divested some of his assets when he joined the White House, his stakes in three Astoria, Queens, properties that are the focus of the AP report were not among them.
Two students were critically injured and a gunman died in a shooting at Great Mills High School in Southern Maryland Tuesday morning as classes began, according to the Saint Mary’s County Sheriff’s Office.
The gunman who was a student at the school 70 miles south of Washington, D.C. opened fire in a hallway shortly before classes began around 8 a.m., striking a female and male student, said Sheriff Timothy K. Cameron.
Students and staff quickly notified an armed school resource officer, who pursued the shooter and fired a single shot at him, Cameron said at a press conference around 11:30 a.m. The shooter fired back.
The shooter and the two students were rushed to local hospitals in critical condition. The shooter, who was not identified, was pronounced dead at 10:41 a.m., Cameron said.
“On this day, we realized our worst nightmare,” Cameron said. “Our children were attacked in a bastion of safety...The notion that it can’t happen here is no longer a notion.”

A package that exploded early Tuesday at a FedEx center near San Antonio was being looked at by officials involved in the investigation into a series of deadly explosions in Austin, Tex.
The latest explosion, in Schertz, Tex., occurred at about 12:30 a.m. local time, and injured one employee, who was not seriously hurt, local law enforcement officials said. The F.B.I. and the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, or A.T.F., joined local agencies at the scene.
A law enforcement official said that the package was addressed to Austin and was believed to be connected to the other packages under investigation. It contained shrapnel like the other packages, the official said.
The police in Schertz said that the package had been in the sorting area of the facility and that one person was treated at the scene and released. FedEx said that the package had exploded in one of its ground sorting facilities and that the person who was treated was one of its employees.

Winter Storm Toby will spread yet another swath of snow, not to mention wind and coastal flooding, into the East through Thursday, the fourth nor'easter in less than three weeks and potentially one of the heaviest snowstorms this late in the season along parts of the I-95 corridor.
Rain quickly changed to snow by late Tuesday morning not only in the central Appalachians, but also in lower elevations of the mid-Atlantic states.
Parts of western Virginia, eastern West Virginia and western Maryland already have picked up 2 to 4 inches of wet snowfall, so far. Ridgeley, Maryland, just outside of the city of Cumberland, picked up almost 6 inches of snow as of late Tuesday morning.
Moderate to heavy snow was reported at Frederick and Hagerstown, Maryland, and the first flakes of snow have now fallen at Philadelphia and Wilmington, Delaware.
Winter storm warnings, where snowfall is expected to be heaviest, extend from eastern Massachusetts to the Smoky Mountains of Tennessee and North Carolina, including the cities of Boston, Providence, Hartford, virtually the entire New York City Tri-State area and Philadelphia. 

President Trump shook up his legal team Monday by hiring a combative former prosecutor who has publicly argued that Trump is the target of an elaborate FBI conspiracy — marking another confrontational move by the president against the rapidly mounting legal threats facing him and his administration.
Joe diGenova, a TV pundit and former U.S. attorney who was a longtime antagonist of Bill and Hillary Clinton, is the latest addition to the sprawling array of lawyers assembled to represent Trump on two main fronts: in the probe of Russian interference in the 2016 presidential election and in the case of an adult film star who claims an adulterous affair.
The hiring caught many of his advisers by surprise, prompting fears that Trump is preparing for bigger changes to his legal team — including possible departures — as he goes on the offensive in the primary legal challenges facing him.
Trump is not consulting with top advisers, including Chief of Staff John F. Kelly and chief White House lawyer Donald McGahn, on his Russia legal choices or his comments about the probe, according to one person with knowledge of his actions, who spoke on the condition of anonymity to describe sensitive conversations. He is instead watching television and calling friends, this person said.

At 32 years old, Saudi Arabia's Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman is already the most dominant Arab leader in a generation. This week, he embarks on a cross-country American tour, where he'll pitch his kingdom to a skeptical U.S. public. He was named heir to the throne nine months ago by his 82-year-old father, King Salman, who granted his son vast new powers. 
Known by his initials -- "M-B-S" -- his reforms inside Saudi Arabia have been revolutionary. He is emancipating women, introducing music and cinema and cracking down on corruption, in a land with 15,000 princes. But selling Saudi Arabia won't be easy. In his first interview with an American television network, he was eager to discuss his country's promise and its troubled reputation head-on.

Two weeks ago, Britain was shocked when a former Russian spy, Sergei Skripal, was poisoned with Novichok, an extremely toxic Russian nerve agent, in Salisbury, England. The military-grade type of nerve agent suggests that the Russian government was linked to the poisoning.
British Prime Minister Theresa May asserts that the Kremlin is “highly likely” to have been behind the poisoning. If so, Russian President Vladimir Putin almost certainly sanctioned the attack directly. But why would the Kremlin commit such a dangerous crime right before Russia’s presidential election, while its relationships with Western countries are collapsing?
Several theories have emerged to explain Moscow’s actions. Here’s a summary of available theories, which also involves my research on Russian and Soviet disinformation techniques.
Russian security may have used Novichok in the past without being discovered. Skripal and his daughter were found unresponsive but alive on a park bench. But Novichok is an unusual chemical, not something for which a morgue would ordinarily test. Had only Skripal been targeted, and had he received a higher dose, he could be dead — as if from a sudden heart attack or other natural causes. 

The world's last surviving male northern white rhino has died after months of poor health, his carers say.
Sudan, who was 45, lived at the Ol Pejeta Conservancy in Kenya. He was put to sleep on Monday after age-related complications worsened significantly.
His death leaves only two females - his daughter and granddaughter - of the subspecies alive in the world.
Hope for preserving the northern white rhino now lies in developing in vitro fertilisation (IVF) techniques.
"His death is a cruel symbol of human disregard for nature and it saddened everyone who knew him," said Jan Stejskal, an official at Dvur Kralove Zoo in the Czech Republic, where Sudan had lived until 2009.
"But we should not give up," he added in quotes carried by AFP news agency.
"We must take advantage of the unique situation in which cellular technologies are utilised for conservation of critically endangered species. It may sound unbelievable, but thanks to the newly developed techniques even Sudan could still have an offspring."

Former French president Nicolas Sarkozy was taken into police custody early Tuesday over allegations that he illegally accepted 50 million euros ($68.5 million) from the government of the late Libyan leader Moammar Gaddafi to finance his successful 2007 presidential campaign.
The detention of Sarkozy — France’s president between 2007 and 2012 — represented a major development in what is now likely to become an explosive political scandal. For years, Sarkozy denied allegations that he took money from Gaddafi, and Tuesday marked the first time that authorities have questioned the former president.
If the allegations are true, it would mean that Sarkozy knowingly violated France’s campaign finance laws, which in 2007 capped campaign funding at 21 million euros ($28.8 million).
Under French law, authorities can hold a suspect in custody for up to 48 hours, at which point they must decide whether there are sufficient grounds to launch a formal investigation.

The Karachi Port Trust (KPT) has ordered an investigation into the crash, which resulted in the suspension of container transport for several hours, Pakistani newspaper The News International reported.
The video shows the 8,000-container Tolten ship, operated by the Hapag-Lloyd company, scraping along the side of a 6,350-container, Hamburg Bay, operated by Eastern Pacific Shipping sending multiple crushed and torn containers into the water.
The video was taken by a port worker and quickly gained traction on social media.
According to The Frontier Post, port authorities said, “Approximately 55-60 containers from the ships fell into the sea.” Two berths were also damaged in the accident. There are no reports of casualties.
In the video, containers could be seen sinking or floating in the port as workers look on in shock.
The collision happened at the South Asia Port Terminal, which is one of South Asia’s busiest seaports. The Post quoted KPT spokesman Shariq Farooqui as saying that the accident happened at the port’s commercial terminal, which is operated by private party.

House Speaker Paul Ryan said Tuesday he's received "assurances" that special counsel Robert Mueller will not be dismissed by President Donald Trump, adding that he is confident Mueller's probe into Russian election meddling will be carried out to its completion unimpeded.
“Special counsel should be free to follow through his investigation to its completion without interference, absolutely," Ryan told reporters during a press conference on Capitol Hill. "I am confident he will be able to do that."
Ryan added: "I have received assurances that his firing is not even under consideration.”
The House speaker did not specify who had assured him that Mueller's standing was safe.
Despite calls from congressional leaders for the White House not to step in and interfere with Mueller's probe, Trump ordered the firing of the special counsel last year but backed off after facing pressure from his top attorney, a person familiar with the matter told POLITICO in January.
Trump called reports he ordered Mueller fired "fake news." White House officials have publicly denied Trump has considered firing Mueller.
The president over the weekend for the first time singled out Mueller's team by name in criticizing the Russia investigation. "The Mueller probe should never have been started in that there was no collusion and there was no crime," Trump tweeted Saturday.

The Minneapolis police officer who mistakenly shot and killed an Australian woman in July was behind bars Tuesday and charged with third-degree murder.
Officer Mohamed Noor was also charged with second-degree manslaughter in connection with the death of Justine Ruszczyk Damond, according to records from the Hennepin County Jail.
It was not clear whether Noor turned himself in or was arrested on a warrant, but Hennepin County Attorney Mike Freeman was expected to reveal more details later Tuesday.
Freeman had previously said they did not have probable cause to charge Noor for fatally shooting the 40-year-old expat after she called 911 to report a possible sexual assault in the alley behind her home.
"I have to prove, beyond a reasonable doubt, the moment he shot the gun he feared for his life, and he used force because he thought he was gonna be killed,” Freeman told activists in a videotaped exchange. “But he won’t answer my questions, because he doesn't have to, OK? We all have Fifth Amendment rights, and I respect that."

The suspect in the spate of bombings in Austin, Texas is dead, Austin police say. Police Chief Brian Manley told reporters early Wednesday the man detonated a device in his vehicle after being pursued by police early Wednesday morning.
Two law enforcement sources identified the suspect to CBS News as 23-year-old Mark Anthony Conditt.  A federal law enforcement source tells CBS News that there are about 12 ATF explosives detection K9 teams doing sweeps at locations connected to the bombings Wednesday.
Manley said the suspect's identity wouldn't be officially released until the medical examiner confirmed it and his next of kin are notified. Manley said authorities are still searching for a motive.
Governor Greg Abbott, speaking to local television station KXAN, said investigators knew who the suspect was for about 24 hours before his arrest and had been following him.
"We knew we were going to be able to apprehend him, we just didn't know when," Abbott said.
He said witnesses spotted a person entering a FedEx store wearing a "crazy" disguise, including a blond wig and gloves, and called police. KEYE obtained pictures from surveillance video taken inside a South Austin FedEx Office store Sunday night, where the person shipped two suspicious packages.

On Tuesday morning, Facebook employees were quiet even for Facebook employees, buried in the news on their phones as they shuffled to a meeting in one of the largest cafeterias at the company’s headquarters in Menlo Park, Calif. Mark Zuckerberg, their chief executive officer, had always told them Facebook Inc.’s growth was good for the world. Sheryl Sandberg, their chief operating officer, had preached the importance of openness. Neither appeared in the cafeteria on Tuesday. Instead, the company sent a lawyer.
The context: Reports in the New York Times and the Observer the previous weekend that Cambridge Analytica, the political consulting firm that advised President Trump’s electoral campaign on digital advertising, had effectively stolen personal information from at least 50 million Americans. The data had come from Facebook, which had allowed an outside developer to take it before that developer shared it with Cambridge Analytica.
Facebook tried to get ahead of the story, announcing in a blog post that it was suspending the right-leaning consultancy and that it no longer allowed this kind of data sharing. Its users—a cohort that includes 2 billion or so people—weren’t ready to forgive. The phrase #DeleteFacebook flooded social media. (Among the outraged was WhatsApp co-founder Brian Acton, who in 2014 sold Facebook his messaging app for $19 billion.) Regulators in the U.S. and Europe announced they were opening inquiries. The company’s stock fell almost 9 percent from March 19-20, erasing about $50 billion of value.

China is preparing to hit back at trade offensives from Washington with tariffs aimed at President Donald Trump’s support base, including levies targeting U.S. agricultural exports from Farm Belt states, according to people familiar with the matter.
The plans are part of a strategy that has taken shape in recent weeks as China seeks to avert tariffs by warning of possible repercussions and offering incentives to the U.S., including better access to China’s markets, especially in the financial sector.
China’s President Xi Jinping has taken this carrot-and-stick approach in an effort to avoid a trade war, these people said.
“Any Chinese response to new U.S. tariffs would be measured and proportional,” said a Chinese official involved in policy-making.
The White House plans to announce punitive measures against China on Thursday, including tariffs on at least $30 billion in imports. Those are in addition to the steel and aluminum tariffs taking effect Friday.

The foreign secretary has agreed that President Putin is using the World Cup in Russia as a "PR exercise" akin to how Hitler used the 1936 Olympics.
Labour MP Ian Austin put it to Boris Johnson that the Russian president wanted to "gloss over [his] brutal corrupt regime".
Mr Johnson replied: "I'm afraid that's completely right, completely right."
He added that he would have an "urgent conversation" with Russia about the safety of fans at the tournament.
The foreign secretary said it was of "crucial importance" in light of 23 British diplomats being expelled from Russia - including the individual responsible for football fans.
The exchange came as the Foreign Affairs Select Committee discussed the Salisbury spy attack.
Sergei Skripal and his daughter Yulia remain in a critical condition in hospital after being poisoned with the Russian nerve agent Novichok.
The former military intelligence officer and his daughter were found slumped on a bench and unconscious on 4 March.

Spring may have sprung on the calendar, but it's still winter on the East Coast. The first round of snow fell late Tuesday from the Washington, D.C., area north. But the real storm will start to hit around 8 a.m. in the Washington area and then move into the Philadelphia area between 10 a.m. and noon and into New York City between noon and 3 p.m.
CBS News weather producer David Parkinson says it's going to be wet, heavy snow, but there will be a cutoff north of the Interstate 95 corridor, and the major cities could be spared the worst. Parkinson estimates New York City and Washington could get around 3 inches of snow and Philadelphia could see 6 inches. But the Washington suburbs could get 6-12 inches as could the New York and Philadelphia suburbs.
Boston, already battered by the previous nor'easters, will still be dealing with snow Thursday morning. The city could expect anywhere from 3-6 inches with Massachusetts' south shore and Rhode Island getting an estimated 6-12 inches.
The executive director of the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey says air travel in the New York City area will be "severely, severely affected by this storm."

The National Weather Service has issued a flood advisory for southern Santa Barbara and western Ventura counties in California as a strong Pacific storm moves through.
The weather service says rainfall rates with a band of rain at midmorning Wednesday have been close to a half-inch (1.14 centimeters) an hour and recent wildfire burn areas will likely experience mud and debris flows.
During a January storm, Montecito on the south coast of Santa Barbara County was devastated by massive debris flows that killed 21 people and left two others missing.
Rain from a powerful Pacific storm is falling across areas of central and southern California at risk of mudslides but there are no reports of problems like significant flooding or debris flows.

Israelis awoke early Wednesday to blaring headlines and dramatic video of Israeli warplanes destroying a reactor in Syria that could have produced nuclear weapons fuel, in an audacious covert operation code-named Outside the Box.
But it was like waking in a time warp. The attack on the reactor, which was supplied to Syria by North Korea, took place more than a decade ago — around 2 a.m. on Sept. 6, 2007.
Accounts of the strike appeared long ago in international news media, and former President George W. Bush wrote of it in his memoir published in 2010. But Israel had barred the Israeli media from reporting on it until now, though news organizations had fought for years to have the ban lifted.
The censorship was originally meant to allow Israeli and Syrian deniability, avoiding the kind of blatant humiliation that might push the Syrian leader, President Bashar al-Assad, into retaliating.

Boko Haram Islamic extremists brought back nearly all of the 110 girls they had kidnapped from a boarding school last month, dropping them off in the middle of the night Wednesday with a warning: "Don't ever put your daughters in school again."
Several of the girls interviewed by The Associated Press said they had been traveling for days before the convoy of vehicles arrived in the center of the town of Dapchi around 2 a.m. Residents who had fled upon hearing that Boko Haram was headed their way watched from hiding as dozens of girls descended from the vehicles apparently unharmed.
"We were freed because we are Muslim girls and they didn't want us to suffer. That is why they released us," said Khadija Grema, one of the freed girls who said a Christian classmate remained captive.
The extraordinary development brought elation to most of the families, but more heartache for the relatives of the nine girls still unaccounted for. The sister of one of the girls still being held captive fainted Wednesday upon hearing news that she was not among those freed.

Mark Meechan stared at the camera and described the training he had given to his girlfriend’s pug, Buddha.
“My girlfriend is always ranting and raving about how cute and adorable her wee dog is,” he said in his Scottish brogue. “And so I thought I would turn him into the least cute thing I could think of, which is a Nazi.”
Then Meechan asked the dog the same question, again and again: “Buddha, do you want to gas the Jews?”
For nearly two years, the video, which includes a scene of a pug staring obediently at a speech by Adolf Hitler, has raised questions about the murky line between offensive satire and hate speech that normalizes Nazism.
The Nazi pug video has been blasted by outraged Jewish leaders and defended by satirists who likened Meechan’s prosecution to censorship in the George Orwell novel “1984.”

President Trump announced two weeks ago that he would hold an unprecedented summit with North Korean leader Kim Jong Un. On Tuesday, Trump reminded us just how awry that meeting could go.
The Washington Post is reporting that Trump was given key talking points for his call with Russian President Vladimir Putin on Tuesday and that he disregarded just about all of them. He was not supposed to congratulate Putin on his allegedly unfair and undemocratic reelection win — his notes even had “DO NOT CONGRATULATE” in all caps — and yet he did. And he was supposed to condemn Russia’s alleged role in the nerve-agent attack on a former Russian spy in Britain, and yet he did not.
The episode crystallizes Trump’s tendency to eschew basically any expert guidance — even on issues of huge import. That certainly has implications for U.S. relations with Russia and for efforts to combat Russian interference in U.S. elections. On the latter, Trump has declined to take a harsh tone and has even suggested that he believes Putin’s denials. But, more immediately, it has huge implications for Trump’s impending meeting with Kim.

A military analyst for Fox News said Tuesday that he was quitting the network because he believed it had turned into a propaganda machine for President Donald Trump's administration.
Ralph Peters, a retired U.S. Army officer, said he told Fox at the beginning of the month that he did not want his contributor contract renewed.
"Over my decade at Fox, I was long proud of the association," Peters wrote in an email that was distributed to colleagues at Fox News, and first reported by BuzzFeed News. "Now I am ashamed."
Fox said in a statement that the network did not want attributed to a specific spokesperson that Peters was entitled to his opinion, "despite the fact that he's choosing to use it as a weapon in order to get attention." Fox said it was proud of its opinion programming and prime-time hosts.
Peters said he believed Fox had "degenerated from providing a legitimate and much-needed outlet for conservative voices to a mere propaganda machine for a destructive and ethically ruinous administration."

Republicans, looking to mitigate the embarrassment of a neo-Nazi grabbing the party’s nomination in an Illinois congressional race, are considering an independent or write-in campaign for an alternative candidate.
“Arthur Jones is not a real Republican — he is a Nazi whose disgusting, bigoted views have no place in our nation’s discourse,” said Tim Schneider, the Illinois Republican Party chairman, in a statement.
“We are exploring all of our options, but under no circumstances will we support this candidate,” said Jesse Hunt, a spokesman for the National Republican Congressional Committee.
“Obviously, the Speaker stands with the RNC, NRCC, and Illinois GOP in denouncing this individual in the strongest possible terms,” said Jeremy Adler, a spokesman for House Speaker Paul Ryan’s campaign operation. “His views are repugnant and they have no place in our party.”

Just when Congress thought it had headed off a government shutdown, President Donald Trump yanked Washington right back to the brink.
In a Friday morning tweet that stunned even some of his closest advisers, Trump threatened “a VETO” of a $1.3 trillion spending bill that Congress had cleared just hours earlier.
Trump’s declaration — citing the spending bill’s lack of full funding for his border wall and attention to undocumented immigrants known as Dreamers — comes as many lawmakers who would have to override his rejection or pass a stopgap funding measure are already on the way out of Washington for a two-week recess.
Government funding lapses at midnight Friday, which would mark the third shutdown of the year. Trump later tweeted that there would be a news conference at the White House on the omnibus spending bill at 1 p.m.
The president’s top aides said Thursday he would sign the bill, but his threat was a reminder that only Trump truly knows what the White House is doing at any time.

A gunman killed three people in southwestern France on Friday, in a burst of violence that included hijacking a car, shooting at police officers, and opening fire and taking a hostage in a supermarket. The attack rattled nerves in a country that has been hit hard by terrorism in recent years.
The gunman was later killed by police officers when they stormed the supermarket, according to Gérard Collomb, the interior minister.
As he entered the Super U market in Trèbes, about 50 miles southeast of Toulouse, and began shooting, the man shouted “God is great” in Arabic, and claimed to be acting on behalf of the Islamic State, witnesses said. His connection to the militant group, if any, was unclear.
Mr. Collomb, speaking to reporters from Trèbes, identified the gunman as Redouane Lakdim, a 26-year-old who lived in the neighboring city of Carcassonne and who was known to the police as a petty criminal and drug dealer.
“But we had monitored him, and we believed that he was not radicalized,” Mr. Collomb said, adding that the gunman had “abruptly taken action,” without apparent prior planning, despite the authorities’ surveillance.

John Bolton’s appointment as national security adviser seems to many around the world to represent President Trump unbound, and they are trying to puzzle out what exactly that means.
A fiercely intelligent man with deeply conservative, nationalistic and aggressive views about American foreign policy, Mr. Bolton may bring more consistency and predictability to President Trump’s foreign policy, many suggest. But others worry that his hawkish views on Iran and North Korea, among others, may goad Mr. Trump into seeking military solutions to diplomatic problems.
But some also wonder whether Mr. Bolton, who has played the outsider even when serving as a senior American diplomat in the State Department and at the United Nations, will be able to adjust to a high-pressure job where he must be less public, less strident and more of a mediator of differing policy views.
And it is an open question whether he will be able to manage his relationship with Mr. Trump, who seems to tire quickly of anyone outside his own family who tries to guide or restrict his behavior, his public statements or his instincts.
Mr. Bolton’s views are well known and largely seem to align with Mr. Trump’s: the Iran nuclear deal is flawed and should be scrapped; North Korea must denuclearize or face military action; the United Nations and most other multilateral institutions are of little use to Washington. In this sense, said Josef Janning, a German policy analyst, Mr. Bolton “will provide significant support and intellectual ammunition to President Trump.”

The Trump administration on Friday announced sanctions and criminal indictments against an Iranian hacker network it said was involved in “one of the largest state-sponsored hacking campaigns” ever prosecuted by the United States, targeting hundreds of U.S. and foreign universities, as well as dozens of U.S. companies and government agencies, and the United Nations.
None of the alleged hackers were direct employees of the Iranian government, but all worked at the behest of the Iranian Revolutionary Guard Corps, officials said. While not the first such punishments imposed on Iran for malicious cyber acts, the new measures address more extensive Iranian efforts than previously alleged.
Nine of 10 named individuals were connected to the Mabna Institute, a Shiraz-based tech firm that the Justice Department alleged hacks on behalf of Iranian universities and the IRGC. The institute conducted “massive, coordinated intrusions” into the computer systems of at least 144 U.S. universities and 176 foreign universities in 21 countries, including Britain and Canada, officials said.

An Iowa couple and their two young children were found dead in a rented condominium in Mexico, authorities said.
The Sharp family was reported missing by relatives in their hometown of Creston early Friday, about a week after the family left for vacation.
Creston police said they contacted the U.S. State Department, and the bodies were found during a welfare check at the condo in Tulum. Police said there were no obvious signs of foul play.
Union County authorities said the family members were identified as 41-year-old Kevin Sharp; his wife, 38-year-old Amy Sharp; and their children, 12-year-old Sterling and 7-year-old Adrianna.
Relatives said the family arrived safely in Tulum on March 15, but they hadn’t heard from the family since.
Authorities said it wasn’t immediately clear what caused the deaths. Autopsy reports are pending.

To the delight of many of his Twitter followers, Tesla and SpaceX chief executive Elon Musk followed through on a promise Friday to delete the Facebook pages of both companies, flushing more than 5 million combined “likes” down the digital drain on a whim.
The Facebook pages for the automaker and aerospace innovator have been replaced by a default page noting that “content isn’t available right now.”
Musk apparently decided to take down the pages while responding to posts on Twitter, including one from Brian Acton, the co-founder of the Facebook-owned WhatsApp. Acton’s tweet included the hashtag #deletefacebook. That exchange led to a dare, as well as the revelation that Musk was unaware his aerospace company had a Facebook page.
It didn’t take long for Musk to go on to delete Tesla’s Facebook page, noting that the page “looks lame anyway.”
By deleting (or ordering someone else to do so) his company’s Facebook pages, Musk joined an online movement calling for Facebook users to sever their ties to the social media giant. The movement began with the revelation that Cambridge Analytica — a political marketing firm that worked with Donald Trump’s presidential campaign — improperly harvested the data of 50 million Facebook users, raising new questions about the network’s ability to protect user data.

Britain’s prime minister, Theresa May, won greater than expected support from the European Union on Friday over her escalating diplomatic battle with Russia, a significant victory for a leader who has often found herself isolated in Brussels as her country prepares to quit the bloc.
After hours of discussion, European leaders issued a relatively tough statement effectively blaming Moscow for the nerve agent attack on a former Russian spy, Sergei V. Skripal, and his daughter, Yulia, on British soil.
The European Union announced the withdrawal of its ambassador to Moscow for consultations, while President Emmanuel Macron said that France and other countries, including Germany, would also take measures, prompting speculation that they would expel some Russian diplomats, as Britain did in response to the attack. Poland, Lithuania, Latvia, Estonia and Denmark are among nations expected to take action as soon as Monday.
“We consider this attack as a serious challenge to our security and European sovereignty, so it calls for a coordinated and determined response from the European Union and its member states,” Mr. Macron said at a joint news conference with the German chancellor, Angela Merkel.

An Indictment charging Gholamreza Rafatnejad, 38; Ehsan Mohammadi, 37; Abdollah Karima, aka Vahid Karima, 39; Mostafa Sadeghi, 28; Seyed Ali Mirkarimi, 34; Mohammed Reza Sabahi, 26; Roozbeh Sabahi, 24; Abuzar Gohari Moqadam, 37; and Sajjad Tahmasebi, 30, all citizens and residents of Iran, was unsealed today.  The defendants were each leaders, contractors, associates, hackers-for-hire or affiliates of the Mabna Institute, an Iran-based company that, since at least 2013, conducted a coordinated campaign of cyber intrusions into computer systems belonging to 144 U.S. universities, 176 universities across 21 foreign countries, 47 domestic and foreign private sector companies, the U.S. Department of Labor, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the State of Hawaii, the State of Indiana, the United Nations, and the United Nations Children’s Fund.  Through the defendants’ activities, the Mabna Institute stole more than 31 terabytes of academic data and intellectual property from universities, and email accounts of employees at private sector companies, government agencies, and non-governmental organizations.  The defendants conducted many of these intrusions on behalf of the Islamic Republic of Iran’s (Iran) Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps (IRGC), one of several entities within the government of Iran responsible for gathering intelligence, as well as other Iranian government and university clients.  In addition to these criminal charges, today the Department of the Treasury’s Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC) designated the Mabna Institute and the nine defendants for sanctions for the malicious cyber-enabled activity outlined in the Indictment.

The political action committee founded by John R. Bolton, President Trump’s incoming national security adviser, was one of the earliest customers of Cambridge Analytica, which it hired specifically to develop psychological profiles of voters with data harvested from tens of millions of Facebook profiles, according to former Cambridge employees and company documents.
Mr. Bolton’s political committee, known as The John Bolton Super PAC, first hired Cambridge in August 2014, months after the political data firm was founded and while it was still harvesting the Facebook data.
In the two years that followed, Mr. Bolton’s super PAC spent nearly $1.2 million primarily for “survey research,” which is a term that campaigns use for polling, according to campaign finance records.
But the contract between the political action committee and Cambridge, a copy of which was obtained by The New York Times, offers more detail on just what Mr. Bolton was buying. The contract broadly describes the services to be delivered by Cambridge as “behavioral microtargeting with psychographic messaging.”
To do that work, Cambridge used Facebook data, according to the documents and two former employees familiar with the work.

Listen carefully. The strange sound of rushing air you can hear in the background, as Britain continues its slow march towards Brexit, is a deep collective sigh of relief.
Ministers, officials and business leaders - the latter group puffing out their cheeks more than anyone - wanted, needed, to see their wish of a Brexit transition period fulfilled.
So one obstacle cleared, or more accurately, skipped around.
The danger that's kept much of business and many MPs at Westminster awake at night, fear of the UK tumbling off a cliff edge into its post-Brexit future next March, has receded. Not disappeared. Receded.
Now Theresa May and the UK negotiating team can focus on the task ahead. Urgently.
A sigh of relief is time consuming, and there's no time or breath to spare.

Mark A. Conditt, who terrorized this city for nearly three weeks with a series of deadly bombings, left behind evidence of potential future targets before he killed himself on Wednesday, a law enforcement official said on Friday.
Officials were examining these future targets as part of the investigation. The official declined to describe these targets in detail, but said they were a mix of locations that had no common thread linking them.
On Wednesday, Representative Michael McCaul, a Texas Republican who is the chairman of the House Homeland Security Committee, said the future targets included residences. “They found a list of residences that they had to assume may have been utilized as future targets,” Mr. McCaul said.
On Friday, law enforcement officials said they were still evaluating evidence and leads from the public in an effort to build a timeline of the bomber’s activities. But they appeared to be learning little about Mr. Conditt’s motives.

You can still find furniture or a roommate on Craigslist. But ads seeking romance or sexual connections are no longer going to be available, after Craigslist took down the "personals" section Friday for its U.S. site.
The company says it made the change because Congress has passed the Fight Online Sex Trafficking Act, meant to crack down on sex trafficking of children. It was approved by a landslide in the Senate earlier this week, as NPR's Alina Selyukh has reported, but has been met with criticism by free speech advocates and sex workers.
As Craigslist wrote, the law seeks "to subject websites to criminal and civil liability when third parties (users) misuse online personals unlawfully."
"Any tool or service can be misused," Craigslist said. "We can't take such risk without jeopardizing all our other services, so we are regretfully taking craigslist personals offline. Hopefully we can bring them back some day."
The site added: "To the millions of spouses, partners and couples who met through craigslist, we wish you every happiness!"

Tens of thousands of people, outraged by a recent massacre at a South Florida school and energized by the students who survived, are spilling out in public protest in Washington and communities across the world on Saturday as they call for an end to gun violence.
The student activists, many of them sharp-tongued and defiant in the face of politicians and gun lobbyists, have kept attention on the issue in a time of renewed political activism on the left, as they helped lead a national school walkout and pushed state officials in Florida to enact gun legislation. The effectiveness of the students’ efforts will be measured, in part, on the success of Saturday’s events — their most ambitious show of force yet.
Here’s what we’re watching as protests unfurl around the globe:
• More than 800 protests are planned in every American state and on every continent except for Antarctica, according to a website set up by organizers. Here’s a map of planned protests.
• The National Park Service has approved a permit for the Washington march that estimates 500,000 people could attend. Called March for Our Lives, the main event there kicks off around midday, and some of the most prominent student activists from Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland, Fla., where a shooting left 17 dead last month, will speak.
• On Saturday, the White House said in a statement, “We applaud the many courageous young Americans exercising their First Amendment rights today.” On Friday, the Justice Department proposed banning so-called bump stocks, but President Trump signed a spending bill that included only some background check and school safety measures.

President Trump issued an order late Friday that supports a ban on many transgender troops, deferring to a new Pentagon plan that essentially cancels a policy adopted by the Obama administration.
The decision revokes a full ban that Trump issued last summer but disqualifies U.S. troops who have had gender reassignment surgery, as recommended by Defense Secretary Jim Mattis.
“By its very nature, military service requires sacrifice,” Mattis wrote in a memo to the president that was released Friday. “The men and women who serve voluntarily accept limitations on their personal liberties — freedom of speech, political activity, freedom of movement — in order to provide the military lethality and readiness necessary to ensure American citizens enjoy their personal freedoms to the fullest extent.”
Current transgender service members who have not undergone reassignment surgery should be allowed to stay, as long as they have been medically stable for 36 consecutive months in their biological sex before joining the military and are able to deploy across the world, Mattis recommended.

The heroic French policeman who died Saturday after offering himself as a hostage in a jihadist siege at a supermarket was an elite officer who had been decorated for his bravery in Iraq.
Lieutenant-Colonel Arnaud Beltrame, 45, took the place of a woman who gunman Radouane Lakdim was holding as a final hostage in the Super U store in the quiet southwest town of Trebes on Friday.
A senior officer in the gendarmerie, a police force which is part of the French military, Beltrame hoped to be able to negotiate with Lakdim once the 50 shoppers and staff caught up in the siege had been taken to safety.
He left his telephone on a table to allow authorities to hear what was happening inside.
But Lakdim, who claimed allegiance to the Islamic State group, shot and stabbed him, prompting a police raid that left the attacker dead. Beltrame succumbed to his wounds early Saturday.
President Emmanuel Macron led a flood of tributes to Beltrame, who had served for four years protecting the presidential palace in the 2000s.

Primed for economic combat, President Donald Trump set in motion tariffs on as much as $60 billion in Chinese imports to the U.S. on Thursday and accused the Chinese of high-tech thievery, picking a fight that could push the global heavyweights into a trade war.
China threatened retaliation, and Wall Street cringed, recording one of the biggest drops of Trump’s presidency. But he declared the U.S. would emerge “much stronger, much richer.”
It was the boldest example to date of Trump’s “America first” agenda, the culmination of his longstanding view that weak U.S. trade policies and enforcement have hollowed out the nation’s workforce and ballooned the federal deficit. Two weeks ago, with fanfare, he announced major penalty tariffs on steel and aluminum imports that he said threatened national security.
However, even as Trump was talking tough at the White House, his administration moved to soften the sting of the metal tariffs, telling Congress on Thursday that the European Union, Australia, South Korea and other nations would join Canada and Mexico in gaining an initial exemption. And that raised questions about whether his actions will match his rhetoric.

One schools superintendent has a novel way to keep his students safe from school shooters: arming them with rocks.
David Helsel, superintendent of a school district in northeast Pennsylvania, explained his plan to a legislative education committee last week, drawing a flurry of local media coverage.
"Every classroom has been equipped with a five-gallon bucket of river stone," Helsel explained about his Blue Mountain School District in Schuylkill County outside Harrisburg, Pittsburgh, in a video broadcast by ABC affiliate 16 WNEP. "If an armed intruder attempts to gain entrance into any of our classrooms, they will face a classroom full of students armed with rocks, and they will be stoned."
Helsel's comments come amid a new chapter in the public debate about mass shootings after a man killed 17 people at a high school in Parkland, Florida. Despite polls showing that large numbers of Americans support stricter gun-control measures, Congress has thus far not produced any significant legislation, and schools and other officials have looked to other solutions. President Trump floated an NRA-backed idea to arm teachers.
Helsel told local news reporters that students in his district routinely drilled on shooter simulations and were given active shooting training through a program known as ALICE, short for Alert, Lockdown, Inform, Counter, Evacuate.

Mexican authorities said there are no indications of violence in the deaths of four members of an Iowa family found in a condominium where they were vacationing near the resort town of Tulum.
The Mexican Embassy in Washington, D.C., and the office of the attorney general for the state of Quintana Roo on Mexico's Caribbean coast both told NBC News that no indications of a struggle or crime were found on the bodies or in the condominium where the Sharp family was staying.
"So far, no signs of violence have been found," said Paulina Chávez Alonzo, spokeswoman for the embassy. She offered the Mexican government's "deepest condolences to the family and friends of the Sharps."
The office of the state attorney general was investigating the deaths. An official in the office said the bodies of the parents were found in bed while those of the children were discovered in front of a television. A police official in the Sharps' hometown of Creston, Iowa, said the department was "not releasing any information until we get autopsy reports back."

President Donald Trump is preparing to expel dozens of Russian diplomats from the U.S. in response to the nerve-agent poisoning of a former Russian spy in the U.K., two people familiar with the matter said Saturday.
Trump agreed with the recommendation of advisers and the expulsions are likely to be announced on Monday, the people said, though they cautioned that Trump’s decision may not be final. Trump is prepared to act but wants to be sure European allies will take similar steps against Russia before doing so, aides said.
The U.S. considers the diplomats to be undeclared spies, carrying out intelligence activity under the guise of being embassy staff, one of the people said. Trump’s action would follow a similar move by British Prime Minister Theresa May, who ordered 23 Russians that she said were spies to leave Britain over the poisoning of a former Russian spy and his daughter.
The advisers reached recommendations for a U.S. response to the U.K. attack at a National Security Council meeting on Wednesday and honed the proposals on Friday. Trump discussed the issue Friday with U.S. Ambassador to Russia Jon Huntsman, Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin, Commerce Secretary Wilbur Ross, Attorney General Jeff Sessions, Defense Secretary James Mattis, Director of National Intelligence Dan Coats, outgoing National Security Adviser H.R. McMaster and others, two people said.

Egypt’s General Command of the Armed Forces has made arrangements to assist the Interior Ministry to secure the presidential elections across Egypt and provide a safe environment for citizens to cast their votes during March 26-28.
“The armed forces are involved in securing the electoral process with its elements in coordination with the bodies of the Interior Ministry, and the Supreme Elections Authority and all the concerned bodies in the state,” the spokesman of the armed forces, Tamer Refaei, said in a statement on Facebook.
“The General Command of the Armed Forces is keen to ensure that all participating forces understand the tasks assigned to them to protect the citizens and to address all the threats that can be faced while securing polling stations and centers. The forces have been trained on how to assist citizens and act in response to emergency situations in cooperation with the police forces and security elements in the vicinity of electoral committees,” he continued.

High-ranking officials from North and South Korea will meet on the countries’ border next week to prepare for the inter-Korean summit meeting planned for late next month, the South said on Saturday.
The officials will discuss the agenda for the meeting between President Moon Jae-in of South Korea and Kim Jong-un, the North’s leader, the South’s Unification Ministry said in a statement. That summit meeting, which both sides have agreed to hold in late April, is expected to be followed within weeks by a meeting between Mr. Kim and President Trump.
Unification Minister Cho Myoung-gyon will lead the South’s delegation to the talks next week, which will be held Thursday on the North Korean side of Panmunjom, the so-called truce village that straddles the border. The North’s delegation will be led by Ri Son-kwon, one of the senior North Korean officials who visited the South during the Winter Olympics last month, part of the stage-setting for the current détente between the Koreas after a year of high tension over Pyongyang’s nuclear program.
The North on Saturday accepted the South’s proposal to meet at Panmunjom, the Unification Ministry statement said.

Investigators with Britain's information commissioner searched the London headquarters of Cambridge Analytica on Friday amid reports that the firm harvested the personal data of millions of Facebook users as part of a campaign to influence the U.S. 2016 presidential elections.
The move comes after a British High Court judge granted a warrant to the data watchdog Information Commissioner's Office, allowing its investigators to search the firm's offices.
The search is reported to be part of a broader investigation into possible ties between Cambridge Analytica and the campaign for the U.K. Brexit referendum.
The BBC reports,
"Information Commissioner Elizabeth Denham has said she was looking at whether personal data was acquired in 'an unauthorised way', whether there was sufficient consent to share the data, what was done to safeguard it and whether Facebook acted robustly when it found out about the loss of the data."
The search was conducted by more than a dozen people wearing jackets identifying them as ICO personnel, according to The Associated Press.

Just hours after threatening a veto, President Trump said Friday afternoon that he had signed a “ridiculous” $1.3 trillion spending bill passed by Congress early Friday, averting a government shutdown.

In a morning tweet, Trump said he might veto the omnibus bill because it did nothing to address the fate of young undocumented immigrants known as “dreamers” and did not fully fund his border wall.
But speaking to reporters at the White House about four hours later, Trump said he had decided to sign the bill despite his reservations, arguing that it provides much-needed funding for the military, including a pay increase for troops and new equipment.
“My highest duty is to keep America safe,” Trump said. “We need to take care of our military.”
Still, he voiced disdain for the hasty way the bill was passed.
“I say to Congress, I will never sign another bill like this again,” Trump said, also calling on Congress to give him a line-item veto, a tool that the Supreme Court has said is unconstitutional for a president.

On the day this week that he released a photograph of Stormy Daniels, his porn-star client, taking a polygraph, Michael Avenatti was pressed on CNN to explain the significance of a test that typically is inadmissible in court. “Does it help your legal case, actually?” Anderson Cooper asked.
Avenatti, a racecar-driving lawyer from California, met the question with a shrug. While it was unclear to Cooper, the audience in Stormy Daniels v. Donald J. Trump is sometimes not a judge or jury, but viewers at home.
“Well, I don’t know that it helps our legal case,” Avenatti said, appearing on a split screen beside the grainy, years-old image of Daniels. “But we want the public to have as many facts as possible at their disposal.”
Ever since Daniels sued President Donald Trump this month—claiming she had an intimate affair with him in 2006 and 2007 and that a nondisclosure agreement created before the 2016 election is invalid—Avenatti has tormented the administration with a steady drip of half-revelations about Daniels’ relationship with the president, usually with an appeal to tune in for his client’s 60 Minutes interview on Sunday to hear more. Late Thursday night, he tweeted an image of a DVD and hinted that it contained information damaging to the president. He wrote, “If ‘a picture is worth a thousand words,’ how many words is this worth?????” 

Sunday night on "60 Minutes," a former porn star who is suing the President of the United States of America will tell reveal details about her story involving Donald Trump and an affair she claims they had in 2006 and 2007. It's a remarkable sentence to write, and it should be a remarkable story to hear when Stormy Daniels gives her interview to Anderson Cooper at 7 p.m. ET Sunday night on CBS.
There is, oddly enough, a connection to the NFL in this unexpected story. Daniels' attorney, Michael Avenatti, has actually sued the NFL on multiple occasions. 
Avenatti first migrated into the NFL's spectrum following the 2011 season and the seat fiasco from Super Bowl XLV. Essentially there were around 1,000 fans who purchased tickets to the game but did not have seats when they arrived to the new Cowboys Stadium. Avenatti led the lawsuit against the NFL on that front.
In 2016, Avenatti claimed that the NFL spent more than $20 million defending itself from the seat lawsuit.
Avenatti was also involved in a lawsuit against the NFL in which he sued the league after the NFL canceled the Hall of Fame game back in 2016. Fans who planned to attend the game felt misled about how things went down and were quite angry. Avenatti gathered a group of them to file a lawsuit against the NFL. 

President Trump has decided not to hire two lawyers who were announced last week as new additions to his legal team, leaving him with a shrinking stable of lawyers as the investigation by the special counsel, Robert S. Mueller III, enters an intense phase.
“The president is disappointed that conflicts prevent Joe diGenova and Victoria Toensing from joining the president’s special counsel legal team,” Mr. Trump’s personal lawyer, Jay Sekulow, said in a statement on Sunday morning. “However, those conflicts do not prevent them from assisting the president in other legal matters. The president looks forward to working with them.”
The upheaval on the legal team comes at a critical time for Mr. Trump. The president’s former lead lawyer, John Dowd, quit the team on Thursday, just as Mr. Trump is deciding whether to sit with Mr. Mueller for an interview. At the moment, Mr. Sekulow is the president’s chief outside lawyer, as Mr. Trump’s longtime New York lawyer, Marc E. Kasowitz, remains on the periphery.
While Mr. Trump’s lawyers, including Mr. Dowd, had told the president that the investigation would be over by this point, it seems to be accelerating, as Mr. Mueller appears to be looking into a wide range of matters related to Mr. Trump’s corporate activities, his 2016 campaign, his associates and his time in office.

It was the biggest gun control protest in a generation. Hundreds of rallies were staged across the US and beyond as marchers filled the streets calling for the implementation of tighter measures following the deadly mass shooting at a Florida school in February.
That incident not only ignited the #NeverAgain movement, but also Saturday's mass demonstrations, which took place under the banner of March For Our Lives and were led by a rally in Washington DC attended by some 200,000 demonstrators, according to CBS News.
With events not just in the US but as far afield as London, Paris, Mauritius, Tokyo, Stockholm, Sydney, Geneva and Berlin, the day was made up of powerful messages delivered by articulate students and children, most of whom have already in some way experienced gun violence.

At least 37 people are confirmed to have died in a fire that tore through a shopping centre in the Siberian city of Kemerovo.
Dozens more people, children believed to be among them, are missing, according to Russian media.
The blaze started on an upper floor of the Winter Cherry complex and many of the victims were in a cinema.
Video posted on social media showed people jumping from windows to escape the flames on Sunday.
Smoke billowed from windows as fire crews worked to evacuate the property.
Kemerovo, a key coal-producing area, lies about 3,600km (2,200 miles) east of Moscow.
The cause of the blaze is not yet known but authorities have launched an investigation.

Former GOP Pennsylvania senator and presidential candidate Rick Santorum said Sunday that students at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland, Florida, should have responded to the massacre of their classmates by “taking CPR classes” instead of “looking to someone else to solve their problem.”
When he made the comments, duringan appearance on CNN’s “State of the Union,” Santorum was arguing that gun laws wouldn’t make schools safer on their own, and he said the students should instead focus on ways to help respond to a mass shooter instead of advocating for tougher laws.
“How about kids, instead of looking to someone else to solve their problem, do something about maybe taking CPR classes or trying to deal with situations [so] that when there is a violent shooter, that you can actually respond to that?” he said during a panel discussion.
Santorum’s comments came a day after hundreds of thousands of people, including high school students from around the country, protested at the March for Our Lives in Washington and at satellite marches around the country. Students from Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School organized the march to advocate for stricter gun control laws.

Former President Barack Obama talked about his future plans for his post-presidency life at a conference Sunday in Japan, addressing how he might shape "a million" new, young leaders in his mold.
The wide-ranging discussion repeatedly touched on the Obama Foundation's efforts to engage the digital space to help young people in the U.S. and across the world get connected.
"If I could do that effectively, then -- you know -- I would create a hundred or a thousand or a million young Barack Obamas or Michelle Obamas," Obama said. "Or, the next group of people who could take that baton in that relay race that is human progress."
During the discussion, Obama acknowledged the great potential that young people have in making a difference, pointing to the March for Our Lives anti-gun violence demonstrations, led by high schoolers, in Washington, D.C., and around the globe. He also knocked "old men" in power.
"A lot of our problems are caused by old men. No offense, men, who are old," he quipped.
The former president bemoaned the current news and social media environments in which people are too easily able to find news that fits their personal narratives and signaled that he is seeking a way to create a more productive forum.

One day after a French police officer was killed by a gunman in a hostage exchange, a man was arrested for seemingly celebrating Lt. Col. Arnaud Beltrame's death on Twitter and Facebook.
"Every time a police officer is killed, and it's not every day, I think of my friend Rémi Fraisse," Stéphane Poussier, a onetime candidate in legislative elections in Northwestern France, tweeted, according to French media. "This time it was a colonel — how great!"
Poussier's Twitter account has since been deleted.
Fraisse was a 21-year-old conservationist who died after police threw a stun grenade during clashes at a 2014 protest against a dam project. Fraisse's death outside Toulouse, sparked protests across the country. A French court found the officer who threw it did not intend to kill Fraisse.
"Last night I dreamed of Rémi Fraisse ... He said he was happy to welcome a colonel from the gendarmerie!" Poussier said in a Facebook post Saturday.

Protests have broken out across Catalonia as former leader Carles Puigdemont spends the night in a German prison.
Mr Puigdemont, who is wanted in Spain for sedition and rebellion, was detained by German police acting on a European arrest warrant.
Thousands of his supporters have turned out in Barcelona and other nearby cities to protest his arrest.
Mr Puigdemont will appear before a German judge on Monday.
He was detained while crossing from Denmark on his way to Belgium, where he has been living in self-imposed exile since Catalonia's parliament unilaterally declared independence from Spain in October.
Catalan crisis in 300 words
A European warrant for his arrest was reissued on Friday.

At first, they were weeping teenagers, survivors of one of the world’s deadliest school massacres. But as the students of Marjory Stoneman Douglas High try to turn their tragedy into a catalyst for strengthening America’s gun laws, they have also encountered scathing criticism from others skeptical of their activism.
The students have been called disingenuous crisis actors. Some have said that the students’ pain has been hijacked by the far left, or that they are parroting talking points from an anti-Trump FBI. All that comes on top of the scornful question often directed at the nation’s youngest activists: Are you even old enough to wade into some of society’s thorniest issues?
But a day after thousands of youths marched across the nation, an 81-year-old from Argentina who happens to be the supreme pontiff of the worldwide Catholic Church sent a message to them and other young people speaking up about the state of the world:
Keep shouting.
Pope Francis delivered the Palm Sunday message in St. Peter’s Square in front of tens of thousands of people — including young people who were there for the Catholic Church’s World Youth Day.

A rare phenomenon that occurs just once about every five years is turning the snow orange in eastern Europe.
The orange snow is a result of sand storms from the Sahara Desert mixing with rain and snow, according to the BBC.
People have taken to social media to post photos of the orange-tinted snow, which is falling in countries like Russia, Ukraine, Bulgaria and Romania. Skiers posted photos of the colored snow at a resort near Sochi, Russia.
Steven Keates, a meteorologist who works for the U.K.’s national weather service, known as the Met Office, told The Independent that the orange snow is caused by sand being lifted up into the upper layers of the atmosphere and spreading out due to the wind and weather patterns.
“There has been a lot of lifted sand or dust originating from North Africa and the Sahara, from sand storms which have formed in the desert,” he explained to the U.K. newspaper. “Looking at satellite imagery from Nasa, it shows a lot of sand and dust in the atmosphere drifting across the Mediterranean. When it rains or snows, it drags down whatever is up there, if there is sand in the atmosphere.”

An Iowa family found dead in a vacation condo in Mexico died from inhaling toxic gas, but there was no sign of foul play or suicide, Mexican authorities said Saturday.
The type of gas hadn't yet been determined, but "any violent act or suicide has been discounted,” the prosecutors' office in the Caribbean coast state of Quintana Roo said.
The office said investigators "carried out a physical investigation of the gas connections in the room," and the civil defense office of Tulum would issue a technical report on the findings.
The office said investigators "carried out a physical investigation of the gas connections in the room," and the civil defense office of Tulum would issue a technical report on the findings.
A spokeswoman for the office of Iowa state Attorney General Tom Miller would not comment on whether the owner of the condo could face legal consequences in connection with the deaths, Reuters reported.

Facebook Inc. hasn’t been “fully forthcoming” as Congress probed Russia’s attempted meddling in the 2016 presidential election, U.S. Senator Mark Warner of Virginia said Sunday as the social-media giant faced continued fallout from an ongoing data crisis.
Warner, the top Democrat on the Senate Intelligence Committee, said on NBC’s “Meet the Press” that he questioned “the use of this really sketchy firm Cambridge Analytica,” but Facebook “blew that off” as they did other concerns over Russia’s actions.
The political firm, which consulted on President Donald Trump’s campaign, siphoned data from some 50 million Facebook users as it built an election-consulting company that boasted it could sway voters in contests all over the world. Facebook also came under scrutiny last year after the revelation that Russians had used the site in its attempts to affect the 2016 election.
Facebook took out ads in U.S. and U.K. newspapers on Sunday apologizing for not doing more to prevent the leak of customer data and detailing fixes it has made over the years, including recently.
The revelation of Cambridge Analytica’s action has caused days of fury for Facebook and its co-founder and chief executive officer, Mark Zuckerberg. Two congressional committees have invited Zuckerberg to testify, and he has said he’d agree if he is the right person to appear.

